_	He oppressed Confucians and promoted Legalism, the idea that people were inherently evil, and that a strong, forceful government was needed to control them.
_	Harper goes nearly insane for many months, but then begins the deliberate process of using his songs to implant the idea that humans should rule their own lives and that SUM should be destroyed.
_	The emphasis of this book being the life of an average Vodou priestess; the purpose of this was to dispel the idea that Vodou was a religion of dark magic that revolved around the idea of cursing other people (ex: Voodoo doll) as one of the rites in the faith.
_	He has challenged the idea that musical meaning must be derived from musical form and has repeatedly rejected oppositions between score and performance and performance and meaning.
_	The "War Scroll" and "the Thanksgiving hymns" both delve into the idea that Belial is accursed by God and his people, and shows how the existence of Belial in this world can be attributed to the mysteries of God since we can not know why he permits the dealings of Belial to persist.
_	There seems to be an unease with the idea that Kashmiri women are/were involved in militancy and this unease and denial is so deeply entrenched that whenever a woman is charged as an overground operative of any militant group, the media is swift to declare her innocent and reveal her personal tragedies.
_	The first pillar is "slaveability/anti-Black racism, which is all based on the idea that Black people were made to be slaves and that they are property.
_	This article caused Granovetter to be identified with the concept of "Embeddedness", the idea that economic relations between individuals or firms are embedded in actual social networks and do not exist in an abstract idealized market.
_	Genuine structural collapse seems, in many cases, the only plausible explanation supporting the idea that such structures exist.
_	He considers emigrating to America, feeling it would be better for his daughter to have a clean start, rather than having to live with the idea that her father is an "uppity chauffeur".
_	One central analogy is the idea that should be the symmetric group .
_	This concept corresponds to the idea that Joselito's pigs are happy animals, since they live their lives with complete freedom and in their natural habitat: the dehesa (Mediterranean woodland).
_	In a 2014 interview he said of his doctoral studies, of which "The Christchurch Vespers/Vespers for Pentecost" are a part: "THE PhD explored the idea that composers are not exactly like a magpie collecting shiny objects.
_	Peter Admirand of the Mater Dei Institute of Education agreed with Braiterman's assessment of postmodernist influences on Jewish theology, but rejected the idea that theodic arguments concerning the Holocaust are required to "defend[] the indefensible."
_	The American people understand that we've got a big hole that we've got to dig ourselves out of—but they don't like the idea that people are digging a bigger hole even as they're being asked to fill it up."
_	Recent evidence can be used to support the idea that differences between males and females in planum temporale asymmetry begin to develop and show early in development, potentially during prenatal stages.
_	Jane Jacobs is often credited with the idea that urban diversity and a city’s size leads to agglomeration economies.
_	The concept of organizational project management is based on the idea that there is a correlation between an organization's capabilities in project management, program management, and portfolio management, and the organization's effectiveness in implementing strategy.
_	The first is the idea that all elements of a product's life-cycle—from functionality, production, assembly, testing, maintenance, environmental impact, and finally disposal and recycling—should be taken into careful consideration in the early design phases.
_	Within the discipline of political theory the method calls for its practitioners to use "a 'close reading' of the 'Great Books' of political thought; they strive to understand a thinker 'as he understood himself'; they are unconcerned with questions about the historical context of, or historical influences on, a given author" and strive to be open to the idea that they may find something timelessly true in a great book.
_	However, in order to strengthen the idea that it is a club for the whole prefecture, under the name Dezzolla Shimane they also played home matches at Matsue Athletic Stadium (Matsue), Misumi Central Park Track and Field Ground (Hamada), Hamayama Park Track and Field Ground (Izumo and Shimane Prefectural Soccer Park (Masuda).
_	The basic premise of Confucianism is the idea that human beings are fundamentally good.
_	He advocates "Jewish labor" − the idea that under the current state of affairs in the land of Israel, Jews should employ other Jews.
_	However, a second aspect of I Corinthians also enters into the sermon; Swift relies on it to promote the idea that reason can be used to comprehend the world, but "excellency of speech" is false when it comes to knowledge about the divine.
_	This supports the idea that hotspots may contain different arrangements of crime.
_	Nam-seon was eventually pressured to promote the idea that Shinto was the key manifestation of this tradition, and that all Asian folk traditions were essentially Shinto in other forms.
_	The industrial web theory was based on the idea that the economic strength of an industrial nation is composed of interdependent sectors such as manufacturing, mining, utilities and transportation.
_	He expresses the idea that it is not death that represents the end, but the lack of movement.
_	Typically, regardless of the method used, results show that the no-think trials result in worse memory than the think trials, which supports the idea that suppression leads to inhibition in memory.
_	They would have found utterly incredible the idea that all religions, including paganism, be treated with equal deference.
_	The sizeable proportion of cinnamon lends some support to the idea that the armada had visited Ceylon, although it was not unusual to find it on Indian markets.
_	MI5 says this challenges the idea that terrorists are young Muslim men driven by sexual frustration and lured to "martyrdom" by the promise of beautiful virgins waiting for them in paradise.
_	During her professional and personal relationship with Komisarjevsky, whom she married in 1934 and left in 1936, Ashcroft learned from him what Billington calls "the vital importance of discipline, perfectionism, and the idea that the actor, even during passages of emotional stress, must remain a thinking human being".
_	Supersymmetry is based on the idea that there is another physical symmetry beyond those already developed in the standard model, specifically a symmetry between bosons and fermions.
_	The first organization in the United States to support the idea that Macedonians constitute a separate nationality was the pro-communist Macedonian People's League.
_	This was when he had the idea that if he interchanged the pistons he could make a 'stroker' motor - which he did and the stroker was born.
_	This is an early example of what has come to be known as disease diffusion mapping, an area of study based on the idea that a disease starts from some source or central point and then spreads throughout the local area according to patterns and conditions there.
_	He based his conclusion on the idea that Hals would show the lace cuff but not include the hand of a woman.
_	However the usage of 1 Enoch assumes that the basis of the text would also fall under an unknown author or the idea that it was a pseudegraph text.
_	Magnetar Capital rejected the idea that it had picked securities purposely so that they would fail.
_	The article advanced the idea that because of the need of American armed forces to cross two vast oceans surrounding the United States to bring the fight to the enemy, any comparison of what the United States spends relative to spending by other nations that do not have to cross those oceans, is specious.
_	The novel develops the idea that science, mathematics, and logic—in parting from mysticism—do not contain the fear of death, and therefore offer no respite.
_	Newton's work and the philosophy that enshrines it are based on mathematical empiricism, which is the idea that mathematical and physical laws may be revealed in the real world via experimentation and observation.
_	It is the idea that responsible government is an essential part of a constitutional monarchy.
_	The kin-selection hypothesis, which argued that homosexuals contribute to their nephews’ and nieces’ survival, and the female fertility hypothesis, were both findings which support the idea that homoerotic behaviour is an evolutionary by-product that serves no beneficial function by itself (for discussion see the section on homosexuality, below).
_	At the same time the chorus suggests the idea that one should move beyond past troubles and look forward.
_	Pertinent to concerns of non-Catholicism is the idea that the autocephalous churches of Eastern Orthdoxy engage in phyletism, that they are often concerned with issues of ethnicity and nationalism to the detriment to ministry and religious practice.
_	The idea that math is 'out there' is incompatible with the idea that it consists of formal systems."
_	While in the Parable novels the purpose of partnership is to ameliorate the negative effects of beings or processes that cannot be resisted or avoided, in "Fledgling" mutualistic symbiosis serves to challenge the idea that the Ina are a superior species by making Ina and humans interdependent of each other.
_	Thousands of images returned from Odyssey support the idea that Mars once had great amounts of water flowing across its surface.
_	Philosophers put forward the idea that the kami were ""transformations of the Buddha manifested in Japan to save all sentient beings""."
_	External evidence supports the idea that the Song was originally recited by different singers representing the different characters, accompanied by mime.
_	By the early 1990s, the term "denpa" began to appear throughout music and literature, and the phrase was used to describe delusional, creepy people or crazed lunatics as a derogatory euphemism, based on the idea that such people could hear voices, see things and communicate through telepathy as a result of electromagnetic waves.
_	In October 2015, when questioned about clues and hints alluding to the sixth season (as has been the status quo since the first season of the series) in "Hotel", Murphy revealed he had yet to definitively decide on a theme, "This is an interesting year in that the idea that we’re dealing with I've mentioned in several seasons.
_	The title "Innerspeaker" was selected by Parker, which was a term he came up with to try to explain the "feeling you get when you're at your most inspired, the idea that [a song] just appears to you vividly and if someone plugged a stereo into your brain they'd be able to hear it" and also said "the songs come from somewhere internal, rather than slowly taking shape with a bunch of guys jamming in a room.
_	This album was very much a case of the former; it’s meant to give off the idea that the songs would be preserved."
_	The name "Devo" comes from the concept of 'de-evolution'—the idea that instead of continuing to evolve, mankind has actually begun to regress, as evidenced by the dysfunction and herd mentality of American society."
_	The siting of the garderobes here facing the church reinforces the idea that this was considered the rear of the house; an arrangement such as this would not have been made if this were in fact the Priest's House.
_	Operating on the idea that "if it’s not fresh, don’t serve it," the chain has over 30 locations in Arkansas, Florida, Hawaii, Oklahoma, Tennessee and Texas with several more in development.
_	It strongly endorses the idea that O'Neill was murdered and attributes his loss as the main reason for the catastrophic defeat to the English republicans under Oliver Cromwell who occupied Ireland for the next decade, and deprived many Catholic leaders of their lands in the 1652 Act of Settlement.
_	A naive way of explaining this observation is to use the idea that ApoB100 reflects lipoprotein particle number (independent of their cholesterol content).
_	The Kerry Committee report came to the conclusion that "senior U.S. policy makers were not immune to the idea that drug money was a perfect solution to the Contra's funding problems."
_	Rabinow, a Foucault scholar interested in issues of the production of knowledge, used the topic to argue against the idea that scientific discovery is the product of individual work, writing, "Committees and science journalists like the idea of associating a unique idea with a unique person, the lone genius.
_	This theory proposes the idea that women are more likely to choose family-oriented jobs because that is what women are naturally inclined towards.
_	From this, they furthered the idea that this structure would have to be in a formation that mimicked layers.
_	Vedder stated that "Rats" is about the idea that "rats are probably a hell of a lot more admirable" than humans.
_	The accessibility relation is required to be reflexive and transitive, to capture the idea that E's conditional has an S4 necessity.
_	He proposes the idea that within San Francisco every school system should teach another language.
_	Robinson herself has said "I like the idea that my pieces encapsulate the music of the forest."
_	In the years leading up to the thirtieth anniversary of the war in 2012, Argentinian society and media has renewed the promotion of the idea that the Falklands should be ruled by Argentina.
_	She accepted the idea that powerful groups would enslave the powerless, and she would have grown up with Oriental tales of "The Turk" taking European slaves.
_	A reviewer for "Publishers Weekly" noted that friendship and responsibility are taught to characters in the novels, while booksforyouths.com had a reviewer who pointed out the idea that, just as Clan cats shun house cats for their soft life, people should realize that it is necessary to experience hardship in life.
_	To remember this, some people use the mnemonic "white cap, red nose" to reflect the idea that pilots consumed a lot of alcohol while waiting for ships, thus the white captain's cap with a red nose below it.
_	Medieval reforms during the time affected eastern territories, allowing more human migration and helping to support inter-regional commercial traffic, substantiating the idea that the bridge was reconstructed during the time.
_	Through his studies, he formulated the idea that each species had developed from ancestors with similar features.
_	Similarly, GameSpy gave "Joker" an 8/10, and enforced the idea that the game is more than just a copy of "Pokémon".
_	The Russian school of constitutional economics was created in the early 21st century with the idea that CE allows for a combined economic and constitutional analysis in the legislative, first of all, budget process, thus helping to overcome arbitrariness in the economic and financial decision-making and to open entrance to civil society into budget process.
_	Robbie Case rejected the idea that changes in processing capacity can be described as a progression along Pascual-Leone's single line of development.
_	Bloch ascribes to Marx the idea that the human race is the guide of the universe or of Being as a whole.
_	Mind uploading also relies on the idea that the human mind (the "self" and the long-term memory), just like non-human minds, is represented by the current neural network paths and the weights of the brain synapses rather than by a dualistic and mystic soul and spirit.
_	This ideology carries over in modern-day conservative Christianity, and is enforced through the idea that the more welcoming people are to the idea of homosexuality, the more people will give into their homosexual lusts.
_	Adriano Olivetti (born on 11 April 1901 in Ivrea, Piedmont, died 27 February 1960 on a train from Milan to Lausanne) was an Italian engineer, politician and industrialist whose entrepreneurial activity thrived on the idea that profit should be reinvested for the benefits of the whole society.
_	Andy decides that the family will leave because he doesn't want Lisa filling Heidi's head with the idea that she is sick and needs to be on medication.
_	"This gets at the idea that a supposed understanding of an investment rationale, a narrative or a theoretical model is unhelpful in practical trading."
_	Several enthusiasts had the idea that led to the creation of the NASCAR Craftsman Truck Series, including Vessels.
_	Wong's published research is largely focused on examining premodern Chinese fiction on its own terms, with the idea that knowing the differences between the way the Chinese told their stories and the way Europeans and Americans did is indispensable for a deeper understanding of both.
_	They had planned four successive lines of hilltop strongholds, with the idea that tactical air could destroy communists attacking the Royalist trenchworks.
_	The show has been interpreted as perpetuating the idea that the Queen and Prime Minister Churchill had forced Princess Margaret to give up her plan to marry Group Captain Peter Townsend.
_	The imperial regime was based on the idea that sovereignty resided in the Nation, not the State, symbolically represented by the emperor.
_	This pattern has led to the idea that, because selection acts so strongly on mating traits, it may be involved in the process of speciation.
_	'Mr Irwin' also attempts to debunk the idea that protectionism made America a great industrial power, a notion believed by some to offer lessons for developing countries today.
_	The thinking is that anti-drug publicity may convey the idea that “everyone’s doing it.
_	The doctrine is most commonly presented as the idea that time and space are just human perceptions; they are not necessarily real concepts, just a medium through which humans internalize the universe.
_	Rifkin's book, "The Age of Access", published in the year 2000, was the first to introduce the idea that society is beginning to move from ownership of property in markets, to access to services in networks, giving rise to the Sharing Economy.
_	The 1946 National School Lunch Act, which is still in operation, provided low-cost or free school lunch meals to qualified low-income students through subsidies to schools, based on the idea that a "full stomach" during the day supported class attention and studying.
_	The concept centered on the idea that the king was an incarnation (avatar) of the god Vishnu and that he was a Bodhisattva (enlightened one), therefore basing his power on his religious power, his moral power, and his purity of blood.
_	The Lone Gunmen were following the idea that the chimps were being trained as assassins.
_	Some senior officers, including Kurt Student, Franz Halder and Johann Adolf von Kielmansegg, even disputed the idea that it was a military concept.
_	Bono describes the song as "based on the idea that sex is a conversation of sorts" but that on another level it is a prayer.
_	Dadiani, operating under the idea that Chigorin had insulted him on an earlier occasion, refused to sponsor the tournament if Chigorin remained.
_	While writing the film's script Janiak was inspired by the idea that "Even small moments though can drive a wedge between people" and with her writing partner, wondered "how far we could push them until they started falling apart."
_	Many events during the series, like Elektra behaviour during Gus's adoption, have lead viewers to the idea that she is a lesbian.
_	The "predator confusion effect" is based on the idea that it becomes difficult for predators to pick out individual prey from groups because the many moving targets create a sensory overload of the predator's visual channel.
_	The "many eyes effect" is based on the idea that as the size of the group increases, the task of scanning the environment for predators can be spread out over many individuals, a mass collaboration presumably providing a higher level of vigilance.
_	It is possible that this particular story is the source of the idea that the wailing of numerous banshees signifies the death of a great person.
_	All three contributed to the general emergence of the idea that addiction to a person (who was addicted to a substance or a behavioral process) was a possibility.
_	As envisioned by the Industrial Workers of the World (IWW) – which for many years prior to 1919 had been associated with the concept – One Big Union was not just the idea that all workers should be organised into one big union.
_	Themes in Nazi Propaganda aimed at America revolved largely around the idea that the United States faced a 'lack of unity.'
_	Isotropicity – the idea that the universe looks the same in all directions – is one of the core assumptions that enters into the FRW equations.
_	In the early 2000s, Charles Vacanti and Martin Vacanti conducted studies that led them to the idea that stem cells - spore-like cells - could be spontaneously recovered from ordinary tissues that are stressed via mechanical injury or increased acidity.
_	Having demonstrated that professionals can make a positive difference, Vijay sought the help of ASSEFA's founder Mr Loganathan and executive coordinator, Mr TK Mathew, to work on the idea that Deep and he espoused – of professionals working at the developmental cutting edge.
_	The extraterrestrial presence bemoans its vain attempt at communicating with humans and eventually departs after transmitting the idea that mankind perhaps needs more time to evolve in order to communicate with it.
_	The deep debt coupled with the idea that the Théâtre Libre was no longer needed, as it had proved that a new form of theatre could be acceptable and commercial was being produced, the theatre failed and closed its doors.
_	In some cases, Barth discovered that players made assumptions on limitations of the game from these tutorials such as the idea that the red and blue waldos must remain in the separate halves of the screen.
_	However, she did not prove her innocence, citing that by doing so will further the idea that it was acceptable to ask the questions in the first place.
_	Thorsteinn Gylfason rejects the idea that there is any fatalism in "Njáls saga", arguing that there is no hostile supernatural plan which its characters are subject to.
_	The name "Shaking Pole" originated from the idea that grizzly bears would shake the pole as they climbed it.
_	She said, "My approach has always been the idea that I could make a difference.
_	Prince Maurice contributed to the idea that the Dutch colonization would be better than others, something inconsistent compared to the same look on his retirement from Brazil, where he was accused of prejudice to the Company of the West Indies, and have taken the classic model of exploitation exhaustive - which forced the revolt of Brazilians, among them André Vidal de Negreiros, Shrimp and Felipe Henrique Dias - treated as heroes of the expulsion of the Netherlands.
_	This estimation of potential is based on the idea that because the tumor existed for decades prior to diagnosis, without becoming malignant, it has little or no potential to ever become malignant.
_	Bischoff was initially reluctant to make the offer, as he did not care for Luger personally or professionally, but relented due to both Sting's urging, and the idea that his appearance would make a big splash.
_	Many refugees came with the idea that the new government would not last long, and their stay in the U.S. was temporary.
_	In 1887, against the common opinion of contemporaneous scholars, Gustave Lanson contested the idea that the poem is Stoic.
_	Modern-day surrealist activity is sometimes called "post surrealism" by advocates of the idea that surrealism is "dead".
_	Some current genetic research supports the idea that people living in the British Isles are likely mainly descended from the indigenous European Paleolithic (Old Stone Age hunter gatherers) population (about 80%), with a smaller Neolithic (New Stone Age farmers) input (about 20%).
_	I deplore the idea that ... men in this House ... attempt to use the Jews as their scapegoat.
_	Gintautas Zabiela strongly refuted the idea that Bayernburg stood in Pilaitės as it is too small for a large fortress that could house 200 soldiers and withstand 22 days of attack.
_	Research by Boen "et al." has also confirmed the opposite of BIRGing, cutting off reflected failure (the idea that people tend to disassociate themselves with people of lower status).
_	During a trip to Atlantis, Richard Reed had trouble accepting the idea that the Atlanteans had a connection to Poseidon or their brief encounter with the Watcher, until Susan helped him realise that just because such things could not be understood by their present standards did not mean that humanity could not come to understand them later.
_	Also Humboldtian is the idea that the forces generating language and thought are one and the same.
_	He was expressing the idea that Dirac expressed when he famously wrote: "Each photon then interferes only with itself.
_	After the realization that college sports were becoming involved seriously with gambling and fraud the idea that offering athletes a free education would get rid of that culture.
_	In part, greater adherence to the idea that the wisest and most capable possible successor should be chosen has tempered the eight successions of the Royal House of Chakri during the Rattanakosin (Bangkok) era.
_	By 1939 Hitler had abandoned Nordicist rhetoric in favour of the idea that the German people as a whole were united by distinct "spiritual" qualities.
_	Peter Gelderloos criticizes the idea that nonviolence is the only way to fight for a better world.
_	His museum, he said, was based on the idea that "the Palestinian people paid the price for the Jewish Holocaust in that they became the refugees and remained without a country.
_	This follows the idea that flashbulb memories are a recollection of "event-specific sensory-perceptual details" and are much different from other known autobiographical memories.
_	However, the observational evidence began to support the idea that the universe evolved from a hot dense state.
_	Gottfredson emphasized that rewards may be the most important tool that business leaders have to coordinate and motivate team members with the idea that rewards can be monetary or promotional, but motivation plays a key part in how hard employees will work to receive rewards.
_	The Act was passed in 1986, partly in response to concerns over excavation of military aircraft, partly over public disquiet about the fate of sunken military ships and also because in the aftermath of the Falklands War, public opinion supported the idea that a maritime war grave should be sacrosanct.
_	According to scholar D.Churakov, Merezhkovsky, pronouncing "the death of metaphysics" and putting forward the idea that only language of symbols could be an adequate instrument for discovering the modern world's pattern of meanings, was unwillingly following Auguste Comte, the difference being that the latter was employing these ideas in scientific fields, while the former proposed to use them in literature and criticism.
_	Industry executives seem to bet on the idea that men won’t want to listen to female rappers, so they are given fewer opportunities.
_	She went on to state, "We have no right to expect "Gossip Girl" to be a paragon of morality, or even realism, but the idea that true love requires taking a shard of glass to the face is disturbing even in this alternate, soap-opera dimension."
_	Furthermore, people began to question the validity of the social hierarchy and the idea that the scholar should be above the farmer.
_	Strindberg in this play shows some influenced of his reading of the French translation of the "l’uomo delinquente" (1876) by Cesare Lombroso, an Italian criminologist, who promotes the idea that criminality can be discerned in a person’s external self, as happens in the play, when Mr. X notices that Mr. Y is “terribly narrow between the ears.
_	He emphasised the idea that the design and production of an item should not be divorced from one another, and that where possible those creating items should be designer-craftsmen, thereby both designing and manufacturing their goods.
_	The cooking hypothesis proposes the idea that the ability to cook allowed for the brain size of hominids to increase over time.
_	Pescatarians may consume fish based solely upon the idea that the fish are not factory farmed as land animals are (i.e., their problem is with the capitalist-industrial production of meat, not with the consumption of animal foods themselves).
_	Some philosophers, such as Daniel Dennett and Peter Hacker oppose the idea that there is a hard problem.
_	In the 6th century CE, an archbishop of Bordeaux, ordered that the telling of story of the life of Saint Severinus include the idea that Severinus' arrival was due to the call by angel.
_	Amanda is heartbroken with the idea that Kenny is not a boy, but more a man in a child's body.
_	Building on Bhaskar and Basseches, CDF uses a framework for dialectical thinking based on the idea that everything in reality is transient and composed of contradictions, part of a larger whole, related in some way to everything else, and subject to sudden transformation.
_	One review supported the idea that the cortex was involved in learning actions regardless of their outcome, while the basal ganglia was involved in selecting appropriate actions based on associative reward based trial and error learning.
_	Speaking to author Steve Turner, Bhagwat has dismissed the idea that the sitarist was not Harrison, saying: "I can tell you here and now – 100 percent it was George on sitar throughout."
_	OTW is also not the only organization to support the idea that fan works are transformative.
_	The name of the group supposedly originated from the idea that their music was "broke inside" due to personal problems.
_	During the 19th century, as social norms started to change, the idea that it was desirable for dignified men to respond with violence when they were insulted or ridiculed started to lose traction and was replaced with the view that while those responses may not be ideal, that they were a normal human reaction resulting from a loss of self-control, and, as such, they deserved to be considered as a mitigating circumstance.
_	Moffat and the team Albrecht–Magueijo present the idea that the speed of light had a very large value of about 10 km/s in the early universe, thus their models show distant regions of the expanding universe interacting at the beginning of the universe.
_	Sins Invalid's work is not solely a matter of performance; rather, it is an active fight against the idea that people with disabilities should not exist.
_	Despite the various points of disagreement, there has been a great deal of consensus around the idea that successful conceptual change often requires meta-conceptual awareness and sophistication on the part of the learner.
_	The knot is also known as a "hobble knot" for similar reasons, from the idea that the knot was sometimes used on the legs of horses to limit the distance their riders had to walk in the morning to retrieve them.
_	But he believed that the idea that the election of someone to the Presidency could justify secession "as a direct assault upon the fundamental principles of American liberty".
_	Silas "gets off" on the idea that Lynsey is trying to stop him from killing again and Hassan said "it makes the game a lot more interesting".
_	Other psychological perspectives summarise evidence and find that the role of a father in child development is very similar to that of a mother, which conflicts with the idea that greater paternal involvement in childcare could lead to subtantial and potentially dangerous consequences.
_	Stated simply, it is the idea that if there are a ways of doing something and b ways of doing another thing, then there are a · b ways of performing both actions.
_	In a more radical version of biophysicist Francis Crick's hypothesis of directed panspermia, McKenna speculated on the idea that psilocybin mushrooms may be a species of high intelligence, which may have arrived on this planet as spores migrating through space and which are attempting to establish a symbiotic relationship with human beings.
_	Finocchiaro also describes as mythical the notion that Galileo "saw" the earth's motion, since this direct observation was only possible in the 21st century, and the idea that Galileo was "imprisoned," since he was "actually held under house arrest."
_	This comes from the idea that the universe, the Earth, or the continent of North America are all sometimes understood as being the back of a great turtle, a mysterious natural consciousness.
_	Swindells (1995) developed a method, DETECTIVE, for identification of domains in protein structures based on the idea that domains have a hydrophobic
_	From about the 1870s political Catholicism emerged based on the idea that it was to the Church's advantage to participate in the modern political process, and it became a significant force in Germany, Switzerland, Belgium and Austria.
_	The researcher must know the background of the idea that is being presented and show that he or she is well prepared to deal with a problem or situation their client has.
_	The growth diagnostic approach is based on the idea that there may be many reasons why an economy does not grow, but each reason generates a distinctive set of symptoms.
_	This has become a signal example to those who contest the idea that GDP growth is necessarily desirable.
_	In 1925 Charles Kellaway invited Cameron to work at the Walter and Eliza Hall Institute of Medical Research as the deputy director, where he remained until 1927, when he left to take up a position at University College Hospital (UCH) under Arthur Boycott, with the idea that he would return to take over from Harry Allen.
_	This mechanism also has extensive indirect evidence lending support to the idea that tandem genomic duplication is a prevalent mechanism for intron gain.
_	Central to the four-branch model is the idea that EI requires attunement to social norms.
_	Although he teased the idea that his career may be over, he instead announced he was medically cleared to compete again, and declared he would participate in the Royal Rumble.
_	He studied the Bible and attended church, but the accounts differ as to whether he determined on his own that there was no existing religion built upon the true teachings of Jesus or whether the idea that all churches were false had not "entered his heart" until he experienced the vision.
_	Some of the assumptions Vertov worked against included the idea that movie directors should only include sounds produced in a studio or that cinematic sound could only be of the artificial variety.
_	According to Kenneth Kitchen, this conquest occurred around 1200 BC, but "almost all" scholars have abandoned the idea that Joshua carried out a conquest of Canaan similar to that described in the Book of Joshua.
_	So the idea that you might be able to bring someone back in that way is emotionally grounded in a very universal idea."
_	In the aftermath of the rebellion, the political climate with regard to Ireland became dominated by the idea that the union of the Irish and British kingdoms (which were in personal union under the sovereignty of King George III) was necessary to improve conditions in Ireland.
_	In this book, she challenges the idea that the personality of adults is determined chiefly by the way they were raised by their parents.
_	The Russian school of constitutional economics was created in the early twenty-first century with the idea that constitutional economics allows for a combined economic and constitutional analysis in the legislative (especially budgetary) process, thus helping to overcome arbitrariness in the economic and financial decision-making.
_	Shadow Secretary of State for Defence Nia Griffith said she thought it was unlikely the investigation would go ahead and that "the idea that Jeremy would want to set up an atmosphere in the party where people couldn't go and say things to him is completely absurd".
_	Archaeological evidence supports the idea that Native Americans ate the pigeons frequently prior to colonization.
_	Zara has countered his critics by saying that people can be unsettled by the idea that being happy and being a great artist are mutually exclusive.
_	Ardrey, later remarking on the play in an interview in "The Times," underscored the idea that he wanted to write about the working class characters as they were:
_	However, Carol rejects the idea that Hal is dead as the link between her heart and his which she can sense via her ring is still intact, with her ring's visions informing her that Kyle must unite the powers of all seven Corps in himself to stop this latest threat.
_	It seeks to exploit the idea that natural systems do not have waste in them to inspire sustainable design.
_	The name 'preorder' comes from the idea that preorders (that are not partial orders) are 'almost' (partial) orders, but not quite; they are neither necessarily anti-symmetric nor asymmetric.
_	From an early age, Guzmán rejected the idea that woman were destined for domesticity and was determined to become a teacher.
_	Next to the allusions to Bluebeard, the legend also contains elements (mythemes) of ancient Germanic legend, notably the idea that a nature spirit or faery can use a song to lure people into his realm, most typically his forest, where he causes their death.
_	As Ernest Gellner writes, "the idea that political boundaries must be congruent with ethnic ones, that rulers must not be ethnically distinguishable from the ruled now has a salience and authority which it has never possessed in the previous history of mankind".
_	Central to Jewish belief is the idea that every man—Jew and gentile alike—is born with two opposing inclinations that pull him to act either in a bad way or a good way, but that, in the final analysis, it is man who decides how he is to act.
_	By doing cross-cultural research in Papua New Guinea, on the Fore Tribesmen, at the end of the 1960s, Paul Ekman proposed the idea that facial expressions of emotion are not culturally determined, but universal.
_	Mashallah was an advocate of the idea that the conjunctions of Saturn and Jupiter dictate the timing of important events on Earth.
_	However, the peoples he met (likely the Timucua, Tequesta, and Calusa) were mostly hostile at first contact and knew a few Spanish words, lending credence to the idea that they had already been visited by Spanish raiders.
_	This theory, which dates from 1934, introduces the idea that the photon is equivalent to the fusion of two Dirac neutrinos.
_	Behind the inclusion within a shrine of Buddhist religious objects was the idea that the "kami" were lost beings in need of liberation through the power of Buddhism.
_	Phylogenetic studies did not support the idea that NGMC 91 was a close relative of "S. millenii".
_	By the 1970s, the idea that the game had been created solely by Charles Darrow had become popular folklore; it was printed in the game's instructions for many years, in a 1974 book devoted to "Monopoly", and was cited in a general book about toys even as recently as 2007.
_	It was not just the graphical demands that were restrictive, but also the idea that the game should have 'freedom' and not be restricted to one path.
_	While the idea that externalized memory degrades the innate capacity of humans to remember is prevalent, it is also unsubstantiated.
_	The initial male-only aspect of the pledge was aimed at countering the idea that only women were involved in the peace movement.
_	Samantha Power, U.S. Ambassador to the U.N. said “This film is important … because it shatters the idea that there isn’t anything that one can do, that the problem is too big.”
_	Another response is denial of the idea that qualia and related phenomenal notions of the mind are in the first place coherent concepts.
_	This vaccine is based on the idea that cancerous cells appear and propagate because the body does not detect them.
_	The philosophy that drives the organization is the idea that working cooperatively with other governments, communities and individuals is required to achieve sustainable and fruitful management (Uu-a-thluk, 2008a).
_	Blaetz points out that this sends the message that "women and war do not mix", alluding to the idea that in World War I women should stay behind the front lines, but still be supportive of those at war.
_	She says that Drange's argument hinges on the idea that belief in God's existence is, according to Christians, necessary for salvation.
_	Evidence from several studies supports the idea that the Pulvinar nuclei and superior colliculus receive descending projections from CT fibers while TC fibers extending from the LGN carry visual information to the various areas of the visual cortex near the calcarine fissure.
_	Some Jewish, Christian and Muslim Medieval philosophers, including Moses Maimonides and Pseudo-Dionysius, as well as many sages of other religions, developed what is termed as apophatic theology or the "Via Negativa", the idea that one cannot posit attributes to God and can only discuss what God is not.
_	Jewish traditions teach that this is the bone from which the body will be rebuilt at the time of resurrection, and share the idea that this bone does not decay.
_	In fact, the real interest rate sent a signal for 100% of the banking crises, which supports the idea that financial liberalization may cause banking crises, since financial deregulation is associated with high interest rates.
_	Like her husband in his speeches Mrs. Pryor promoted the idea that the war had nothing to do with slavery.
_	Drawn to the idea that he could produce his own animated-type story but in the comics medium, and convinced by Frank Miller's "The Dark Knight Returns" and Art Spiegelman's "Maus" that a serious comic book with a beginning, middle and end structure was both artistically and commercially viable, Smith decided to produce "Bone".
_	Originally, Brosia, a former ventriloquist, supplied Polgas's voice, but Medina was so dissatisfied with the idea that he abandoned it completely.
_	It is uncertain why, but some propose the idea that the illustrations were simply not as popular as they once were, or that they were too labour-intensive to keep producing continually.
_	There’s also the idea that Inglis could have possibly found patronage at Prince Henry’s court.
_	Also, Inglis rarely approached other patrons during this time period, thus providing further evidence to the idea that she had found some type of patronage in Henry’s household, and therefore no longer needed to produce such works, or even display her artistic skills for advertisement.
_	Daisuke is a single, nineteen-year-old Japanese college senior living in the fictional city of Meiai, forced out by his parents at the idea that independence may attract him a partner.
_	In the application of dynamic programming to mathematical optimization, Richard Bellman's Principle of Optimality is based on the idea that in order to solve a dynamic optimization problem from some starting period "t" to some ending period "T", one implicitly has to solve subproblems starting from later dates "s", where "t
_	The subjective theory of value is a theory of value which advances the idea that the value of a good is not determined by any inherent property of the good, nor by the amount of labor necessary to produce the good, but instead value is determined by the importance an acting individual places on a good for the achievement of his desired ends.
_	In addition to the idea that alcohol was an unsuitable therapeutic tool, Kellogg also considered it to lead to mental and moral bankruptcy.
_	The railroad responded with the idea that a grade crossing removal could occur "someday," it was considered a project for the near future.
_	Etienne Botes and Douglas Siepman developed the idea that movements and flows within financial markets are similar to the vortex motions found in water.
_	Adams has also challenged the idea that the arch was on the line of the Themistocleian wall, and this position has now been generally accepted.
_	In 1978 Sussman and Raven advanced the idea that nonflying mammals, such as primates and marsupials, could have been significant pollinators but were outcompeted by nectar-feeding birds and bats.
_	Avelluto pointed out that "“the notion of the existence of a 'national thought' is very typical of the 20th century: the idea that there is a thought of ours that is in confrontation with another way of thinking.
_	He comes up with the idea that he and the zealots would kidnap Jesus and force His hand to support them.
_	BCE) is reported in some ancient sources to have been a philosopher who was the earliest Greek to develop the theory of atomism—the idea that everything is composed entirely of various imperishable, indivisible elements called atoms.
_	Toho wanted to create a baby Godzilla to appeal to the "date crowd" (a genre of films that were very popular among young couples during this time period), with the idea that girls would like a "cute" baby monster.
_	I just love the idea that they did all that live, and you can feel the spontaneity in the pictures still today.
_	In 1965 Palmer published an article by Delmar H. Bryant that debunked the idea that the earth was hollow, but the following year again suggested that the earth might be donut shaped.
_	Scholars state "many couples are locked into the idea that orgasms should be achieved only through intercourse [vaginal sex]" and that "[e]ven the word "foreplay" suggests that any other form of sexual stimulation is merely preparation for the 'main event.'...
_	Popović, the band's frontman, was initially opposed to the idea that Fahreta should be the band's new singer, but later changed his opinion.
_	The basic philosophy behind this is the idea that people ought to save money in order to allocate it to more charitable purposes, such as helping others in need.
_	Targeting the working class became a priority for the party with the idea that the revulsion against Labour's egalitarianism goals and redistributive policies would emerge from this group.
_	Otto von Guericke originated the idea that clouds were composed of water bubbles.
_	Lutheran Confessions reject the idea that the Epistle of James contradicts the Lutheran teaching on Justification.
_	Eventually the practice of masturbating women and the idea that women with the ragadiae would have sex with other women disappeared over time, further masking lesbian activities in medieval Europe.
_	Welwod is primarily known for his writings opposing Dutch jurist Hugo Grotius' concept of "Mare Liberum" (the freedom of the seas), the idea that the seas and oceans were free for all to use and not the property of anyone.
_	After being taken ill herself, she was sent to recuperate in Glastonbury, Somerset, where she became interested in Glastonbury Abbey and the folklore surrounding it which connected it to the legendary figure of King Arthur and to the idea that the Holy Grail had been brought there by Joseph of Aramathea.
_	The committee reported "discrepancies related to the matters such as dates, names and places of residence" in Caner's public statements, although they found no evidence to contradict the idea that he was a Muslim who converted to Christianity as a teenager.
_	However, "almost all" scholars have abandoned the idea that Joshua carried out a conquest of Canaan similar to that described in the Book of Joshua.
_	When Lacoste died, French Advertising agency Publicis, who had been managing his company's account for decades, published a print ad with the Lacoste logo and the English words ""See you later..."", reinforcing the idea that the animal was perhaps an alligator.
_	In 2001 the compensation hypothesis was eventually refuted by the African-American creolist John McWhorter who pointed out the absurdity of the idea that, as languages change, each would have to include a mechanism that calibrates it according to the complexity of all the other 6,000 or so languages around the world; but linguistics has no knowledge of any such a mechanism.
_	Here there is the idea that God's heritage (the created world) is largely under the dominion of evil – i.e., it is "shared with Azazel" (Abr. 20:5), again identifying him with Satan, who was called "the prince of this world" by Jesus.
_	Ennaji also concluded "This survey confirms the idea that multilingualism in Morocco is a vivid sociolinguistic phenomenon, which is favoured by many people."
_	Aging populations, as seen in Seaver and Ballard-Reisch's works, can be silenced by stereotypes, such as the idea that the elderly are resistant to change.
_	Challenging pervasive social norms and stigmas, it frames autism, ADHD/ADD, dyslexia, and other neurotypes as a natural human variation rather than a pathology or disorder, and rejects the idea that neurological differences need to be (or can be) cured, as they believe them to be authentic forms of human diversity, self-expression, and being.
_	Melton has written that, "The brotherhood has distanced itself from the racism that has infected Norse beliefs in the twentieth century and eschews the idea that there are either chosen peoples or master races".
_	The group was composed of both intellectuals and workers and agreed with the idea that the main enemies of society were the bureaucracies which governed modern capitalism.
_	Given these objections to "creole" as a concept, DeGraff and others question the idea that creoles are exceptional in any meaningful way.
_	In the 1980s, the Yoshiko Ootsuki posited the idea that they are "plasma from the air."
_	There was further tension with the ITV executives as they were sceptical of the idea that viewers would want a full 30 minutes of news every Monday to Friday and they were also losing valuable peak time slots which could be used for the sale of commercial advertising.
_	There is considerable controversy surrounding the term salsa and the idea that it is its own distinct genre.
_	The difference between the actual layout and the graph schematic is a good example of the idea that topology is not concerned with the rigid shape of objects.
_	To the idea that the self is structured via mirror-like reflection she adds that of primal apperception of the other, through "fascinance" (aesthetic openness to the other and the cosmos), compassion and awe (affective accesses to the other) directed from the beginning to the (m)Other and the outside, not to the self.
_	The Ascian language further expounds on the idea that word choice alters the thinking of people, as the Ascian language is simply a set of quotations from government propaganda called "Correct Thought".
_	Fatalism is the idea that everything is fated to happen, so that humans have no control over their future.
_	Cochran and Harpending put forward the idea that the development of agriculture has caused an enormous increase in the rate of human evolution, including numerous evolutionary adaptations to the different challenges and lifestyles that resulted.
_	He seems to have introduced the idea that in cases like that at issue two events can be "co-fated", so that one cannot occur without the other.
_	In fact, it is established that Trigger simply cannot grasp the idea that "Dave" is actually called Rodney.
_	The design is based on the idea that Nathan Phillips Square has always acted as an agora, the ancient Athenian place of public and political exchange, with the design defining the concept of the open space of theatre and that of the public squarea theatre for the city, and a square surrounded by a forested perimeter.
_	In addition, the committee, objecting to the idea that the new airport would serve merely as a reliever for the new Bacolod airport, successfully lobbied for an international airport to be built in lieu of a domestic one.
_	The presence of "Gryposuchus" in the Urumaco Formation of Venezuela, which does include marine strata, lends credence to the idea that gryposuchines may have been living in coastal environments.
_	This has resulted in a series of studies that are skeptical towards the idea that prison can rehabilitate offenders.
_	Kenyon remarks, "At Coventry, the townspeople were possessed by the idea that the papists were about to rise and cut their throats ...
_	Vélez consciously chose to promote her "Whoopee Lupe" persona but dismissed the idea that she was wild.
_	Flashbacks from "Saw II" show that, after surviving a suicide attempt where he drove his car off a cliff, John was "reborn", and nurtured the idea that the only way for someone to change is for them to change themselves.
_	His model is built upon the idea that learning preferences can be described using two continuums:
_	However, this has not meant a general commitment to the idea that in its absence there is no Church .
_	In particular, he has argued that semantic externalism provides the correct semantics not only for natural kinds but also for artifactual kinds — a claim that, if true, would lend plausibility to the idea that empirical investigation provides a promising philosophical method, quite independently of whether or not a majority of the objects of philosophical inquiry turn out to be natural kinds.
_	The story gives the protagonist of the first game a name, Siris, introduces the idea that the God King was one of multiple Deathless in the world, as is Siris, and has Siris and the assassin Isa journey to find the Worker of Secrets in order to kill the resurrected God King and the other Deathless.
_	In the 1890s, List initially devised the idea that ancient German society had been led by a hierarchical system of initiates, the "Armanenschaft", an idea which had developed into a key part of his thinking by 1908.
_	This specimen was described by Zheng and colleagues in 2009, who noted definite similarities between the filaments of "Tianyulong" and coelurosaurian theropods, supporting the idea that all such structures were homologous with modern feathers, and pushing the origin of feathers back to the origin of dinosaurs or earlier.
_	These latter reflect the idea that the marginal social benefit should equal the marginal social cost, that is that production should be increased "only" as long as the marginal social benefit exceeds the marginal social cost.
_	As such, he repeatedly spoke of the need to increase the country’s defense capabilities, refuting the idea that the fortifications then under construction were useless.
_	Finn dismisses the idea that the bear tracks could have been faked.
_	She argues for the concept of evolving revelation, that is, that people learn more as history evolves and societies develop and mature, and argues against the concept of Yeridat ha-dorot, the idea that knowledge of Torah diminishes with time.
_	An assumption relying on the analysis of historic sources is based on the idea that the milestones of his creative work are marked by the completion of the choir screen in Mainz in 1239, the west choir in Naumburg in 1249/50 and the work of the building workshop in Meissen from 1250 up until prior to 1268.
_	Miller has stated that the idea that his work could have inspired the mass shooting was "ridiculous", and "I expect he’s been on my website...
_	Hairshirt environmentalism (or hairshirt-green) refers to the idea that the environmental problems we face can be addressed by limiting our consumption of resources.
_	It was Michell who, in a paper for the "Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society of London", read on 27 November 1783, first proposed the idea that there were such things as black holes, which he called "dark stars".
_	This poetic language connects Smart to Orpheus and David, but also relates him to Adam's "onomathetic" tradition, or the idea that names hold significant weight in the universe and that Adam was able to join in with creation by naming objects.
_	"pBerlin 3023" contains another reference which strengthens the idea that many ancient Egyptian novels were influenced by "Westcar Papyrus": column 232 contains the phrase "sleeping until dawn", which appears nearly word-by-word in the "Westcar Papyrus."
_	For him, cultures were not finished constructs, but always changing and he stressed the idea that cultures could interact.
_	American Indian creationism suggests the idea that humans were not created by means of evolution.
_	Related to this is the idea that the Honored category was not a social class but rather an honorific title given to commoner men and was not hereditary.
_	Its founding came at the tail-end of the anti-Masonic hysteria that had recently swept the United States, though the idea that it was part of the popular backlash to Freemasonry has generally been rejected (a mysterious fire in 1841 destroyed the records of the first meeting of the Social Fraternity, erasing much of the organization's early history).
_	Olson and Meisel also take issue with the idea that Leonardo painted the "Mona Lisa" as a self-portrait, and that this idea is based on the fact that points of congruency are found between Leonardo's face and the Mona Lisa's.
_	Xu Xing and Zhang Fucheng, who interpreted the Daohugou fossil beds where "Pedopenna" was found as mid to late Jurassic in age, used the presence of such a primitive member of the avian lineage, in combination with many primitive members of closely related lineages there, to support the idea that birds originated in Asia.
_	Similar in technique to Rejlander, Uelsmann is a champion of the idea that the final image need not be tied to a single negative, and may be composed of many.
_	Pointedly historian S. N. Bychkov holds that the idea that the base angles of an isosceles triangle are equal likely came from Egypt.
_	After the two initial murders, he tricked Namatame into kidnapping people under the idea that he was keeping them from danger, which is reinforced as every person Namatame "rescues" is then saved by the protagonist's group.
_	In October 2011, Gay Byrne said the idea that he and Pat were competing in some sort of rivalry was "bloody rubbish".
_	Veitch responded to this criticism with the assertion that "it is not a sin to be attractive or dress cute," and that the photographs were intended to persuade women in the sex industry to dismiss the idea that Christianity is about "being locked up in a house with a Bible."
_	He put forward the idea that any brilliant attack would have failed against correct defence.
_	Facial retraining therapy builds upon the idea that neurons are constantly in a dynamic state.
_	He expanded it with theories on honest signalling and the idea that selection would favour signals that impose a higher cost, those that are not easily cheated on.
_	Phillips Jr. William D. in "The History of Slavery in Iberia", challenged the idea that race was not the key to determine who was enslaved, but instead religion.
_	Despite the French state agreeing to this, MRAP and local member Jacques Declosmenil attempted to obstruct the scientific study, saying that the scientific results "will build on the idea that there are real Normans and fake Normans."
_	Other explanations have been suggested, such as the idea that moths may be impaired with a visual distortion called a Mach band by Henry Hsiao in 1972.
_	His theory used the diffusionist concept that there were a few "cradles of civilization" which grew outwards, and merged it with the idea that societies would adapt to their circumstances, which is called historical particularism.
_	Whorf never stated the principle in the form of a hypothesis, and the idea that linguistic categories influence perception and cognition was shared by many other scholars before him.
_	These analysis shed light on the ever-changing role of compensation in American society and delved into the idea that American Revolutionary War soldiers received superior care after war than later Civil War veterans.
_	The song has elevated the South African house genre to some extent, and was released with the idea that music can influence a large demography of people across the African continent.
_	The zoo accepts this family and celebrates their love, promoting the idea that the world ought to accept and celebrate families that look different.
_	Academics argue over the actual impact of the bill, but general consensus is that it made the idea that the House of Commons should be consulted on all matters of general interest.
_	Most arguments center on the idea that typedefs simply hide the actual data type of a variable.
_	Although several books portray Holton's husband as an old man who quickly vanished along with his wife, Dr. Holton was actually a fellow Michigan alumnus, only a few years older than Holmes, and both Holtons remained in Englewood throughout Holmes' life and survived well into the 20th century; the idea that Holmes killed them is strictly fiction.
_	The book traces the development of what Frank decries as "market populism": "the idea that markets are a far more democratic form of organization than democratically elected governments."
_	By "constitution" he referred to the idea that all governments have a constitution, written or not, and that the constitution of Great Britain could be interpreted as banning the levying of taxes without representation.
_	In some cases the colonial effort was supported by the idea that indigenous cultures were descended from the Biblical House of Israel.
_	This is probably because the term “nanotechnology” gained serious attention just before that time, following its use by K. Eric Drexler in his 1986 book, "Engines of Creation: The Coming Era of Nanotechnology", which took the Feynman concept of a billion tiny factories and added the idea that they could make more copies of themselves via computer control instead of control by a human operator; and in a cover article headlined "Nanotechnology", published later that year in a mass-circulation science-oriented magazine, "OMNI".
_	Some, however, would in later years come to reject the idea that the revolution had a proletarian or socialist nature, arguing that it had simply carried out the tasks of the bourgeois revolution by creating a state capitalist system.
_	The UN Pinheiro Principles are guided by the idea that people not only have the right to return home, but also the right to the same property.
_	In his acceptance speech for the Cecil B. DeMille Award, George Clooney wore a "Je suis Charlie" pin on his lapel and said, "Millions of people – not just in Paris but around the world, Christians and Jews and Muslims, leaders of countries all over the world – they didn't march in protest, they marched in support of the idea that we will not walk in fear.
_	Other studies offer evidence to strengthen the idea that EcM communities are indeed affected by soil environment both in the field and in the lab.
_	In the same manner that a sailboat is designed to take advantage of the wind and waves, Nati espouses the idea that a building should adhere to the same concept, by optimizing the natural elements to create an efficient and high performing building design.
_	The New Age movement is centered on the idea that a new epoch of human history is approaching and as a result teaches that humans must strive to achieve spiritual balance and wellness.
_	This belief is based on the idea that because cats are often the top predators in the ecosystems they inhabit, understanding and solving the problems they face can inform and guide the conservation and preservation of wild animals and wild habitats of all kinds.
_	The chemical composition of Segue 1 indicates no substantial chemical evolution has occurred since the galaxy formed, supporting the idea that it may be a surviving first galaxy that experienced only one burst of star formation, a fossil galaxy from the early universe.
_	The latter film even features a mixed-race relationship, advocating the idea that Hong Kong identity should be based on civic, not ethnic, factors."
_	As Ambassador, Gqiba worked to dispel the idea that South Africa was "anti-Israel," but stated that much of the responsibility of strengthening relationships between the two countries belonged to Israel.
_	Shapp is "credited with promoting the idea that eventually led to the creation of the Peace Corps."
_	After opening yet other schools with enrollment surpassing a thousand children, a crisis unfolded in the early 1830s when Andrews publicly advocated the idea that American blacks should be colonized in Africa, one of the period's most controversial racial issues.
_	The philosophical significance of such a method for Wittgenstein was that it alleviated a confusion, namely the idea that logical inferences are justified by rules.
_	"Lay trauma" refers to the idea that certain events are inherently traumatic to the individuals who experience them—for example, the idea of trauma in psychology.
_	He was a Democrat in the tradition of Thomas Jefferson and Andrew Jackson, but he disdained the party's pro-slavery platform while also rejecting Whig Party notions of opposing slavery based on "higher law"—the idea that individual belief of right and wrong permitted an individual to violate objectionable statutes and ordinances.
_	I liked the idea that the riff didn’t start on the down beat, like 99% of riffs do.
_	Women's clubs "established the idea that women had a moral duty and responsibility to transform, define and shape public policy".
_	It’s always bizarre when you found that adjective "Well-trained" with "stray", which would go with the protagonist Ahmad, whose earning his bread writing erotic stories online, living in a chaotic Cairo, but critic Hasan Maarouf went to the idea that it represents "A whole generation" along with the novel’s characters.
_	Susskind is widely regarded as one of the fathers of string theory, having, with Yoichiro Nambu and Holger Bech Nielsen, independently introduced the idea that particles could in fact be states of excitation of a relativistic string.
_	The system is predicated on the idea that the students bring as much value to the class as the professors.
_	Much of the humor in the book consists of riffs on the idea that Ginny is the hothead, while Robert is the easygoing one.
_	Another possible theory as to the birth of Greek phalanx warfare stems from the idea that some of the basic aspects of the phalanx were present in earlier times yet were not fully developed due to the lack of appropriate technology.
_	He also fires Åke, who gets the idea that he should pretend to murder a friend to gain real knowledge about life inside the walls of a prison.
_	Though this revelation occurred when Roger Stern was writing the series, Stern says that earlier "Incredible Hulk" writer Len Wein came up with the idea that they were related and simply didn't get around to it during his run.
_	The first two had to suddenly leave the country; namely Dr.Naigzy Ghebremedhin, the brain behind the project, left the project after the Government accused him with taking all the credit for the work, contrary to the idea that all the concepts in the project are his and his alone.
_	John P. Newport, in his study of the impact of New Age beliefs, described the central focus of the "Seth Material" as the idea that each individual creates his or her own reality, a foundational concept of the New Age movement first articulated in the "Seth Material".
_	Criticisms were expressed in the press and in the birth of the invasion novel (e.g. "The Battle of Dorking"), many of which focused on the idea that Britain might be Germany's next victim.
_	Their findings supported the idea that separating elective surgical care from emergency services could improve the quality of care.
_	He selected the pieces on the basis of "visual indifference," and the selections reflect his sense of irony, humor and ambiguity: "...it was always the idea that came first, not the visual example," he said; "...a form of denying the possibility of defining art."
_	"For album number two Bailey should embrace the idea that wearing your influences on your sleeve only works for so long before it’s called a rip-off." musicOMH wrote that the album had "everything expected of a dance record," but also wrote that it didn't bring anything new to dance music.
_	MacShane wrote that the authors' made false claims in the report against the Confederation of British Industry (CBI) and he dismisses the idea that the British media "have been suborned into aiding and abetting a pro-Europe line" because the press is dominated by a right-wing euro-sceptic agenda.
_	MetaFilter's name derives from the idea that weblogs "filter" the ""best of the web"", and MetaFilter posts would be the best of the best.
_	Hooper also discusses the idea that since the international sphere is largely composed of men, it may greatly shape both "the production and maintenance of masculinities."
_	It is exactly for this reason that a disbelieving Christianity came up with the idea that sin is sin, that it is neither here nor there whether it is before God.
_	Some later philosophers attributed the idea that man created gods and that gods did not create man to Democritus.
_	She liked to tend to the grapevines for making wine and loved the idea that the grapes would go towards the sacramental wine used as part of the Eucharistic rite as the Blood of Christ.
_	In 2005, Asher became an activist in deep ecology, an eco-philosophy based on the idea that all life is of intrinsic value, irrespective of its value to human beings, and that humans have no right to interfere with nature except for essential needs.
_	His sexual intention was therefore "secret", rather than "subconscious", and any 'parapraxis' would inhere in the idea that he "unconsciously wished to express that intention", rather than in the sexual connotation of the substitution.
_	Zaïre's brother and father are now horrified at the idea that she will marry a Muslim and adopt his religion.
_	Some scholars do not consider the Agnostina true trilobites, and consequently rejected the idea that they were related to the Eodiscina.
_	The method uses Engel’s law, the idea that households spend an increasing share of an income increase on non-food items and consequently less of the income increase on food.
_	This test resulted in the idea that an automobile shape should be like a blimp in front and taper off to a smaller section in the rear.
_	In 2010, Kim criticized the idea that he is a "failed genius" and additionally said, "Some think people with a high IQ can be omnipotent, but that's not true.
_	Anthropology has become increasingly influential, and led to the idea that one can understand firms as communities, by introducing concepts such as organizational culture, organizational rituals, and symbolic acts.
_	This data supports the idea that PPARGC1A expression is reduced in animal models of diabetes and human diabetes and is associated with impaired insulin secretion.
_	According to a 1969 thesis by Theodore Chen, an important concept in thought reform is that of the "New Socialist Man," based on the idea that communist revolution is predicated on "new men with new minds, new ideas, new emotions, and new attitudes."
_	In everyday life in Thailand, there is a strong emphasis on the concept of sanuk; the idea that life should be fun.
_	It's about love and loss, but also the idea that these feelings don't stop just because a relationship does".
_	"The Crocodile’s Dilemma" teases viewers with the idea that the series might be a remix of the movie before heading off on its own path by the end.
_	The Mandate of Heaven was the idea that the Emperor was favored by Heaven to rule over China.
_	Alec Nisbett in his book "Sound Studios" advances the idea that the acoustic properties of large houses during the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries defined the balance of sounds in the performance of orchestral and chamber music.
_	Contemporary scientists thought that Rayleigh scattering was sufficient to explain the blue sky, and so the idea that ozone could play a role was eventually forgotten.
_	The puzzle aspect of the movie will be challenging to some, but I wanted to echo Rod Serling and trust in the idea that it's okay for the audience to not have all the answers – to be comfortable with the unknown.
_	He is distressed at the idea that the woman he is dating while stationed in Cardiff is in love with him, unhappy to lead her on.
_	He also promoted the idea that the upper echelons of the CPY should be sharing the dangers of underground resistance within the country.
_	Another view corroborates the idea that military conscription spurred development of a broader role for citizens.
_	Pascoe noted that these jokes were always directed towards male students, which she believes heightens the taboo of female sexuality and reinforces the idea that boys are hypersexual.
_	The claim that Eskimo languages (specifically, Yupik and Inuit) have an unusually large number of words for "snow", first loosely attributed to the work of anthropologist Franz Boas, has become a cliché often used to support the controversial linguistic-relativity hypothesis: the idea that a language's structure (sound, grammar, vocabulary, etc.) shapes its speakers' view of the world.
_	Meanwhile, Paul capitalizes on his access to Hamlin's memories by harassing Hamlin in turn, dredging up the details of the numerous rapes he committed and ridiculing the idea that Hamlin's artistic talent redeems his past brutality.
_	The League of Nations was founded with the idea that nations could resolve their differences peacefully, but these hopes were unfounded.
_	Reasons include the idea that ambitious research needs significant resources devoted for its execution and the reduction of administrative and overhead costs on the funding body side.
_	They embraced the idea that what they saw as anthropomorphism—the attribution of human qualities to nonhumans—was unscientific.
_	To solidify the idea that O'Neill was in some ways creating a biographical context, I would like to draw attention to the closing that O'Neill used in a letter to one of his doctors from a sanatorium.
_	The "Annals of the Four Masters" state that Paulet struck O'Doherty; there is more support for the idea that Paulet provoked O'Doherty into rebellion by insults.
_	Jeffers did not accept the idea that meter is a fundamental part of poetry, and, like Marianne Moore, claimed his verse was not composed in meter, but "rolling stresses."
_	This has also lent support to the idea that whales evolved from water-loving creatures that looked like small deer.
_	These gigantic insects and their surroundings are meticulously rendered, giving plausibility to the idea that they may, in fact, exist in some undiscovered landscape.
_	Aware of the tremendous need to protect native habitat and its residents, this project contributes to the idea that sentient beings are not meant for spectacle or display.
_	The group chose the name Second Nature based on the idea that performing spontaneous theatre should become "second nature" to the cast.
_	Gurl deemed it "gross" and unnecessary, adding "They could have portrayed the issues between settlers and Native Americans without throwing in a catchy song that perpetuates the idea that Native American people aren't human".
_	Menuck professed that he was confused with the idea that songs or album titles should only be a few words in length and be perfectly clear.
_	Virtual representation refers to the idea that the members of Parliament, including the Lords and the Crown-in-Parliament, reserved the right to speak for the interests of all British subjects, rather than for the interests of only the district that elected them or for the regions in which they held peerages and spiritual sway.
_	Wrapped up in the prime considerations of economics and adaptability was an intense dedication to the idea that this should be purely an Australian car.
_	Catholic scholars make various arguments in support of the idea that this policy is not in contradiction with the previous edicts.
_	Narey rejected the idea that such gangs were specifically targeting white girls, but suggested vulnerable girls on the street were more likely to be white since Asian girls were subjected to strict parenting and were more likely to be kept off the streets.
_	For example, the idea that any subject can be taught to young children in some intellectually honest form, due to the great adaptability and learning potential of the young brain.
_	Alternatively, the idea that critical periods exist for learning certain skills or knowledge sets appeals to the fact that in animal studies, if the developing brain is deprived of certain sensory inputs, the brain areas responsible for processing those inputs fail to develop fully later in development, and thus "if you miss the window, you are playing with a handicap".
_	The second contribution Corbin made to the field was the idea that archetypes are accessible to imagination and first present themselves as images, so the procedure of archetypal psychology must be rhetorical and poetic, without logical reasoning, and the goal in therapy should be to restore the patient's imaginable realities.
_	Instead of being made completely by gods, there was increasing room for the idea that people themselves "made their own society"—and not only that, as Giambattista Vico argued, "because" people made their own society, they could also fully comprehend it.
_	The fact that the plot touches on themes such as drug trafficking aroused the idea that the telenovela was unapologetic to these theme, causing the show to receive a flurry of criticism, mainly by evangelists and conservatives.
_	For Piaget, the term autonomous can be used to explain the idea that rules are self-chosen.
_	The Nineteenth Century Club adopted the idea that the community was an extended "household" that would benefit from the "gentler spirit" and "uplifting influence" of women, and shifted towards civic reform.
_	This is consistent with the idea that high commitment work systems “typically involve practices that enhance communication across organizational levels.”
_	However today, virtually all Orthodox (both Modern and Ultra) authorities contest the idea that a woman is permitted to write a Sefer Torah.
_	As poor coverage made President Hoover appear detached and out of touch amidst a worsening depression, Richey and Akerson disagreed about the most effective press strategy, with Akerson promoting the idea that Hoover should leverage the increasingly influential platform of radio, and Richey arguing that the radio strategy was not worthy of the presidency.
_	It, discusses the idea that social competence is as important to learning as the curriculum.
_	Sakata's approach was reworked in the 1960s into the quark model by Murray Gell-Mann and George Zweig by making the charges of the hypothetical constituents fractional and rejecting the idea that they were observed particles.
_	On the idea that it would be more desirable to allow nuisance claims from someone without an interest in land, Lord Goff said the following.
_	In a separate development, and building on the notion of primary and secondary categories introduced by the Scholastics, Kant introduced the idea that secondary or "derivative" categories could be derived from the primary categories through the combination of one primary category with another.
_	The government accepted the idea that some kind of a deal with the opposition would be necessary, and repeatedly attempted to find common ground throughout the 1980s.
_	Even so, Ford believed that archaeological types could, in some measure, reflect cultural norms, but the idea that they were mostly subjective units created through trial and error and convenient testing dominated his understanding.
_	Although both Oneness and traditional Christianity teach that God is a "singular" Spirit, Oneness adherents reject the idea that God is a Trinity of persons.
_	Nonetheless, once the argument was put forward, it took on a life of its own, and people continue to advance arguments in favor of the idea that Sprenger's involvement was a falsification perpetrated by Institoris, despite the fact that this argument was vitiated from the start.
_	Michael, still indignant over the idea that his office views Gabe as his boss, is initially irritated by her efforts, but eventually realizes that Erin views him as a father figure.
_	Because the Reformation promoted the idea that Christians could expound their own views of theology based on the notion of "sola scriptura," the Bible alone, many theological distinctions have occurred between the various Protestant denominations.
_	Some music critics chafed at the idea that the song was recorded by a French-Canadian band, despite the song's opening and closing line referencing both the United States and Soviet Union.
_	Feminism emerged and started to challenge the idea that a woman's appropriate place was confined to that of the domestic and private sphere.
_	John Gay’s "The Beggar's Opera" alludes to the idea that women awaiting trial or temporarily reprieved from hanging by virtue of an inaccurate diagnosis of pregnancy would sometimes attempt to conceive by their jailers in hopes of pardon.
_	One of the major themes is the existence of opposing forces and the idea that both are necessary.
_	She asserted that the target of the move against Palatucci was the papacy of Pope Pius XII, and wrote that "in targeting Palatucci the desire was essentially to hit a Catholic involved in rescuing Jews in support of the idea that the Church spared no effort to help the Jews — a person whose cause of beatification was under way.
_	His research focuses on the idea that instead of women having penis envy, men have breast and/or womb envy.
_	Sydney Brenner proposed the concept of a codon, the idea that three nucleotides could code for one amino acid.
_	Although the album was recorded with the idea that it sounded contemporary, the album's sound was said to emulate new wave music from the early 1980s, including from Pete Shelley's solo career, and was also categorised as sounding like the art punk band Magazine, formed in the late 1970s by former Buzzcocks member Howard Devoto.
_	Clarkson bought a Porsche 944 Turbo, with the idea that the patient could be stowed under the all-glass hatchback; Hammond points out that the patient would bake in the tight, glass-enclosed space.
_	This questionnaire was developed based on the idea that individuals who score high on negative affectivity are dysphoric and have a negative view of self.
_	On January 29, 2009, WDRQ's HD2 channel changed to "Doug's Wedding Reception", a variety hits format with an emphasis on party music (the name coming from the idea that one would listen to this music at a wedding reception).
_	Critics also argue that post-development perpetuates cultural relativism: the idea that cultural beliefs and practices can be judged only by those who practice them.
_	"Democratic precepts revolving around the idea that a work of art is a commodity impelled the aesthetic innovation which germinated in the mid-1960s and was reaped throughout the 1970s.
_	According to Badham, Broderick and Sheedy were "stiff as boards" when they came onto the sound stage, having both Brest's dark vision and the idea that they would soon be fired.
_	Some researchers, such as Tim Flannery, have put forward the idea that human settlement was responsible for the large climatic and environmental changes that occurred in Australia.
_	"We want to help patients be more independent, decrease their feelings of helplessness, and get away from the idea that someone else has the secrets about their well-being and who they are.
_	At the end of the second millennium BC, when the Mycenaean palaces collapsed, it seems that Greek thought was gradually released from the idea that each man was a servant to the gods, and sought a "moral purpose".
_	She went on to state, "We have no right to expect "Gossip Girl" to be a paragon of morality, or even realism, but the idea that true love requires taking a shard of glass to the face is disturbing even in this alternate, soap-opera dimension."
_	Descartes, for example, appeals to the idea that everyone can at least think and therefore exists.
_	The function formula_6 is a probability weighting function and captures the idea that people tend to overreact to small probability events, but underreact to large probabilities.
_	This coupling expresses the idea that the evolution of humans and environmental systems may no longer be treated as individual isolated systems, compared to earlier times in human history when human-environmental interactions were weak and one-way (linear).
_	The g-VPR model includes the idea that left brain in related to verbal and logical process, and the right brain is related to non-verbal, spatial process (e.g., Gray, 1999; Hugdahl, 2000; Toga & Thompson, 2003)
_	He believed so strongly in the idea that he once declared martial law on New Year's Eve 1913 in order to shut down liquor-selling establishments in the town of Copperfield, Oregon.
_	"The A.V. Club" wrote, "Aniston plays Jules' therapist, and the part is more or less a twist on the old, 'The psychiatrist is crazier than the patient!' gimmick, though the show has a lot of fun with the idea that the therapist is obviously batshit [...]
_	Among the leading "wukkal" was historian Abu Khattar al-Aynturini, who promoted the idea that the Shihabi emirate was a conduit for Maronite solidarity.
_	We liked the idea that it would be of natural crystal and after a survey of people around us, we chose this for its energetic component, for transparency, for ease of transport ...
_	The mentality of some education systems in America have the idea that if they don’t teach safe sex, adolescents will refrain from sex.
_	Described by Discovery as a "commercial free hour of "MythBusters" mashups, hosted by Kari Byron", the show features about ten minutes of new material—experiments and quizzes presented by Kari, as well as TV celebrity and scientist appearances, pitching the idea that "science is cool"—interwoven in fifty minutes of material from "MythBusters" episodes.
_	After the conclusion of the Second World War, the idea that a peaceful transition to socialism was possible gained ground in the international communist movement.
_	However, he did not see the sending of the goat as honouring Azazel as a deity, but as a symbolic expression of the idea that the people's sins and their evil consequences were to be sent back to the spirit of desolation and ruin, the source of all impurity.
_	The allegations were dismissed by Putin who said the idea that Russia was favouring Donald Trump was a myth created by the Hillary Clinton campaign.
_	The name then invokes the idea that a dream of his is now accomplished – not, of course, traveling to Tuva, but rather that the world may now be able to appreciate physics the way he did.
_	Transnational citizenship is based on the idea that a new global framework consistent of subgroups of national identities will eventually replace membership to one sole nation-state.
_	General Strecker continued to resist based on the idea that tying down the Soviet armies at Stalingrad as long as possible would help the German situation elsewhere in the Soviet Union.
_	Supporting the idea that demons had feelings of love and hate, and were voluptuous, there are several stories about their jealousy.
_	The rings express the idea that after death our physical bodies will go back to their original, elemental form.
_	Adding to the idea that the United States is "Babylon" some American Rastas don't believe that the United States is Babylon due to the Revolutionary War against Britain.
_	Lowell promoted the idea that they were constructed by an intelligent race of Martians.
_	The book promoted the idea that taking large amounts of vitamin C could reduce the duration and severity of the common cold.
_	EDF sees natural gas as a way to quickly replace coal, with the idea that gas in time will be replaced by renewable energy.
_	This has been supported by the theories that conflict and poverty are interrelated; the idea that instability emerges from high-poverty conditions and vice versa.
_	Clinging to the idea that the goth subculture was not dying but merely changing, in 2002, local goths tried to revitalize the community by holding events keyed towards introducing older goths to the younger generation.
_	Linguistic determinism is the idea that language and its structures limit and determine human knowledge or thought, as well as thought processes such as categorization, memory, and perception.
_	These stories, and the idea that there was new country to conquer pulled Reeve north.
_	The expenditure method is based on the idea that all products are bought by somebody or some organisation.
_	Mutationism was the idea that new forms and species arose in a single step as a result of large mutations.
_	Wenders stated that they "liked the idea that Bono's voice would be sung by a girl in this video."
_	Emil Kraepelin introduced the idea that schizophrenia was separate from mood disorders after observing patients with symptoms of psychosis and mood disorder, over a century ago, in 1898.
_	Project Exile was named for the idea that if the police catch a criminal in Richmond with a gun in a crime, the criminal has forfeited his right to remain in this community, will face immediate federal prosecution and stiff mandatory federal prison sentences (often five years), and will thus be "exiled" to federal prison, often far away from the criminal's home town.
_	Sethe, Weill, and Clagett proposed that the names expressed the idea that each month culminated in the festival beginning the next.
_	The cultural movements included: Russophilia, the idea that Galicia was the westernmost part of Russia and that the natives of Western Ukraine were, like all of the Russian Empire's East Slavic inhabitants, members of one Russian nation; Ruthenianism, the idea that the people of Western Ukraine were a unique East Slavic nation; and Ukrainophilia, the idea that the people of western Ukraine were the same as those of neighbouring lands in the Russian Empire but that both were a people different from Russians — Ukrainians.
_	The executive order promoted the idea that if taxpayer funds were accepted through a government contract, then all taxpayers should have an equal opportunity to work through the contractor.
_	Sharon Hadrian writes: "It was the first time in over a decade that a lesbian couple had been depicted in the East London drama, lending cautious optimism to the idea that the BBC was finally integrating its traditionally heterosexual soaps [...]
_	It was founded on the idea that leisure be refined through cultivation and upon William Cobbett's stance that "Competence is the foundation of happiness."
_	The lyrics center around the idea that "something's wrong in Heaven tonight", with each verse decrying some segment of society's neglect of another segment.
_	Holism (from Greek "holos" "all, whole, entire") is the idea that systems (physical, biological, chemical, social, economic, mental, linguistic) and their properties should be viewed as wholes, not just as a collection of parts.
_	The puerile questions, written by Howard Stern, Fred Norris, and Jackie Martling, centered around a given celebrity's private life and were premised on the idea that a celebrity would not want to look bad by refusing an interview from a stutterer.
_	The Wages for Housework Campaign shared with "operaismo" the idea that the fair working conditions including wage is key to the social recognition of labor.
_	These networks are constituted, in part, of particular people who remember the past and whose job it is to deal with it, like historians, archivists and journalists, and also of the idea that the large social network connects us all.
_	The practice of implied repeal also reinforces the concept of parliamentary sovereignty or supremacy---that is, it reinforces the idea that the parliament or legislature cannot be restricted by any external limit, including past actions of the legislature itself.
_	Hofstadter's 2007 book "I Am a Strange Loop" carries his vision of consciousness considerably further, including the idea that each human "I" is distributed over numerous brains, rather than being limited to precisely one brain.
_	Dr Payne wrote: "Before it was shown that fin whales were the cause [of powerful sounds], no one could take seriously the idea that such regular, loud, low, and relatively pure frequency tones were coming from within the ocean, let alone from whales."
_	The fashion aspect of Fresh Fish was the idea that first took shape.
_	This meant, writes Richard Thurlow, that the idea that "Soviet moles and secret communists could be recruited into the governing class from British universities was not considered as a plausible possibility in the 1930s.
_	This was based on the idea that the new species was related to the modern genus "Dinoponera".
_	They promoted the idea that the 'Middle Age' was a time of darkness also because of corruption within the Roman Catholic Church, such as: Popes ruling as kings, veneration of saints' relics, a celibate priesthood, and institutionalized moral hypocrisy.
_	This leads naturally to the idea that the law of value will "balance out" the trading process.
_	He proposed the idea that emotional states are adaptive, and therefore only those able to express certain emotions passed on their characteristics.
_	New feminism, as a form of difference feminism, supports the idea that men and women have different strengths, perspectives, and roles, while advocating for the equal worth and dignity of both sexes.
_	Solidarity reject the idea that the USSR or China ever represented socialism, and agree with Tony Cliff's theory of 'state capitalism' which sees these societies as driven by the same dynamics as capitalism.
_	In macroeconomics, indivisibility of labor is the idea that labor cannot be used in continuous units but must be purchased from workers in blocks of time, such as eight hours a day or forty hours a week.
_	is sometimes called a heat kernel or a heat-kernel regularized sum; this name stems from the idea that the formula_5 can sometimes be understood as eigenvalues of the heat kernel.
_	Also, since plants have been shown to absorb and translocate the complex organic molecules of systemic insecticides, they can no longer discredit the idea that plants may be able to absorb the soluble forms of humus; this may in fact be an essential process for the uptake of otherwise insoluble iron oxides.
_	In the Book of Kings, which doesn't mention Asa's defeat of Zerah, Asa is described as being extremely weak from a defensive point of view, and Biblical scholars regard the idea that Asa could defeat an enormous Egyptian army to be untenable.
_	Schulze and coauthors also rejected the idea that a single rotting log could be studied as an ecosystem because the size of the flows between the log and its surroundings are too large, relative to the proportion cycles within the log.
_	He scorned the idea that P.L.C Croydon was some kind of finishing school for daughters of the wealthy, and was quoted as saying:
_	The eastern end of the Incipient Ridge is detected cutting through the north-south trending abyssal hills, and both bathymetric and magnetic data have shown recent magmatism along this ridge, supporting the idea that a counterclockwise pivot is located here.
_	Some researchers have suggested that the atmosphere of Mars may have been many times as thick as the present one of Earth; however, research published in fall 2015 advanced the idea that perhaps the early Martian atmosphere was not as thick as previously thought.
_	This research was further embellished in 1932 by P. R. Vessie, who popularized the idea that three brothers who left England in 1630 bound for Boston were the progenitors of HD in the USA.
_	Muncey and Davenport also popularized the idea that in the past some HD sufferers may have been thought to be possessed by spirits or victims of witchcraft, and were sometimes shunned or exiled by society.
_	Top down control has applications in agriculture and is the principle behind biological control, the idea that plants can benefit from the application of their herbivore’s enemies.
_	A study on self-serving bias in relational context suggests this is due to the idea that close relationships place limits on an individual's self enhancement tendencies.
_	When studying law, he became a bigger believer in the idea that Hinduism, above nationality, was the pivotal point upon which an Indian lifestyle must be based.
_	He believed, Hinduism, led to practices of peace to humanity, and the idea that when nationalist ideas were added to this peaceful belief system, a secular nation could be formed.
_	Lachowski introduced the concept of Management by Values in mBank, MultiBank and BRE Bank, based on the idea that companies should follow a set of core values.
_	Names of people contained in graves here coincide with those located next to the church, which supports the idea that these graves belonged to religious people.
_	Many of his novels have strong anarchist or libertarian themes, often promoting the idea that new technological advances render certain social conventions obsolete.
_	He gets the idea that because Frisky hasn't eaten his dinner yet, he can eat the dog's food.
_	A prominent figure in retrieval-based inhibition research, Henry L. Roediger III was another one of the first psychologists to propose the idea that retrieving an item reduces the subsequent accessibility of other stored items.
_	Constitutional patriotism () is the idea that people should form a political attachment to the norms and values of a pluralistic liberal democratic constitution rather than a national culture or cosmopolitan society.
_	Mediated stylistics, however, in taking seriously the idea that journalists are the "professional storytellers of our age", orients towards the types of creativity and innovation in language-use that are required in and for the construction of mediated stories.
_	McKenna also put forward the idea that psychedelics were "doorways into the Gaian mind", suggesting that "the planet has a kind of intelligence, it can actually open a channel of communication with an individual human being" and that the psychedelic plants were the facilitators of this communication.
_	This study led to the idea that biodiversity is autocatalytic.
_	Research has clearly supported the idea that decision latitude and demands relate to strains, but research findings about buffering have been mixed with only some studies providing support.
_	Art historian Oleg Grabar interpreted the painting as an attempt to convey the idea that the Umayyad dynasty was the descendant and heir of the dynasties it had defeated.
_	Creating shared value or CSV is based on the idea that corporate success and social welfare are interdependent.
_	Knitter's main contribution, informed by his Christian faith and the idea that Christianity is a fulfillment of Judaism, implies that, while the previous religion was not wrong, it was incomplete and awaiting later fulfillment.
_	He promotes the idea that the tariffs for transportation of goods consignors (indexed by the Russian government in 2016 to 9%) ranged in one direction or another, depending on fluctuations in the market prices of transported goods.
_	Gullu Goli creates the idea that they must kill Munna by soaking him in the sun.
_	Midgley's essay argues for the idea that human beings can have ethical obligations to non-human entities such as animals and ecosystems, an idea also found in "The Lives of Animals", "Foe" and many other works by Coetzee.
_	Venda put forward the idea that it is possible to purposefully, artificially develop subconscious creative thinking after he studied the biographies and works of A. S. Pushkin, Napoleon, and other outstanding personalities, and analyzed the results of his own longitudinal experiment, which lasted more than sixty-five years.
_	Because of the volatility between the euro and the króna, former Foreign Minister Valgerður Sverrisdóttir considered the idea that Iceland might dollarize itself into the Eurozone without joining the European Union.
_	He quotes the definition in the "Oxford Companion to Mind" as "a fixed, idiosyncratic belief, unusual in the culture to which the person belongs" suggesting that "most great philosophers have believed in God", and that the many religious people who exhibit a high degree of rational ability "... and who can produce a reasonable and coherent defense of their beliefs" refute the idea that belief in God is a delusion—whether or not it may be mistaken.
_	He also analyses and rejects the idea that faith is a brain malfunction, quoting Gerald Edelman:
_	At the time, this was considered rather far from the center of town, but Meany eventually sold the others involved on the idea that the forested campus could, itself, be an attraction for out-of-town visitors and that the trolley ride from downtown would not be an obstacle to attendance.
_	He asks Ludwig for help as Sebastian gets the idea that Tanja isn't her old self anymore.
_	Most of the people that listen to his music agree with the idea that it sounds descriptive and near to film music.
_	An additional aspect of minimalist thought is the idea that the derivation of syntactic structures should be "uniform": rules should not be stipulated as applying at arbitrary points in a derivation but instead apply throughout derivations.
_	This has implications for the idea that a single typeface can satisfy the needs of all locales.
_	Because of this, the idea that any form of mass is "completely" caused by interactions with electromagnetic fields, is not relevant any more.
_	Giordano Bruno and Johannes Kepler suggested the idea that the sun rotated on its axis.
_	Reparations for slavery is the idea that some form of compensatory payment needs to be made to the descendants of Africans who had been enslaved as part of the Atlantic Slave Trade.
_	By not trying to do well in school, such students engage in a rejection of the achievement ideology – that is, the idea that working hard and studying long hours will pay off for students in the form of higher wages or upward social mobility.
_	Some historians have challenged the idea that the US maliciously cut Cuba out of the negotiation process; rather, they argue, Kennedy operated under the false hope that Cuba was somehow not responsible for the crisis, and the Soviet Union had "imposed" the missile shipment on the Cuban government.
_	All of this supports the idea that human behaviours of kissing and feeding of premastication foods, either directly or indirectly from the mouth, have their behavioural roots in higher animals and ancestral great apes.
_	Hibben conceived the idea that the beauty of some geological formations could be enhanced by application of multicolored lighting.
_	On the same note, the founder of the organization May Our Daughters Return Home, Marisela Ortiz denounced the culture of intolerance and impunity as perpetuating the idea that anyone can commit a crime.
_	Although the idea that women are better multitaskers than men has been popular in the media as well in conventional thought, there is very little data available to support claims of a real sex difference.
_	However, the idea that different materials can significantly affect sound quality is under some contention, and some argue that different metals make less difference in sound quality than different flutists playing the same flute.
_	If a state is going to penalize a person or require that person pay compensation to another for losses incurred, liability is imposed according to the idea that those who injure others should take responsibility for their actions.
_	Over time the idea that local clubs would benefit by sharing and communicating with other clubs in the state grew among various club members.
_	However, the "Associaçom Galega da Língua" (Galician Language Association) and "Academia Galega da Língua Portuguesa" (Galician Academy of the Portuguese Language), belonging to the Reintegrationist movement, support the idea that differences between Galician and Portuguese speech are not enough to justify considering them as separate languages:
_	It has rejected the idea that an individual's misdeeds should be attributed to their societal background, placing an emphasis on self-responsibility.
_	He put forward the idea that in a society within the virtual world, participants lack the necessary honesty it would take to create a “real” virtual community.
_	As a commandant Zill expected his guards to act with the discipline of soldiers whilst also supporting the idea that camp inmates who had been indoctrinated into Nazism should be allowed to fight for Nazi Germany in return for their freedom.
_	At Halloween 1999 Karla established the First Satanic Church, which uses its website to promote the idea that it represents a direct continuation of the original Church of Satan as founded by Anton LaVey.
_	Black South Africans were compelled to live in poor townships, and were denied basic human rights, based on the idea that South Africa belonged to white people.
_	That is, the canonical approach stresses both the text in its final form as we have it, as well as the idea that "the words which compose the text draw their meaning from the context and setting in which they are meant to be read."
_	One review supported the idea that the cortex was involved in learning actions regardless of their outcome, while the basal ganglia was involved in selecting appropriate actions based on associative reward based trial and error learning.
_	In an email message sent to an anti-Israel activist, Tonge wrote that she had called for an inquiry to dispel any rumours and that the idea that organs could be being harvested in the situation which existed in Haiti was ludicrous and nonsense.
_	The suggestion that DID was the result of childhood trauma increased the appeal of the diagnosis among health care providers, patients and the public as it validated the idea that child abuse had lifelong, serious effects.
_	In 1995, Jehovah's Witnesses abandoned the idea that Armageddon must occur during the lives of the generation that was alive in 1914 and in 2010 changed their teaching on the "generation".
_	His concept, that "the Archivist is not and ought not be an Historian" and that the archivist "is the servant of his Archives first and afterwards of the student Public" reflect the idea that archivists should primarily serve as objective custodians of records.
_	In his book "The Cleanest Race" (2010), Brian Reynolds Myers dismisses the idea that "Juche" is North Korea's leading ideology.
_	In 1970 from redshift quantization he came up with the idea that the Universe might have nontrivial topological structure.
_	Twining also notes the various allegorical meanings attributed to the three crowns of the papal tiara, but concludes that "it seems more likely that the symbolism is suggested by the idea that took shape in the 13th and 14th centuries that the Emperor was crowned with three crowns--the silver crown of Germany at Aix-la-Chapelle, the iron crown of Lombardy at Milan or Monza and the golden imperial crown at Rome and therefore the Pope, too, should wear three crowns."
_	Based on the idea that the artist should stay out of focus, Emmanuel Flipo operates rather than "medium" for the cycle "Etude topographique".
_	The soil also contributed to the idea that there are good people and bad people and everything in between in the world.
_	The Principle of Gender embodies the idea that gender is manifested in everything.
_	Both of the Fitzgeralds had their own radio programs on WOR when Pegeen had the idea that it might be interesting to broadcast a family's talk at the breakfast table.
_	The work evokes heroic Herculean figures and victims of the 79 CE Eruption of Mount Vesuvius in Pompeii, further driving the idea that valorized bodies are not immune to the impact of war.
_	The claim that non-finite clauses have a phonologically null PRO subject is in part motivated by Binding Theory — in particular, the idea that an anaphor requires a local antecedent to be present.
_	This meant utilizing Titania and her cuckolded husband Auberon as supporting characters for most of his run on the comic, which in turn meant frequent visits and explorations to Faerie: the first storyline in the book showed Tim visiting a forgotten corner of the realm and introduced the idea that the land was slowly dying since it had been cut off from the Earth, and later storylines delved deeper into Faerie's past and present to build up a clearer picture of the Twilight Kingdom.
_	Throughout "The Study of Error," Bartholomae (1980) expounds upon the idea that basic writers must be able to “transcribe and manipulate the code of written discourse” in order to develop expert abilities (p. 268).
_	In addition, they promoted the idea that farmers should adopt business practices in their profession.
_	Though this view was first suggested by members of Cook's expedition, the idea that any Hawaiians understood Cook to be Lono, and the evidence presented in support of it, were challenged in 1992.
_	A steady clinic presence across the country maintains the idea that abortion is not universally supported and alternative services can be provided to women seeking abortions.
_	He argued for moral vegetarianism and animal rights, affirmative action, euthanasia, and the idea that parents should give as much fundamental moral consideration to another's children as they do to their own.
_	The post-Exilic writers of the Wisdom tradition developed the idea that Wisdom existed before creation and was used by God to create the universe: "Present from the beginning, Wisdom assumes the role of master builder while God establishes the heavens, restricts the chaotic waters, and shapes the mountains and fields."
_	This approach is based on the idea that letters that share a phonetic similarity, have similar meaning.
_	This is in keeping with the idea that in Ruby, one never directly accesses the internal members of a class from outside the class; rather, one passes a message to the class and receives a response.
_	The critic and historian Robert Hughes posted a review on Artslant of Lasker’s solo exhibition at Galerie Thaddaeus Ropac in Paris, in which he rejects the idea that the artist’s work is about anything other than its formal properties:
_	Saudi Arabian government officials and state religious leaders often promote the idea that Jews are conspiring to take over the entire world; as proof of their claims they publish and frequently cite The Protocols of the Elders of Zion as factual.
_	The New Critics also rejected the idea that the work of a critic or analyst is to determine an author's intended meaning (a view formalized by W.K. Wimsatt and Monroe Beardsley as the intentional fallacy).
_	He "was more than a cricketer ... he embodied the idea that there was more to life than cricket".
_	After he comes up with the idea that Penny was checking Raj's anal region for pinworms, Leonard tells him that Penny and Raj did have sex, and that Penny was lying when she said it wasn't what it looked like.
_	Moreover, a police fire investigator stated that the idea that smoking in bed caused fire was a myth.
_	Heilig had the idea that these less experienced players from big union clubs should try second-tier rugby league.
_	Some of Avicenna's views on the soul included the idea that the immortality of the soul is a consequence of its nature, and not a purpose for it to fulfill.
_	This was the idea that became "Animals, Men and Morals' (see below).
_	But on the other side of the spectrum is the idea that harmonisation should only be to the extent necessary for a functioning of the internal market.
_	The instructions that were actually given to the jury did not address the motive for Celia's crime at all, or allow for an acquittal based on the idea that she would have been justified in using physical force to resist sexual assault at the hands of her master.
_	Kolbert uses the mastodon as a symbol for the idea that catastrophe is an important mechanism of extinction.
_	This conception was picturesque in the idea that the father was the breadwinner, the mother was a housewife, and the children were well behaved.
_	However, newer studies support the idea that "Elaphrosaurus" was a herbivore or omnivore, owing to its close relation with "Limusaurus" and a neck which is much less flexible than those characteristic of carnivorous theropods.
_	The ell exhibits similar First Period construction techniques, whose forms are consistent with the idea that it was all or part of the first house built on the property, c. 1707.
_	Clarke hoped Montgomery's apparent presence in Gibraltar and Africa would lend support to the idea that the Allies might be planning landings in southern France, as part of Operation Vendetta, rather than across the Channel.
_	This contrasts with 30 years ago when cars were covered more completely with insects, supporting the idea that insect numbers had waned.
_	The Kosovo prime minister's office also disputed the idea that Serb monuments and churches in Kosovo were Serbian property.
_	I also originally wrote the song as comfort to the idea that death is a part of the cycle of life and a loved one's life should be celebrated.
_	Topinka's main themes are what he calls "the crack" - in other words, how to break from one's hidespot through to "4th dimension" - something that e. g. Marcel Duchamp or Paul Celan ("Light-Compulsion", 1970) wrote about as well; and "silence" (one of his interviews is called "Anyone who ever thought about poetry, must ask oneself 'Why did Rimbaud stop writing?'" ), embracing the idea that a poet's main goal is his/her existence itself.
_	Korean ethnic nationalism is based on the idea that Koreans have existed as a single unique homogeneous race ("tan'il minjok") since ancient times.
_	In the fresco cycle Lorenzetti expresses the idea that the cause of peace lays not only from the effects of good government, but also from the citizens acting in “accord[ance] with the temporal and astral force that governs” them.
_	With these depictions of the labors following with the seasons and planets, Lorenzetti creates the idea that peace is in part possible due to the citizens following in accordance to the planets and seasons.
_	In presenting the honors, Shaikh Nahyan bin Mubarak Al Nahyan described the initiative as reinforcing "the idea that poetry, and literature in general, are a universal language that plays an important role in spreading the message of peace in the world," echoing the sentiments of Dr Hamad Al Shaikh Al Shaibani, chair of the World Peace Award's board of trustees, who cited the role of poets in "promoting a culture of hope and solidarity."
_	Their single "Plans & Reveries" is hypothesized to be the most popular song from the music group, and it conveys the idea that some ideas are stuck to and followed while others become reveries and are never accomplished.
_	It is based on the idea that many curriculum lessons can be turned into mini-games.
_	According to P. Bien, the psychology in "The Last Temptation" is based on the idea that every person, Jesus included, is evil by nature as well as good: violent and hateful as well as loving.
_	Count Mosca's plan has Fabrice go to seminary school in Naples, with the idea that when he graduates he will come to Parma and become a senior figure in the religious hierarchy, and eventually the Archbishop, as the current office holder is old.
_	Bartlett supported D. W. Mitchell on the idea that the collection of animals held by the Zoological Society of London could be made accessible to the public for a small fee that could help the society.
_	"If you give the idea that there are two schools of thought within science--one that says the earth is round and one that says the earth is flat--you are misleading children."
_	Proponents claim that repeated practice of this particular formula of mental imagery translates to improved coordination in dance and in movement in general "based on the idea that imagery can improve skeletal alignment and posture through the re-patterning of neuromuscular pathways in the absence of overt movement".
_	This is seen as a further step in advancing the idea that "...had been part of church history and debate as far back as 519 when the notion of the Bishop of Rome as the preserver of apostolic truth was set forth in the Formula of Hormisdas."
_	CoNEXTions was created under the idea that "intense and system-wide implementation of constructive thinking skills while intervening on risky behaviors, in a protective and caring manner, will decrease recividism and crime among the youth".
_	Although the explicit intention is to emphasize the distinction between the literal and the metaphorical, the final result is a visual expression that does not exclude the metaphorical; the idea that the image can be ‘clear,’ ‘clean,’ ‘lucid,’ or ‘ethical’ is in fact a further use of metaphor employed to organize and frame this ontological meta-discourse.
_	"Xu Lin not only refused to answer difficult questions, she also politicised the Confucius Institutes and reinforced the idea that they are led by dogmatists," commented Gary Rawnsley, professor of Public Diplomacy at Aberystwyth University, Wales.
_	Schein (1992), Deal and Kennedy (2000), and Kotter (1992) advanced the idea that organizations often have very differing cultures as well as subcultures.
_	Concern has also been expressed at use of tactical response teams to contain popular protest and at the idea that the army should support the police in containing popular protest.
_	Rather than being relieved, Campbell feels "nauseated" by the idea that he will be saved from death and granted freedom only when he is no longer able to enjoy anything that life has to offer.
_	The second draft introduced the idea that Kirk marooned Erickson and his crew on a new planet; this remained in the final version.
_	The idea of self-domestication was used by early Social Darwinism which, according to psychiatrist Martin Brüne in an article "On human self-domestication", developed from the idea that humans could perfect themselves biologically.
_	She also asserted the right of authors from a cultural majority to write in the voice of someone from a cultural minority, attacking the idea that this constitutes unethical "cultural appropriation".
_	Lister then goes back to Cassandra's chamber, telling her that he doesn't like the idea that his entire future is already picked out, and plans to prove he can make his own decisions by refusing to kill her.
_	The fiscal theory of the price level is the idea that government fiscal policy affects the price level: for the price level to be stable (to control inflation), government finances must be sustainable: they must run a balanced budget over the course of the business cycle, meaning they must not run a structural deficit.
_	In line with its claim to be a "primarily non-territorial" state Atlantium does not maintain any formal territorial claims; however, it does promote the idea that Cruickshank's apartment, and the Province of Aurora, have extraterritorial status; in practice these properties remain under Australian jurisdiction.
_	This scenario leads to increased precipitation and is a fundament behind the idea that the rain belt is moving north.
_	In an episode of "In Our Time" broadcast on Thu, 20 Oct 2005, 21:30 on BBC Radio 4, Angie Hobbs, Lecturer in Philosophy, University of Warwick; Miriam Griffin, Fellow of Somerville College, Oxford; and John Moles, Professor of Latin, University of Newcastle discussed with Melvyn Bragg the idea that Antisthenes and Diogenes in ancient Greece practiced a form of performance art and that they acquired the epithet of cynic which means "dog" due to Diogenes behaving repeatedly like a dog in his performances.
_	This reinforces the idea that the games played at the time did not necessarily involve a ball being kicked.
_	Then in line 8, "the parts that thou shouldst bear" still keeps the idea that music and family are one by saying a part that is played in the family, or with a musical instrument in an orchestra.
_	Collinson had the idea that Wilfred should be Donna's grandfather after Executive Producer Russell T Davies had decided that a grandfather character should replace the father character after Attfield's death.
_	Lead singer and principal songwriter for the band Jon Foreman wrote the song in Europe, with the intent of "trying to embody the story of the rain," which comes from the idea that raindrops are on a "relentless" journey back to the ocean.
_	"I was thinking about the idea that I'm on a journey myself," he says. "...reaching and searching and longing for more.
_	He sets out with the idea that only relations please — in the Kantian sense of producing pleasure devoid of desire; and his aim is to determine the "aesthetic elementary relations", or the simplest relations which produce this pleasure.
_	In 2010, in a period of heavy layoffs at newspapers and throughout the legacy media industry, "Community Impact Newspaper" experienced growth, and pushed the idea that "Print Ain't Dead."
_	In his second novel, "The Last of the Knickerbockers" (1901), Vielé — himself a descendant of the Knickerbockers of Schagtickoke, New York — celebrated and mythologized the Dutch-descended families of New York, especially the idea that they represented a kind of surviving "old stock" that was nobler than other more recently arrived Americans.
_	There have been attempts to link squalene to Gulf War Syndrome mainly due to the idea that squalene might have been present in an anthrax vaccine given to some military personnel during the 1991 Persian Gulf War.
_	It's taking them a little time to get used to the idea that I was the people's choice."
_	However, he claimed that there still lacked evidence for the idea that rapid urbanization actually made areas worse off.
_	I think it could stand to be 10 to 15 minutes shorter, but the idea that we got that amount of film in forty five days was pretty good.
_	This observation reinforces the idea that social origin, more than economic capital, produces aesthetic preferences because regardless of economic capability consumption patterns remain stable.
_	The erotic aspect of the cult was also prominent: although Mussolini was portrayed as a respectable family man, at the same time state propaganda did little to counter the idea that he had sexual magnetism to women and was promiscuous.
_	"From time to time one still comes across the idea that modernist music, by its very nature, is ugly and inexpressive, and that the newly tuneful composers of the last couple of decades have saved the art from going down some blind alley.
_	His most avant garde philosophy is based on the idea that Paul Dirac's hypothesis of parallel antiparticle worlds is, in fact, correct, and that humans adept at trance meditation can become aware of spiritual dimensions placed at 90° from them left and right—dimensions, Wilde said, that follow Hawking's theory of transverse waves of light.
_	They are at the forefront of the idea that private firms should be good citizens in their own neighborhoods and in the world at large".
_	Bell has been associated with the idea that "nerdy is the new cool", and she explained, "what was previously perceived as nerdy is now viewed as original.
_	In 1976, Wilson stated, "I think "That's Not Me" reveals a lot about myself, just the idea that you're going to look at yourself and say, 'Hey, now look, that's not me, kind of square off with yourself and say 'this is me, that's not me'."
_	It is based on the idea that a new economic science, free from any neo-liberal or other normative bias is needed: green economics.
_	The Sophists were persuaded that the Nomos wasn't especially the best in Greek but had as first the idea that it was equal but different of other cultures.
_	In time the idea that the "Laws of Edward and Guthrum" should be dated to the reign of Edward the Elder came under scrutiny.
_	Here it is only general, rather than a rule, and confined to England, but Johnson's concept of teaching all the liberal arts is still present, and the idea that degree awarding powers form part of the definition is now present.
_	Gym Class Heroes drummer Matt McGinley explained that the song's music video "basically plays on the idea that we're sort of just being casual, hanging out, being ourselves and our shadows get wild and get loose.
_	"S. mexicana" is often found in wet lowlands but primarily in elevated mountain regions, which is supported by the idea that stingless bees of dark color and average size tend to remain in high attitudes.
_	"Network 7" challenged the idea that youth programming could only be a niche concern in the television business.
_	To him the Haitian revolution was evidence for the idea that "slavery should be permanent in the United States."
_	He argued against the idea that slavery had caused the revolution, by instead suggesting that "the antislavery movement had provoked the revolt in the first place."
_	She rejects the idea that autonomous efforts to choose "better" or the "best" children are less problematic for being freely chosen.
_	They symbiote tells her that bonding to her has given it unique medium awareness and knowledge of the Marvel Multiverse, though Gwen laughs off the idea that they're living in a What If?.
_	Their research supports the idea that a good match between internal capacity and competitive environment is required.
_	Regarding "The David Lee Roth Show", Stern stated in a 2010 interview with former CBS executive Rob Barnett that he knew that the show would fail when Roth did not seem to grasp the idea that talking to a radio audience is different from talking to the crowd at a rock concert.
_	Luo implemented many democratic principles, including the idea that all matters of state must involve the consultation of the republic's citizenry.
_	He postulated - and supported with experimental results - the idea that disease-causing agents do not spontaneously appear but are alive and need the right environment to prosper and multiply.
_	However, the Galician Language Association ("Associaçom Galega da Língua") and Galician Academy of the Portuguese Language ("Academia Galega da Língua Portuguesa"), belonging to the Reintegrationist movement, support the idea that differences between Galician and Portuguese speech are not enough to justify considering them as separate languages:
_	Nonetheless, around the same time that Evans was publishing his theory of a pagan survival, there were also researchers who had examined the origins of the Society and criticised the idea that it had ancient roots.
_	Liberal Democrat leader Sir Menzies Campbell had already ruled out the idea that members of his party would take seats in a Brown Cabinet, but, according to the reports, Brown still proceeded to approach Ashdown with the offer.
_	Literary scholars say that the idea that an author's work must reflect his or her life is a Modernist assumption not held by Elizabethan writers, and that biographical interpretations of literature are unreliable in attributing authorship.
_	It was here that Edward Stolper and he came up with the idea that some meteorites might originate from Mars.
_	During an interview about the experiences discussed in "Wild", Griffiths said, "To my mind, at worst, the West operates a kind of 'intellectual apartheid' – the idea that our way of thinking is the only one.
_	Ronald Bailey, author of "Global Warming and Other Eco-Myths" (published by the Competitive Enterprise Institute in 2002), stated in 2005, "Anyone still holding onto the idea that there is no global warming ought to hang it up."
_	The dynastic cycle was the idea that all dynasties will come to an end and this was going to stop it by having the people receive the land from the government; this makes them feel like the government gave them something even though it never left.
_	He came up with the idea that Blackquill would be a convict, thus being the "most criminal prosecutor yet".
_	Cybertext is based on the idea that getting to the message is just as important as the message itself.
_	During the War of the Spanish Succession he was an early proponent of the idea that Great Britain should take New France, proposing in 1708 that it be conquered and that the residents of Acadia be deported.
_	This had the effect of popularizing the idea that the Emishi were like other contemporary ethnic Japanese who lived in northeast Japan, outside of Yamato rule.
_	Debates about the origin of bird flight are almost as old as the idea that birds evolved from dinosaurs, which arose soon after the discovery of "Archaeopteryx" in 1862.
_	General U. S. Grant initially demanded the conditional surrender of the Vicksburg garrison, but faced with the necessity of feeding 30,000 starving Confederates and having the idea that these soldiers might do more harm to the Confederate cause by being released to return home rather than being exchanged as whole units, he relented and allowed for the immediate parole of the unit.
_	This conclusion supports the idea that loyalty versus independence played a conflicting role that lead to eating disorder symptoms.
_	CityLax functions on the idea that schools are the best environment for students and athletes alike to build on their abilities and work towards self-improvement.
_	The opposing view stemmed from the idea that begetting the Son is itself in the nature of the Father, which is eternal.
_	Later Reformed theologians reacted against Barth's views on baptism by appealing to Calvin, the idea that baptism is a promise rather than an accomplished reality, and the idea of baptism as a replacement of circumcision.
_	T.F. Torrance emphasized the idea that baptism is God's word establishing the church, and that the individual's response comes after rather than before God's act in baptism.
_	Ironically, the authority to secede had originally been given by the legislature to the State convention based upon the idea that a constitutional rewrite might have been needed for an ordinance of secession to be passed.
_	The song expresses the idea that the sunlight would not be missed because the look of a woman is as bright as the star's light.
_	The main theme of the poem is the idea that was novel in the times of early nationalisms based on centralized nation-statesthat the lack of political sovereignty does not preclude the existence of a nation.
_	Ginsburg helped highlight the idea that the social security provision had discriminated against men acting as caregivers, and women serving as breadwinners.
_	Other ideas include the related notion that at no time is "nothing going on" and the idea that an appropriate time exists for fighting and another for abstaining from violence.
_	Faucheux emphasized the idea that each new book should be a new object determined by type choice, proportion and "déroulement", the development of a visual concept over several pages.
_	Faucheux also emphasized the idea that the choice of typeface should have some relationship to the meaning of the text.
_	In the early 1920s HH Thomas showed through petrographic analysis that many of the bluestones had come from the Preseli Hills, and in 2005 work led by Timothy Darvill and Geoff Wainwright supported the idea that Carn Menyn was the primary quarry.
_	He concluded that the idea that medieval revels were pagan in origin is a legacy of the Protestant Reformation.
_	While performance was matched post hoc and replication is needed, this evidence rules out the idea that these brain regions are part of a unitary memory strength system.
_	PCS-CU is designed to be lightweight, yet durable enough to be used throughout rigorous activities soldiers find themselves performing; and with the idea that layers of clothing are warmer and more flexible than a single thick layer.
_	So the idea that fig and olive refers to both fruit and location was a view of the Sahabah and their early students.
_	Seidel believes that the pattens at the lower left hand corner of the panel, as well as the fact that the mirror is angled towards the viewer's point of view, reinforce the idea that a future husband was the intended audience.
_	Through Eusebius Hegesippus was also known to Jerome, who is responsible for the idea that Hegesippus "wrote a history of all ecclesiastical events from the passion of our Lord down to his own period... in five volumes", which has established the "Hypomnemata" as a Church history.
_	She challenges "the idea that sex-differences might have biological rather than social causes" as being more motivated by a reaction to politically correct attitudes than being derived from basic research.
_	He also objected to the idea that the invitation to the 1961 meeting should be contingent on the ROC's acceptance.
_	(Once we have adopted an impredicative standpoint, abandoning the idea that classes are constructed, it is not unnatural to accept transfinite types.)
_	Award was established in 1979 by the Harvard Divinity School Alumni/ae Association "to honor among its graduates one who exhibits a passionate and helpful interest in the lives of other people, an informed and realistic faithfulness, an embodiment of the idea that love is not so much a way of feeling as a way of acting, and a reliable sense of humor."
_	This day in Latvia was 'officially born' in 2008 when it was celebrated and marked in the calendar for the first time on September 14 (second September Sunday) to promote the idea that man as the father must be satisfied and proud of his family and children, also, the father is important to gratitude and loving words from his family for devoted to continuous altruistic concerns.
_	Those who were of a different religion or without property were considered unfit to vote due to the idea that they could be easily swayed for one candidate or another, or had the possibility of creating detrimental factions in opposition to the government.
_	The Dynamic Language Runtime is built on the idea that it is possible to implement language specificities on top of a generic language-agnostic abstract syntax tree, whose nodes correspond to a specific functionality that is common to many dynamic languages.
_	This architecture is backed by the idea that the number of elementary language constructs that would have to be implemented on the generic stack should be inherently limited.
_	The "Ruhr Charter" was the idea that served as the basis for further discussion among the Western allies.
_	While the show focused on a Korean American family, Cho was the only Korean American actor/actress cast (all other members being of Chinese or Japanese ancestry, in an example of non-traditional casting), which critics said perpetuated the idea that all Asians are the same.
_	Michael's sister Christina (Julie Benz), a single mother struggling to care for her troubled teenaged son Milo (Liam Aiken), believes in the supernatural and is thrilled with the idea that Anna is back in Michael's life, as she insists he was a better person when she was around.
_	After the supposed appearance of the Black Christ figure, the Augustinian friars proclaimed a miracle had occurred in the cave, word of which spread and even included the idea that the area had been freed of predatory animals.
_	IPE is an innovative model for delivering high quality primary health care with the idea that an interprofessional, team-based approach to health care delivers not only better patient care, but also improves educational value for the next generation of health care providers.
_	For example, the most recent dating of the Deccan Traps supports the idea that rapid eruption rates in the Deccan Traps may have been triggered by large seismic waves radiated by the impact.
_	These studies and samples have supported the idea that these frictional properties of the fault zone possibly triggered the shallow and large slip during the Tohoku earthquake.
_	Moreland describes theistic science as a research program that is "rooted in the idea that Christians ought to consult all they know or have reason to believe in forming and testing hypotheses, explaining things in science and evaluating the plausibility of various hypotheses, and among the things they should consult are propositions of theology (and philosophy)", and defines its two central propositions as:
_	Dancy's version of Graham is implied to be on the autism spectrum, but series creator Bryan Fuller has refuted the idea that he has Asperger syndrome, stating instead that he has "the opposite of" the disorder:
_	Black, however, has always rejected the idea that democracy (direct or representative) is anarchist.
_	Further, these radical feminists reject the feminine essence concept of transsexuality (the idea that there is a "female brain" or innate feminine feeling).
_	Her album "Traveller" was built around the idea that Spanish flamenco may have its origins in India.
_	The title of the album came from the idea that she had become a new person after her concert during her 20th birthday, as she wanted to "lead everyone" through her songs.
_	"Chemical Business News" published an article suggesting that the idea that pesticides pose special dangers for children was actually an alarmist issue not based in science.
_	His most well-known book is "The Colonial Heritage of Latin America", published jointly with his wife, Barbara H. Stein (1916-2005), explores the idea that Spain’s restrictive policies on trade meant that Spanish America’s wealth did not enrich the region while simultaneously turning Spain into a dependency of Northern Europe.
_	In tombs, cosmetic palettes were found buried with the deceased as grave goods which further emphasized the idea that cosmetics were not only used for aesthetic purposes but rather magical and religious purposes.
_	He wrote that while Ruse challenged the idea that homosexuality is a mental illness, he did so "without acknowledging that these views had already been debated in the 1950s".
_	In 1991 he designed the Pod Speaker (initially called the House Pod) with the idea that loud speakers performed better in a rounded form than a square box.
_	The word "programming" illustrates the idea that during critical periods in early fetal development, there are persisting changes in the body structure and function that are caused by environmental stimuli.
_	The protesters chanted "Desiderio, Desiderio, hear my criteria", but this had no effect, while inside, the voice of the Minister of Culture repeated the idea that in a place under siege, dissent is treason.
_	O.F. Cook (1935) is cited in Puleston’s article as the originator of the idea that chultuns could have been used to store ramon nuts, however, without Puleston’s experiment this assertion had never been taken seriously.
_	So it was a determined crew of Aberdeen casuals that made its way to Edinburgh in March, for the last game against Hibs of that season, who had firmly in their minds the idea that nothing less than a result against the CCS would do.
_	The Bulgarian communist leader Todor Zhivkov, in his intervention, took a firmer stand than the Soviets in upholding the notion of general laws of socialist development (as opposed to the idea that each party should develop its own way of building socialism), denouncing revisionism and underlining the dual responsibility of the individual communist party (both to its own people and the world communist movement).
_	"Reckless Art" started in 2002 as a way to refute the idea that "Everything has been done already."
_	Ages argued that witches could not control the weather because they were mortals, not God, but by the mid-thirteenth century most populations agreed with the idea that witches could control natural forces.
_	Kohn argues that they were intent on organizing some form of direct action (although he disclaims the idea that this would necessarily take the form of a traditional "coup d'état"), while historian Paul David Nelson claims Kohn's thesis is circumstantial and poorly supported by primary materials.
_	He says the idea that evolution is an atheistic theory is misguided and has arisen "because the ideas and scope of evolutionary theory are frequently misunderstood by Christian non-biologists, whereas atheists on their part often have little knowledge of the biblical doctrine of creation" while "many people have tried to hijack the theory of evolution to support all kinds of ideologies.
_	On settling on Rooster Teeth, Burns stated, "We named it something else to give people the idea that we were going to be doing more than that".
_	Yu rebuts the idea that either his father or grandfather (i.e. Chen Fake) ever called their style "Xinjia" or believed that what they practiced was newer than other branches of Chen Taijiquan.
_	A major objection to the idea that Pekah headed a kingdom that was rival to Menahem's reign in Samaria is that he is listed as a commander ("shalish") of Pekahaiah, Menahem's son, whom he slew (2 Kings 15:25).
_	I know that at the time, Skillet didn't like the idea that it had turned into a lot of phone calls, managers, and lawyers.
_	This expounds the idea that motion is manifest in everything in the Universe, that nothing rests, and everything moves, vibrates and circles.
_	On 14 August 1879, he opened his first department store in Stralsund, with not much more than the idea that it should be possible to sell high quality products at fixed prices for cash.
_	This also helps contribute to the idea that Kariandusi was once a factory site: if it was a factory site, these axes would be created on site and then passed out or shipped to different communities around Kariandusi.
_	Frank’s website goes on to explain that the city is set in the painting’s center, a fact that is meant to highlight the idea that the Forbidden City is where the earth and Heavens touch.
_	He explored the idea that "birthmarks and other skin lesions and abnormalities may provide evidence of cutaneous injuries sustained in a previous life, thus supporting the notion of reincarnation".
_	They also draw heavily on the concept of reflexivity, the idea that as a society examines itself, it in turn changes itself in the process.
_	Hazlitt also notes another fallacy, the idea that "the desire to propagate the [human] species" is as fixed and immutable a law as hunger.
_	This brace was designed with the idea that compliance would increase if the brace were worn only at night.
_	Warlock has outgrown its need for the two gunfighters, but Morgan cannot tolerate the idea that Gannon is now more of a hero than Blaisedell, and he resents Lily's attraction to the deputy, too.
_	For the more general case of doubly stochastic models, there is the idea that many values in a time-series or stochastic model are simultaneously affected by the underlying parameters, either by using a single parameter affecting many outcome variates, or by treating the underlying parameter as a time-series or stochastic process in its own right.
_	Lou and Oscar suspect that Carl wants to marry Alexandra, and are resentful at the idea that Carl might try to marry into a farm, while they had to work hard for theirs.
_	She attempts to convince him that he is wrong by laughing scornfully at the idea that a glamorous woman like herself could possibly be a lowly chambermaid.
_	In a meeting between Colorado Right To Life and the Denver affiliate of Susan G. Komen for the Cure regarding Komen grants to Planned Parenthood, Brind urged the breast cancer group to re-consider the idea that abortion is linked to breast cancer.
_	Abbasid philosophers also pressed the idea that Islam had from the very beginning stressed the gathering of knowledge as important to the religion.
_	The concept of integration of faith and learning, the idea that knowledge and faith meet their highest potential when coupled together, is a central educational theme at Taylor.
_	Some real-world time concepts include the idea that information cannot travel faster than the speed of light, but on the other hand there is something called entangled particles and even Albert Einstein and Erwin Schrödinger did not come to a definitive conclusion.
_	He strongly contested the idea that there was a "Battle for Australia" in 1942, disagreeing opinions that events in Darwin in 1942 during the Second World War represented Japan's intention to invade Australia.
_	However, analyses which also include genetic data from living reptiles strongly support the idea that turtles fall within a group called Diapsida, as close relatives of either lizards (in which case they would be lepidosauromorphs) or birds and crocodiles (making them archosauromorphs).
_	Though an analysis which included data from "Pappochelys" found weak support for the idea that "Eunotosaurus" was a parareptile, it found stronger support for the hypothesis that "Eunotosaurus" was itself a diapsid closely related to turtles, and that it's apparently primitive, anapsid skull was probably developed as part of the turtle lineage, independently of parareptiles.
_	Some attention has been paid to the idea that people may be altruistic (care about the well-being of others), but it is only with the addition of reciprocity and norms of fairness that the model becomes accurate.(e.g. Rabin 1993; Dufwenberg and Kirchsteiger 2000; Fehr and Schmidt 2000).
_	Contrary to David Lewis, he argues against the idea that Newcomb's problem is another version of the prisoner's dilemma.
_	Circular channels on the upper surface of the oculus also support the idea that this lantern, perhaps itself domed, was the rotating dome referred to in written accounts.
_	Years before the Internet took off and web browser emerged, developers and executives at Apple had the idea that fast and flexible access to linked data would be crucial to future computing.
_	Lincoln believed in God, but some said he doubted the idea that Christ is God.
_	It is a theory of testing based on the idea that a person’s observed or obtained score on a test is the sum of a true score (error-free score) and an error score.
_	He objects to the idea that functional aspects in biological systems can be investigated via a material focus.
_	Loneliness often seems to be a theme in her work, as is the idea that materialism and money have corrupted modern
_	PyeongChang WINNERS was founded under the idea that everyone can become an "Olympic Maker", a person that positively impacts the Olympics.
_	In the early 1980s, the idea that markup should be focused on the structural aspects of a document and leave the visual presentation of that structure to the interpreter led to the creation of SGML.
_	The results of this study support the idea that NK suffered damage to a system involved in recognizing social signals of disgust, due to a damaged insula caused by neurodegeneration.
_	Originally, the channel's programming was formatted around the idea that a viewer could tune in at any time of day or night (instead of having to wait for the merely once- or twice-daily national news segments in local newscasts, or morning or evening network news programs), and receive up-to-date information on the top national and international stories in just 30 minutes.
_	Cognitive Madisonianism is the idea that divided government is better than one in which a single party controls both the executive and legislative branches.
_	BBQ Chickens' third album, "Fine Songs, Playing Sucks", was a cover album, and was noted by the idea that it was a "selection of most unusual songs to cover."
_	Mayanism has gained renewed vigor due to pseudoscientific nonfiction by authors such as Erich von Däniken, Zecharia Sitchin, and Graham Hancock, whose theories range from invoking ancient astronauts and other extraterrestrials from outer space to revivals of the idea that ancient peoples from lost lands brought wisdom and technology to the Mayas.
_	Eventually, she came to hate the idea that the Ghost Dragons were led by a white man, and after King Snake killed a member of the Triads (an act she considered highly foolish) she led a revolt against him.
_	In its place, the much larger "Commoner's Tower" (Danish: "Borgertårnet") was erected with the idea that it would rise much higher than the former tower.
_	Broadbent proposed the idea that the mind could only work with so much sensory input at any given time, and as a result, there must be a filter that allows us to selectively attend to things while blocking others out.
_	Historically it is inaccurate (for example, Paul Revere never made it to Concord), but it captures the idea that an individual can change the course of history.
_	"Vertical equity" usually refers to the idea that people with a greater ability to pay taxes should pay more.
_	Jim Geraghty, a writer for "National Review" and "National Review Online", wrote in his review of the book that "Freddoso one aspect of the Obama message, the idea that Obama is a reformer, and obliterates it in the manner of a professional demolitions crew."
_	This situation gave rise to the idea that parts of Italy were still "unredeemed", hence Italian irredentism became an important ideological component of the political life of the Kingdom of Italy: see "Italia irredenta".
_	Romney would overturn the existing policy against sending arms to moderate elements of the Syrian opposition, rejecting the idea that they would pass the weapons on to Al-Queda.
_	Elsewhere, Pape has continued his criticisms of the idea that wars can be won through air power alone.
_	Elder Tadej (Thaddeus) of Vitovnica (10 October 1914 – 13 April 2003) was a Serbian Orthodox elder and published author, credited for proposing the idea that our thoughts determine the outcome of our lives.
_	It alludes to the idea that the biblical Adam had only water to drink.
_	Furthermore, these ideals promoted the idea that when a crime is committed, it is no longer seen as "free will" but instead a result of one's genetic pre-disposition to savagery.
_	The idea of humanistic capitalism is linked with the idea that fundamental changes must take place in economics today, as humanistic capitalism requires that there be a blending of the non-profit and for-profit sectors.
_	That the Board of Trustees simultaneously pursued union with Jefferson College lends credence to the idea that the relationship with the Synod was of convenience and survival, rather than a strictly ideological move.
_	Eberhardt found that the material obtained by essentially chemically destroying the meteorite matrix resulted in a colloidal sludge residue which contained almost pure Ne. This supported the idea that presolar dust grains were present in the sludge from the meteorite.
_	Immediately given up was the idea that the two Koreas could be united into a single pro-US/UN country.
_	Problems occur here: with the idea that the descriptor of The Universe can in some way "step beyond" the model he/she has projected.
_	Phylogenetic analyses published during the 2000s cast doubt on the idea that many traditional metriorhynchid genera formed natural groups (i.e., include all descendants of a common ancestor).
_	Nightwing is said to be resisting the idea that someone needs to take up the mantle of Batman, in spite of arguments from Robin and Alfred Pennyworth that it is necessary.
_	They wrote that the best part of the episode is "the Scottish stuff," and "the idea that, once again, Burns is actually worried about his public image, as he was in 'The Joy of Sect'."
_	Social psychologist Ethan Kross from University of Michigan, who was heavily involved in the study, said, "These results give new meaning to the idea that social rejection hurts".
_	Mainstream academics have often argued that the Oxford theory is based on snobbery: that anti-Stratfordians reject the idea that the son of a mere tradesman could write the plays and poems of Shakespeare.
_	Shoghi Effendi, the head of the religion in the first half of the 20th century, adopted a style that was somewhat removed from everyday discourse when translating the texts from their original Arabic or Persian to capture some of the poetic and metaphorical nature of the text in the original languages and to convey the idea that the text was to be considered holy.
_	As Michael Dirda explains in "The Washington Post", the novel conveys the idea that "Most of history's worst nightmares result from an unthinking obedience to authority, high-minded zealotry seductively overriding our mere humanity."
_	Ellegård started a new line of research into the historicity of Jesus and the idea that Jesus is a myth.
_	It was essential to delegitimize as soon as possible any use of APM’s by the adoption of an instrument of international law on a total ban of APM’s, because it would not only bind the Parties to the Convention but would also have at least a moral effect on Countries not Parties by clearly contradicting the idea that the use of APM’s is legal.
_	The book seems to argue in favor of the idea that social conditions rather than heredity shape a person's character and behavior (the nature versus nurture debate).
_	They are also committed to the idea that Phi Psi's young members are the future of the nation and need every opportunity to succeed.
_	Conceived and intended as cover artwork for a self-published pamphlet version of Rimbaud's "Christ's Reality Asylum", the Crass logo was an amalgam of several "icons of authority" including the Christian cross, the swastika, the Union Jack and a two-headed Ouroboros (symbolising the idea that power will eventually destroy itself).
_	Through that emphasis on the idea that the environment is, first of all, "inhabited" by persons and not something remote or detached, aspects were taken up that had been mostly neglected in art education’s earlier bearings in formalist and semiotic approaches.
_	To support these findings, the scientists note that failure for the bumblebee to respond to thermal changes and expand their northern range underscores the idea that bumblebees are susceptible to climate change.
_	One of Harvey's former lovers, the writer Mark Matousek (1997), said that: "I do know that the idea that she's homophobic is completely ridiculous.
_	The 6LoWPAN concept originated from the idea that "the Internet Protocol could and should be applied even to the smallest devices," and that low-power devices with limited processing capabilities should be able to participate in the Internet of Things.
_	In this European or worldwide context Menasse criticises in particular the deficits in democratic policies and the idea that these deficits are structurally determined, which obscures the prospects of possible alternatives.
_	"Fargo" is playing with the idea that there is no such thing as an unimportant story, only the moments between collisions when we’re not truly living."
_	As he said of his work, "my whole career is based on the idea that the formula doesn't matter, the thing that counts is what you do with the formula; that is to say, it is a matter of style."
_	According to Silent Contest, the United States and other Western nations have never abandoned the idea that they wish to "Westernize" or even split China — spreading pro-Western propaganda under the banner of democracy, freedom, and human rights, to try to ultimately have China's political system reform along the lines of Western democratic countries.
_	For the voice acting, the team wanted "natural, subtle performances", which proved difficult as many of the actors "had in their head the idea that because video games are animated their performances needed to be animated", explained motion capture director Navid Khonsari.
_	In this 2-volume study, based on the idea that child development recapitulates human evolution,Hall took on a variety of issues and synthesized scholarship from a wide range of disciplines.
_	Each character in "Soulcalibur" was designed around the idea that they could be viewed as a real person could, and to this end, motion creator Masataka Ishiguro emphasized the arm and leg movements for each character in relation to their weapon, wanting players to "feel the individual motions and the realism within the game"
_	Fellow acting student Bodhi Elfman gave him a book about Scientology from which Beghe was introduced to the idea that "technology" developed by L. Ron Hubbard could yield superhuman abilities.
_	Promoting the idea that virtue, masculinity and good luck flowed from within rather than from a piece of horn, they enlisted top businessmen and role model figures.
_	The operation of the FEPC supported the idea that "economic rights can be obtained principally by activity in the economic sphere: through education, protest, self-help, and, at times, intimidation."
_	After playing music for a toy drive with the Firehouse Five, Mickey has the idea that he can trade his harmonica for the chain.
_	According to "Truth and Sight: Generalizing without Universalizing", "with the type of psychology that the awareness of deceit creates, the idea that what is seen is more truthful than what is reported in speech seems an obvious way in order to bypass human...deceit".
_	In 2015, Daley founded 'Be Great Do Good,' an initiative aimed at promoting the idea that an athlete can be great on the field, whilst doing good off it.
_	Laura Mulvey's writing and filmmaking launched a flourishing of feminist filmmaking based on the idea that conventional Hollywood narrative reinforced gender norms and a patriarchal gaze.
_	Controversy with other participants in the underground press movement in the Bay Area developed when some of the "Dock of the Bay" staff were involved in a side project to launch a separate paper to be called the "San Francisco Sex Review" with the idea that profits from sex ads could be used to subsidize "Dock of the Bay" and other New Left projects in San Francisco.
_	It will be the first edition where the European Korfball Championship is split into an A-Championship and a B-Championship, with the idea that a certain number of teams will relegate from the A-Championship to the B-Championship after each edition, and a certain number of teams from the B-Championship will be promoted.
_	In 1970 Akil joined John Liebeskind, an assistant professor at UCLA who was interested in the neurobiology of pain, and more specifically focused on the neural circuitry of phantom pain, and the idea that phantom pain was not a purely physical phenomenon, but had a psychological role as well.
_	It rests on the idea that sexual assault is caused (either in part or in full) by the woman wearing revealing clothing or acting in a sexually provocative manner, before refusing consent to sex, and thereby absolving the perpetrator of guilt.
_	The concept of Southern hospitality has also been examined as a reflection of the deeply held religious beliefs of the region; the idea that one should be good to strangers is an outgrowth of such Biblical parables as the Good Samaritan.
_	He develops theories and systems pertaining to intelligent behavior using a unified methodology, at the heart of which is the idea that learning has a central role in intelligence.
_	When representing empty categories in trees, linguists use a null symbol to depict the idea that there is a mental category at the level being represented, even if the word(s) are being left out of overt speech.
_	Furthermore, they have a learning centered pedagogy, which promotes the idea that there are multiple entry points to engage the students in learning.
_	"The album was inspired by the idea that floodplains...will experience new life after a catastrophe, just as cultures that undergo great difficulty will experience creative fertility."
_	He discouraged the idea that all public servants were corrupt, saying:
_	God is, to me, pretty much a myth created over time to deny the idea that we're all responsible for our own actions."
_	Other proposals that allow for backwards time travel but prevent time paradoxes, such as the Novikov self-consistency principle, which would ensure the timeline stays consistent, or the idea that a time traveler is taken to a parallel universe while his original timeline remains intact, do not qualify as "chronology protection".
_	Aschoff's work in the field of chronobiology introduced the idea that shifting one's light-dark cycle can result in harmful effects, such as correlations with mental illness.
_	Social capitalism as a theory challenges the idea that socialism and capitalism are mutually exclusive.
_	Out of these debates developed the idea that bare insight suffices to reach liberation, by discerning the Three marks (qualities) of (human) existence (tilakkhana), namely dukkha (suffering), anatta (non-self) and anicca (impermanence).
_	Walker put forward the idea that, absent any obvious signs of rifting on the surface, the presence of other volcanic features that are also associated with dyke intrusions (such as elongated cinder cones and linearly-aligned fissure vents) should also be taken to represent the presence of a rift zone-like processes in the given region.
_	Saskia Hamilton, the editor of Lowell's "Letters", notes, "Lithium treatment relieved him from suffering the idea that he was morally and emotionally responsible for the fact that he relapsed.
_	The lyrics discussed the inadequacy of modern criminal law, and the idea that most prisoners in western society were political prisoners because the concept of private property was an invention to protect the wealthy.
_	Poincaré swiftly proposed the idea that it is the ether modifying itself, and not the bodies acquiring mass, which came to contradict the older theories (based on a perfectly immovable ether).
_	Other historians have disputed the idea that there was a deliberate release of smallpox virus and/or suggest that it arrived with visitors to Australia other than the First Fleet.
_	The producer also suggested the idea that the tenor collaborate with folksinger John Denver on the album's most successful number, "Perhaps Love."
_	It took a while for Emily to be comfortable with the idea that Alison was her sister, not her daughter.
_	Of course, Betty's all freaked out by the idea that he has slept with hundreds of women (which has Betty hallucinating at the poetry slam that evening after she sees one hugging Matt and then sees every one of them wearing t-shirts with a number on them) and even wanted to be friends again, but Matt says that the only girl he wants in his life is Betty.
_	The scholarship challenges the idea that the economic and social statuses and the assigned roles of people with disabilities are the inevitable outcomes of their condition."
_	The posture may convey the idea that he is giving birth to the beings radiating from him, though none of them are near his lower area.
_	This book challenges the idea that myths are just quaint fables from the past to entertain and distract people from modern anxieties.
_	"From this Ramírez developed the idea that literature should play a part in the progress of Mexican society and democracy."
_	At the core of biotope preservation is the idea that if civic life is surrounded by a rich profusion of nature whose background is in local history and culture, it is improved by protecting nature and preserving the landscape.
_	However, according to the American Cancer Society, "available scientific evidence does not support the idea that hypnosis can influence the development or progression of cancer."
_	Vandar attempts to torture them with the goal of learning about the 'mistakes' in their histories so that he can 'correct' them in his timeline, but Kirk mockingly informs Vandar that his actions prove that he is nothing more than the caveman he was at the start, incapable of considering the idea that progress might be possible in any way other than beating his opponent to death.
_	Other indications also reinforce the idea that "f"("T") can be defined only if "f" is defined on the spectrum of "T".
_	They focus on the idea that we rely on other sources to form our ideas of our surroundings.
_	In this broader mode of inquiry, his work pioneered the idea that behaviors depend on the social and physical context.
_	Therefore, the theory proposes the idea that once the child has developed basic knowledge on gender behaviors they will begin to construct gender schemas.
_	Obviously that wasn't something that "EastEnders" could delve too much into, but you got the idea that she was going through hard times.
_	The couple went their separate ways after high school – with the idea that they would get back together.
_	Billy Graham called being gay "a sinister form of perversion," and floated the idea that "AIDS is a punishment from God."
_	Oscar and Big Bird were specifically created for the reshooting of the "Street" scenes with the idea that they would be able to interact with the human characters.
_	Though originally written as a repudiation of the idea that computers work like minds, it is not a stretch to also argue from this position that minds do not work like computers.
_	Gavin Menzies's book "", which argues for the idea that Chinese sailors discovered America, has also been categorized as a work of pseudohistory.
_	Cave is just a few minutes' walk from the sea, the lack of marine shells from early cultural deposits in this cave supports the idea that there was a substantial land shelf around the time of the Last Glacial Maximum, when estimates place sea levels at below present or possibly lower.
_	Philosopher of science Paul Feyerabend advanced the idea of epistemological anarchism, which holds that there are no useful and exception-free methodological rules governing the progress of science or the growth of knowledge, and that the idea that science can or should operate according to universal and fixed rules is unrealistic, pernicious and detrimental to science itself.
_	fr·ee's projects embrace diversity and the idea that design should find sustainable solutions which ensure economic viability and social/environmental integrity.
_	Recent contributions however have criticized the idea that transplanted legal institutions remained intact and have documented that indeed they evolve moved by how each country solves the trade-off between the uncertainty of judge-made law and the bias possibly injected into civil law by inefficient political institutions.
_	Nogi was understandably wary of the idea that this could be a set up, or ambush, however he decided to advance on Tainan that night, entering the city the next morning.
_	In To Perpetual Peace, Kant put forth the idea that democracies do not fight wars because leaders were too worried about re-election.
_	Semantic integration mechanisms involve various hub sites listed above, which contradicts the idea that there is one center where all integration occurs.
_	The older arguments included the idea that black people were not as valiant in the pre-mortal life and that they had "inherent inferiority."
_	A study with the Mars Orbiter Laser Altimeter, Thermal Emission Imaging System (THEMIS) and the Mars Orbiter Camera (MOC) support the idea that Warrego Valles was formed from precipitation.
_	This (fairly cynical) interpretation leads logically to the idea that Marxism or Marxism–Leninism is itself a character mask, by which leftists who are desirous of power and influence which they do not have, disguise their real motives.
_	In several circumstances, however, the broader ideological concerns surrounding voter fraud focus on the idea that fraud or any form of misrepresentation is inherent in the electoral system.
_	Corresponding with the idea that art from BAM was a "radical reordering of the western cultural aesthetic," Shange herself has described her atypical writing style.
_	James C. Miller favored the idea that everybody should have the possibility to vote on any question themselves or to appoint a representative who could transmit their inquiries.
_	Many Native Americans are sensitive to the idea that "Columbus discovered" the land they lived in.
_	Most generally the Karshes dispute the idea that the main events and developments in the region stem from the machinations of the great powers, especially Britain and France.
_	By the mid 1890s, Tesla was working on the idea that he might be able to conduct electricity long distance through the Earth or the atmosphere, and began working on experiments to test this idea including setting up a large resonance transformer magnifying transmitter in his East Houston Street lab.
_	The argument relies heavily on the principle of bivalence: the idea that any proposition is either true or false.
_	The Nazi regime fostered the idea that the Jews were the masterminds behind all oppositional political force.
_	He established the principle of faunal succession, the idea that each strata of sedimentary rock would contain particular types of fossils, and that these would succeed one another in a predictable way even in widely separated geologic formations.
_	It contains themes central to many of Greeley's novels, including the importance of Irish Catholicism as a fundamental element of Irish culture, and the idea that family loyalty can be both loving and realistic at the same time.
_	In his 1976 Massachusetts Institute of Technology research funded by National Institutes of Health, National Aeronautic and Space Administration, and the Spencer Foundation, Held worked with the idea that babies would rather focus on a pattern they can see than a "fuzzy pattern."
_	Founded in 2003, Skyhook originally began by geolocating Wi-Fi access points and evolved with the idea that hybrid positioning technology, which incorporates Wi-Fi, GPS, cell towers, IP address and device sensors, could improve device location.
_	When it emerged in political forums, Taiwanese people began to become familiar with the idea that “Tongzhi" people being a part of their culture.
_	Growing support on the ground in Libya for the idea that a return to the 1951 Constitution could best serve a transition to a unified and politically stable country was recorded since 2011.
_	Though the conclusion she came to – that there was an orbital motion of galaxies around a particular pole – was disproven, the idea that galaxies were moving held true and sparked further research.
_	It was also shown in the 1980s that immunosuppressive therapies could slow disease progression, further supporting the idea that type 1 diabetes is an autoimmune disorder.
_	This Jørgensen–Bloomstrand model was ovethrown by Werner who introduced the idea that coordination complexes feature metal atoms of octahedral and tetrahedral shapes, with ammonia and other ligands attached individually to the metal.
_	In this manner, technoliberalism has some links to neo-liberalism, yet with some core differences; "While Adam Smith conceived of a market that was in a way a natural and ineradicable part of the landscape (based on the human propensity 'to truck, barter and exchange'), and neoliberal thought continues to see the market in this way, technoliberalism holds up the idea that such complex systems can be contrived in their entirety"
_	There are also those who support the valuation of nature from a purely practical standpoint, expressed in the idea that "something is better than nothing."
_	Arguing against the idea that high union wages necessarily make manufacturing uncompetitive in a globalized economy is labor lawyer Thomas Geoghegan.
_	He noted that for him, the episode was based on the idea that you have to have empathy for your partner.
_	Ampuero remembered that “the JHSWP wasn’t a Punto Cero of military training like the ones that are in Cuba, Bulgaria, Libya, but a school of ideological thinking, but many others started believing in the idea that the only way was to resort to arms.
_	The Chinese population is extremely dispersed, according to Rob Lewis, a senior demographer at the Greater London Authority: "The reason for their thin spread all over London, is because of the idea that you want to set up a Chinese restaurant that's a little way away from the next one."
_	These results confirm the idea that terminally ill patients can benefit from logotherapy in coping with death.
_	The argument, as presented by Cicero, calls upon the idea that an event is 'co-fated' with other events.
_	The MP appeals to the idea that the language ability in humans shows signs of being incorporated under an optimal design with exquisite organization, which seems to suggest that the inner workings conform to a very simple computational law or a particular mental organ.
_	Pedersen came up with the name based on the idea that when the lights are out in Disneyland, anything can happen.
_	A Nilotic fauna has been found in fossils associated with Lake Suguta, which endorses the idea that the lake was formerly connected with Lake Turkana and the Nile.
_	Fennell then came up with the idea that the Governor General should consider lending her name to the women's hockey championship cup, as Lord Stanley had done years before for the men's hockey championship.
_	The first line of the third quatrain extends the conceit of the Platonic theory, the idea that the perceptions of reality are merely reflections of the essential reality of forms.
_	The principle of acceleration, namely the idea that small changes in demand can produce large changes in output, is an older phenomenon which has been used since the early 1900s.
_	The hare and the tortes layd a wager of their speed ..." shows us a cupid and tortoise outpacing the hare and exemplifying the idea that the love which is steady and constant will ultimately win the race.
_	Additionally, the thicknesses of "Citipati" and "Deinonychus" eggshells are almost identical, and since shell thickness correlates with egg volume, this further supports the idea that the eggs of these two animals were about the same size.
_	The scheme was based on the idea that computer users are much more likely to abuse a resource if the cost of abusing the resource is negligible: the underlying reason spam has become so rampant is that sending an e-mail has minuscule cost for spammers.
_	In 1928, as Under-Secretary of State to Secretary of State Frank Kellogg in the Calvin Coolidge administration, Clark wrote the "Clark Memorandum on the Monroe Doctrine", which repudiated the idea that the United States could arbitrarily use military force in Latin America.
_	Additionally, he introduces the idea that some words must have had Dacian roots.
_	The New Testament exhibits a tension between two aspects of grace: the idea that grace is from God is sufficient to cover any sin as well as offer redemption (except the Unforgivable sin) and the idea that grace does not free humans from their responsibility to behave morally.
_	Tweedy was quoted by the editor in the October 1896 volume of "Popular Science Monthly" for disclaiming the idea that "women's suffrage is proposed as a panacea for social evils, or that it will usher in a millennial condition.
_	In her introduction, Dove defended the idea that poets should be politically committed: "[W]e poets cannot afford to shit ourselves away in our convalescent homes, boning our specialized fools, while the barbarians — no matter if they are religious fanatics, materialistic profitmongers, crazy silver-tongued niggas sleeping in libraries, or merely more talented MFA drop-outs who actually care about 'art' — continue to sharpen their broadswords.
_	Moving on to Stanford University Guth formally proposed the idea of cosmic inflation in 1981, the idea that the nascent universe passed through a phase of exponential expansion that was driven by a positive vacuum energy density (negative vacuum pressure).
_	The song, "My Bra," is based around the idea that we can be supportive, uplifting presences — er, "bras" — in each other's lives.
_	His recommendation centered around the idea that tears in the rotator cuff should be treated surgically when the cuff was torn more than 50% of the thickness or when substantial thinning of the rotator cuff is identified.
_	Current research supports the idea that there are three different aspects of attitudes captured by current indirect measures that could be outside of conscious awareness: the source, the content, and the impact of an attitude.
_	Freud's postulation is countered by the idea that societal factors, such as gender roles, may play a major role in the development of mental illness.
_	Although the case was eventually decided on other grounds, the idea that the expenses should have increased the basis of the business as capital expenses, with no immediate deduction but the potential for depreciation losses over time may also have influenced the court.
_	A talented actor, he had the idea that a play about local hero Tada Kasuke would help educate people about people’s rights.
_	In May 2015, Amell revealed he had discussions with DC Entertainment to portray the character on "Constantine", a show that was initially not depicted as existing in the shared universe created by The CW series, saying, "The reason that I was going to guest star on "Constantine", at least the idea that we were throwing around was <nowiki>[</nowiki>Constantine's] an expert when it comes to the Lazarus Pit, which is now something that is a part of and will continue to be a part of "Arrow"."
_	All of these definitions refer to the idea that femicide is unique from non-gendered descriptions of murder and homicide.
_	Given this controversy, the best one can say is that the idea that habitual alcohol drinking was a disease had become more acceptable by the middle of the nineteenth century, although many writers still argued it was a vice, a sin, and not the purview of medicine but of religion.
_	In his novel "In the Heart of a Fool" (1918), White fully developed the idea that reform remained the soundest ally of property rights.
_	Tarasov also advocated the idea that the dictatorship of soviet bureaucracy, counter-revolutionary by nature, is doomed to failure due to its foreign policy – the policy of rejection of the world revolution, the policy of "peaceful competition with capitalism" (which manifested itself in the dissolution of Comintern by Stalin).
_	Parsons elaborated upon the idea that each of these systems also developed some specialized symbolic mechanisms of interaction analogous to money in the economy, like influence in the social community.
_	In addition, Hick, Smith and other pluralists balk at the idea that an all-loving God would condemn some people to hell, nor that anyone actually deserves to be damned; he then quotes CS Lewis:
_	He begins with the idea that the best government provides an active and "happy" life for its people.
_	He rejected the idea that the Austrians would cross to the Danube's north bank and attack his supply lines.
_	The very short, fused metatarsus of "Balaur" and enlarged first claw, strange even by dromaeosaur standards, are thought to be consistent with these newer studies, lending further support to the idea that "Balaur" was a predator.
_	She eventually rebels against the idea that she should be completely domestic and care for her father as he becomes an old man.
_	Although the subject matter was no longer directly relevant to life in the Babylonian academies, the Gemara was motivated by the idea that the study of the laws of the Temple service is a substitute for the service itself.
_	In this essay, Nietzsche attacks both the historicism of man (the idea that man is created through history) and the idea that one can possibly have an objective concept of man, since a major aspect of man resides in his subjectivity.
_	Nietzsche expands the idea that the essence of man dwells not inside of him, but rather above him, in the following essay, "Schopenhauer als Erzieher" ("Schopenhauer as Educator").
_	The Corps encourages the idea that "Marine" is an earned title and most Marine Corps personnel take to heart the phrase "Once a Marine, Always a Marine".
_	Kendall and Smith's original four tests were hypothesis tests, which took as their null hypothesis the idea that each number in a given random sequence had an equal chance of occurring, and that various other patterns in the data should be also distributed equiprobably.
_	A study by Susan Birch and Paul Bloom involving Yale undergraduate students used the curse of knowledge concept to explain the idea that the ability of people to reason about another person's actions is compromised by the knowledge of the outcome of an event.
_	However the idea that Gaumata was a fabrication is nonetheless appealing because "it was vital for a man like Darius, who had no particular rights to the throne, to invent a character (Gaumāta) condemned for his acts against gods and men."
_	In summation, Booth's reaction to Sonnet 35 is that "the facts the poem reports should make the speaker seem admirable in a reader's eyes; the speaker's manner, however, gives conviction to the idea that he is worthy of the contempt he says he deserves."
_	The sprite multiplexing technique is based on the idea that while the hardware may only support a finite number of sprites, it is sometimes possible to re-use the same sprite "slots" more than once per frame or scanline.
_	Recent evidence supports the idea that the temporal pole bilaterally is the convergence zone for unimodal semantic representations into a multimodal representation.
_	The census supports the idea that the population of Rochford is older and the area is home to families and older people without dependent children rather than young single people or new families as there was 49 families without dependent children in 2011 apposed to 39 with dependent children.
_	Williams was inspired by Winters's ingenuity, realizing, he said, "that anything is possible, that anything is funny He gave me the idea that it can be free-form, that you can go in and out of things pretty easily."
_	Although the ground work for Apartheid began earlier, the report provided support for the idea that the maintenance of white superiority would require support from social institutions.
_	Geologist Martin Lockley describes Brand's Salamander trackway study as "seriously flawed" and notes that Brand links the underwater tracks theory to the idea that the Grand Canyon was formed entirely by a catastrophic, biblical-style flood, a view which Lockley calls geologically naive and disingenuous.
_	She received her PhD in the History of Consciousness in 1974 from the University of California, Santa Cruz, under the direction of Gregory Bateson, whose own work was predicated on the idea that "the lunatic, the lover, and the poet/Are of imagination all compact"1
_	Theistic evolution was the idea that God intervened in the process of evolution, to guide it in such a way that the living world could still be considered to be designed.
_	Democritus accepted most of Parmenides' arguments, except for the idea that change is an illusion.
_	European astronomy was so much judged worth consideration that numerous Chinese authors developed the idea that the Chinese of antiquity had anticipated most of the novelties presented by the missionaries as European discoveries, for example, the rotundity of the Earth and the "heavenly spherical star carrier model."
_	This is consistent with the idea that Africa and India were once part of the same ancient supercontinent, called Gondwanaland, which eventually became part of the later supercontinent, .
_	Deshe and Diamond founded the company on the idea that SafeAuto could serve this market, which includes high-risk drivers and drivers who require an SR-22 that other companies were hesitant to insure, better than any other insurance company could.
_	Among the starting points and basic assumptions of post-development thought is the idea that a middle-class, Western lifestyle and all that goes with it (which might include the nuclear family, mass consumption, living in suburbia and extensive private space), may neither be a realistic nor a desirable goal for the majority of the world's population.
_	Sztybel bases his theory, in part, on the idea that sentient beings are ends-in-themselves, a theory of emotional cognition which verifies that some things really are good or bad for sentient beings.
_	Research exploring the idea that blocking these receptors would disrupt the creation of proteins necessary for consolidating fearful memories in the amygdala.
_	Because of the disparity in location and time of the many referred teeth, researchers have cast doubt on the idea that they all belong to the same genus or species.
_	Some of the Buddha's meditative techniques were shared with other traditions of his day, but the idea that ethics are causally related to the attainment of "religious insight" (Sanskrit: prajñā) was original.
_	The conceptual purity of this definition, based on the concept of energy transferred as work as an ideal notion, relies on the idea that some frictionless and otherwise non-dissipative processes of energy transfer can be realized in physical actuality.
_	Central to the understanding of the development of technoself studies as a field of research is the idea that human identity is shaped by the adoption of new technologies and the relationship between humans and technology.
_	This strategy was designed to convey to American voters the idea that Bush could be trusted to be tough on terrorism while Kerry would be "uncertain in the face of danger."
_	In the book Heath criticizes the idea that tax-paying is inherently different from consumption, and that the idea of a tax freedom day is flawed:
_	"Of all the delightfully improbable scenarios depicted in "Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure" – from Napoleon Bonaparte causing havoc on a waterslide to Billy the Kid and Socrates (aka "So-crayts", of course) picking up chicks in a California mall to George Carlin acting in a film alongside Keanu Reeves and a member of the Go-Go's – none would have seemed more unlikely on its release than the idea that one day, with much media fanfare, the public would be celebrating the film's 25th anniversary.
_	After being arrested several times and travelling throughout Italy, Bianchi became editor of "La Scintilla" in 1910; he launched the idea that PSI and syndicalists should reunite on electoral lists for the expected administrative elections.
_	Negative reinforcement follows the idea that getting rid of an unpleasant hedonic motivation that animals will move towards acquiring a pleasurable stimulus and attempt to end or escape a painful or uncomfortable stimulus.
_	It doesn't fit with the idea that this person is different in some way that we could notice and protect ourselves."
_	I always wanted to project the idea that we weren't "Dallas", it was a different scale from
_	He posited the idea that this awareness was connected to the order colors came up in the spectrum, starting with longest wavelengths.
_	The "New Rhetoric" is founded on the idea that "since argumentation aims at securing the adherence of those to whom it is addressed, it is, in its entirety, relative to the audience to be influenced" (1969, p. 19).
_	In contrast, the day of the cycle given in the Chinese documents is compatible with the months that they state, reinforcing the idea that the month on the Japanese document is incorrect.
_	This evidence supports the idea that bright plumage is an “honest” signal involved in mating.
_	"Her work titles- Fear and Security, Keep Under Control, Information Failure- reinforce the idea that these stage-set-like, micro-theatrical scenes are visualized thought, visual aphorisms, emblematic abstractions.
_	Stemming from a long tradition of Christian apocalyptic thought, we now have the idea that the beginning was a golden age.
_	The flashbulb memory concept is derived from the idea that high emotional arousal, in conjunction with surprise, stress, and significance, will produce a vivid, accurate memory of the moment someone learns of an event.
_	The subject of Fourier series investigates the idea that an 'arbitrary' periodic function is a sum of trigonometric functions with matching periods.
_	In association with the names of glacial geologists grouped in this area, it was named by the United Kingdom Antarctic Place-Names Committee (UK-APC) in 1971 after Ignaz Venetz-Sitten (known as Venetz, 1788–1859), a Swiss engineer and glacial geologist who, in 1821, first expressed in detail the idea that alpine glaciers were formerly much more extensive.
_	A lot of the evidence supporting the idea that fluids should be withheld from people with pulmonary contusion came from animal studies, not clinical trials with humans; human studies have had conflicting findings on whether fluid resuscitation worsens the condition.
_	There is also the idea that one is not speaking in the correct manner of legitimate Mayan dialect, which also causes for more differences in the accent and overall language of the area.
_	Using case studies, the speech and article challenged the idea that equity markets are efficient.
_	Thayer, following Charles Darwin, was "swept up in the idea that every animal had evolved to perfectly live in its surroundings", but was emotionally unable to accept the other "half" of Darwin's view of animal coloration:
_	Thus, Searle attacks the idea that thought can be equated with the following of a set of syntactic rules.
_	Bastian is remembered as one of the pioneers of the concept of the 'psychic unity of mankind' – the idea that all humans share a basic mental framework.
_	Discussing this and similar recorded ceremonies, Boswell questions what they represent, if they reflect homosexuality, and ponders if these are "marriage" ceremonies, in doing so rejecting the idea that they represent ceremonies of adoption or "spiritual fraternity".
_	He stresses the idea that the effectiveness of the drug lay in its ability to create warmth.
_	Already around 1915 he had the idea that this language needed an internal history and was spoken by Elves whom his invented character Eärendil meets during his journeys.
_	Searle has objections to the idea that computer programs might ever produce mind, but the idea that mentality involves computation can be traced through the history of Western philosophy where it has long been explored in the context of trying to explain human reason in terms of formal logical systems.
_	After first embracing the idea of reducing everything to logical atoms ("Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus"), Wittgenstein later rejected the idea that human language games should be formulated as formal systems ("Philosophical Investigations").
_	"The People's Choice", a book based on this study presented the theory of "the two-step flow of communications", which later came to be associated with the so-called "limited effects model" of mass media: the idea that ideas often flow from radio and print to local "opinion leaders" who in turn pass them on to those with more limited political knowledge, or "opinion followers."
_	Col. Robert L. Stevens, the President of the Camden and Amboy Railroad, conceived the idea that an all-iron rail would be better suited for building a railroad.
_	The lyrics of "You'll Need Somebody on Your Bond" deal with "the idea that we will all need a legally binding guarantee to gain access to heaven" and that Jesus as our advocate "will provide us with a guarantee or bond, if we follow His ways".
_	The "Platonic doctrine of recollection" or "anamnesis", is the idea that we are born possessing all knowledge and our realization of that knowledge is contingent on our discovery of it.
_	The idea was taken up in the British Israelism of John Wilson, who adopted and promoted the idea that the "European Race, in particular the Anglo-Saxons, were descended from certain Scythian tribes, and these Scythian tribes (as many had previously stated from the Middle Ages onward) were in turn descended from the Ten Lost Tribes of Israel."
_	In March 2010, Autism Speaks said it would not completely abandon the idea that vaccines could cause autism and that it would support "research to determine whether subsets of individuals might be at increased risk for developing autism symptoms following vaccination".
_	All formulations of PAR have in common the idea that research and action must be done 'with' people and not 'on' or 'for' people.
_	This led Calovius to deny as a heresy the idea that Roman Catholics or Calvinists could be partakers of salvation.
_	Gunnar Rudberg was the first who elaborated upon the idea that Plato's attempt to realize his political ideas in the city of Syracuse could have heavily inspired the Atlantis account.
_	In 2003 he founded Friends of Wisdom, an international group of people sympathetic to the idea that academic inquiry should help humanity acquire more wisdom by rational means.
_	On his previous trip, though, his daughter's question, about an inland hilltop fortress on neighboring Lefkas island — "But why did they build it "here"?" — had led to the thought that sea levels in the area might once have been much higher, that in turn leading to the idea that higher sea levels might once have cut off the Paliki peninsula from its mainland, Kefalonia, making Paliki an island.
_	In his closing argument delivered on 13March 1936, Birkett reiterated the defence's case that, although the victims were indeed two women who had been murdered, the remains were not those of Isabella Ruxton and Mary Jane Rogerson, as the Crown had alleged they were, and that the idea that the motive for Isabella's death had been Ruxton's suspicions of his wife's infidelity was merely conjecture.
_	One can move from dingbat to dingbat on an income scale that slides up and down, and the very flimsiness of these buildings, which are usually supported on stilts on at least one side to make room for carports, encourages the idea that residing in one is invariably temporary, that the people inside are waiting to bottom out and segue to a Skid Row hotel, hoping for the right Richard Neutra to come on the market or looking for something in between—a guesthouse in the hills, a Silver Lake triplex with a long-term lease, a bungalow in Atwater Village."
_	This doctrine supported the idea that Rome and the church here also afforded primacy over all other churches.
_	This reflects the idea that, at high RMR, deformations will be dominated by intact modulus, whereas at lower RMR weathering and joint infilling will largely control deformation.
_	Many New Agers have adopted James Lovelock's Gaia hypothesis that the Earth acts akin to a single living organism, although have expanded this idea to include the idea that the Earth has consciousness and intelligence.
_	After high school he enrolled and studied for two years at the Chicago Academy of Fine Arts with the idea that he might eventually work as an illustrator.
_	However, Charles Souvay, writing in the "Catholic Encyclopedia", says that the idea that Joachim possessed large herds and flocks cannot be asserted with certainty, as the sources for this are "...of very doubtful value...".
_	The key feature of their theory is the idea that relevance is goal-dependent.
_	Craig Blomberg suggests that the use of the blood money to buy a burial ground for foreigners may hint at the idea that "Jesus' death makes salvation possible for all the peoples of the world, including the Gentiles."
_	Beck asserts that the idea that Howe's trial contributed to the freedom of the press in Canada is a, "myth that has little basis in fact".
_	He also dissuaded Kant from idealism, the idea that reality is purely mental, which most philosophers in the 18th century regarded in a negative light.
_	Senate hearing on income inequality, George Packer singled out Stabenow as the only committee member who pushed back on the idea that it was caused largely by the withdrawal from the workforce of middle-aged people who preferred to collect welfare.
_	The Baptists, quite unlike the Wesleyan Methodists and most notably the Unitarians, did not come to a generally accepted accommodation of the neo-Gothic style and indeed Spurgeon advanced the idea that the Grecian style was most appropriate for church buildings because the New Testament was written in Greek.
_	Biology has largely rejected the idea that evolution is guided in any way, but the evolution of some features is indeed facilitated by the genes of the developmental-genetic toolkit studied in evolutionary developmental biology.
_	While several studies support the idea that "Ube3a-ATS" might be involved in paternal "Ube3a" silencing, other studies contradict this.
_	Foley and Lennon explored the idea that people are attracted to regions and sites where "inhuman acts" have occurred.
_	For example, in their premiere episode, they debunk the idea that psychics can talk to the dead.
_	Within this is the idea that by re-working images, that is giving them attention and shaping and forming them until they are clear as possible then a therapeutic process which Hillman calls "soul making" takes place.
_	In 2009, the organizations came under public scrutiny when a letter written by Unfamiliar Records founder Greg Ipp was republished on the internet - in turn promoting the idea that bigger image-based bands shouldn’t be getting such a huge amount of those finite funds as it leaves relatively little, if any, funding for the smaller up-and-coming bands.
_	Given the variances of demography within the City of Atlanta, the idea that a one-size fits all system of community governance would successfully reflect each community's view is unrealistic.
_	Still, the songs stick with stereotypical gender themes, and they still promote the idea that guys have all the fun fighting and killing".
_	SBYD is based on the idea that sport programs should be intentionally designed to ensure youth have a positive, not negative, experience.
_	Multiple studies have led to the idea that increased dioxin levels can increase one's risk for breast cancer.
_	It has also been suggested by Giorgio Agamben that the term hails from the Islamic fatalism which characterizes Sunnite orthodoxy, i.e. the idea that there are no such things as causality but that God performs every occurrence in the world, meaning that everything including men simply undergoes the workings of God and does not act on its own.
_	While quantifying such overlap between the set of markets associated with each product would be difficult, the measure of proximity uses an outcome-based method founded on the idea that similar products (apples and pears) are more likely to be produced in tandem than dissimilar products (apples and copper wire).
_	Barbara Yorke, Patrick Sims-Williams and David Dumville among others have highlighted how a number of features of the "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle" for the 5th and early 6th centuries clearly contradict the idea that they contain a reliable year-by-year record.
_	Such resemblances went against the idea that it was an authentic national ideology and couldn't be acknowledged by the party.
_	However, the idea that the earth moved around the sun was doubted by most of Copernicus' contemporaries.
_	Further, he rejected the idea that comity must be applied.
_	In "Cartman's Incredible Gift", when a serial killer strikes South Park, Yates becomes enamored with the idea that Cartman has psychic powers that can capture the killer, and dismisses proven criminal science such as fingerprinting and blood analysis as "hocus pocus".
_	Corelli didn't bite her but he was so delighted with the idea that he told her about Bing's suggestion.
_	He has developed the idea that certain preon models may be represented topologically, rather than by treating preons as pointlike particles.
_	"Prebiotic (nutrition)" refers to the idea that consuming a bacterial energy source such as soluble fiber could support the population of health-beneficial bacteria in the large intestine.
_	The reaction range concept is the idea that the genes and the environment control behavior, but with separate upper and lower limits on the strength of that control in each case, a concept now part of basic psychology.
_	According to Edwards, Cavos ridiculed the idea that acoustical properties of a building cannot be ensured by design; he deliberately designed, built and outfitted his theatres for sound.
_	This appears to disprove the idea that the site was abandoned in that period.
_	His particular disagreement was with the idea that there was a systematic long-term (secular) decline in the terms of trade.
_	Harper further challenges the idea that workers are targeted for their exceptional competence.
_	Rudolf Bultmann developed existential biblical hermeneutics, or the idea that each individual can only read and understand the bible from his or her personal existential condition, and the biblical text acquires life only if it can awaken an experience of faith in the reader.
_	Unlike Freud, Reich retained the idea that actual experience, especially sexual experience, was of key significance.
_	The spiral of silence theory is a political science and mass communication theory proposed by the German political scientist Elisabeth Noelle-Neumann, which stipulates that individuals have a fear of isolation, which results from the idea that a social group or the society in general might isolate, neglect, or exclude members due to the members' opinions.
_	""Rooms on Fire is about a girl who goes through a life like I have gone through, where she finally accepts the idea that there never will be those other things in her life.
_	The doctrine of the affections was an elaborate theory based on the idea that the passions could be represented by their outward visible or audible signs.
_	Eleanor and Franklin Roosevelt both endorsed the idea that for poor people, rural life could be healthier than city life.
_	"Embodiment" refers to the idea that the body's internal milieu (a.o. homeostatic and hormonal states) heavily influences the higher 'cognitive' processes in the brain, presumably via the emotional system (see e.g. Antonio Damasio's theory of somatic markers).
_	The design of the university building reflects the idea that mining is a harsh and difficult pursuit – as well as symbolising the entry into the underground world of Pluto through the portico, decorated with 12 columns of the Doric order.
_	One early editor reported that the paper's name came from the idea that the three schools might one day become the University of Ontario.
_	Before the 2003 war, as U.S. Government officials were pushing the idea that Saddam Hussein was in possession of WMD, many people would direct reporters toward David Kay to reinforce their point of view.
_	Among advocates of "ecospirituality" and the "New Story," he is famous for proposing the idea that a deep understanding of the history and functioning of the evolving universe is a necessary inspiration and guide for our own effective functioning as individuals and as a species.
_	Hoorn, Enkhuizen and Medemblik rejected the idea that commissioned officers should be appointed by the States of Holland instead of the cities themselves.
_	The Mongolian communist government promoted the idea that all Mongols should be assimilated to the Khalkha subgroup, rejecting the idea of an inclusive Greater Mongolia state as disloyal to Mongolia.
_	Still underlying these more conceptual uses is the idea that infrastructure provides organizing structure and support for the system or organization it serves, whether it is a city, a nation, a corporation, or a collection of people with common interests.
_	This approach is based on the idea that behavioral or shape changes of a cell bear information about the underlying mechanisms that generate these changes.
_	Transient Receptor Potential (TRP) ion channels introduce the idea that the expression of specific “molecular sensors” govern sensitivity to certain stimuli.
_	He sought contacts and reference literature that could fulfill his objectives and open the minds of people to the idea that work could be made easier and more effective.
_	They thought that the film could be rated "W" for "What the Hell?", thereby reflecting the idea that it was "[w]eird" but "not trippy enough to be interesting".
_	With understanding, compassion, and tenderness he explains that he cannot personally refuse to fight, and comforts her with the idea that no one can take him until it is his time to go.
_	For "Where the Streets Have No Name", he wrote the lyrics in response to the idea that, in Belfast, a person's religion and income can be deduced based on the street they live on.
_	Hansen did not respond to the "Esquire" article when the "Houston Chronicle" asked for comment, but deferred to his spokeswoman, who called the idea that Hansen would dictate police action "preposterous".
_	However, other reward systems are being created based on the idea that improving a teacher's capacity to learn and improve upon their practice will have a direct impact on student achievement.
_	Bernstein, founder of the securesoftware mailing list and long a promoter of the idea that full disclosure is the best means of fostering security, publicly announced 44 of them with sample exploit code.
_	Separation of powers is based on the idea that no branch of government should be able to exert power over any other branch without due process of law; each branch of government should have a check on the powers of the other branches of government, thus creating a regulative balance among all branches of government.
_	Gold quickly put forth the idea that pulsars are highly magnetized rotating neutron stars, which form as a result of a supernova at the end of the life of stars more massive than about .
_	The United States Declaration of Independence, the French Declaration of the Rights of Man and of the Citizen, the African Charter of Human Rights, and the Constitution of South Africa all present the idea that human beings should be free from tyranny and oppression.
_	Central to his work was the idea that religion was at the heart of every culture, especially Western culture and his writings, including "The Age of Gods" (1928), "Religion and Culture" (1948) and "Religion and the Rise of Western Culture" (1950), reflected this view.
_	He then proceeds to feed into the idea that he is African-American.
_	Central to this theory is the idea that as an individual seeks to form a coherent and meaningful impression of another person, previous impressions significantly influence or color his or her interpretation of subsequent information.
_	He is also the first linguist to have promulgated seriously the idea that creole languages are in no way inferior to other languages.
_	Du Bois-Reymond developed the idea that a living tissue, such as muscle, might be regarded as composed of a number of "electric molecules," and that the electric behavior of the muscle was the outcome of the behavior of these elementary units.
_	Slowly Sreedharan understands that this is because she feels rejected and unloved by her family for sending her to boarding school for many years and that coupled with the idea that her lover had ditched her who was the only relief for her.
_	Anthropologist C. Loring Brace and geneticist Joseph Graves disagree with the idea that cluster analysis and the correlation between self-reported race and genetic ancestry support biological race.
_	I never would have imagined removing the idea that this is my first choice meant a character assassination."
_	Corpuscularianism was associated by its leading proponents with the idea that some of the properties that objects appear to have are artifacts of the perceiving mind: "secondary" qualities as distinguished from "primary" qualities.
_	Believing there are many parallel Earths, and that each one develops from the choices that each person makes, Owlman becomes obsessed with the idea that nothing he does can possibly matter, as there will always be parallel worlds where he explored another option.
_	The Emir has promoted the idea that Kuwait should focus its energies, in terms of economic development, on the financial industry.
_	The concept of collective laissez-faire sets out the idea that the law (and the State) should be abstentionist, meaning that the state should allow capital and collective labour to negotiate freely, without extensive legislative interference, unless collective representation is unlikely to yield industrial justice or stability.
_	Alleyne disagrees with the idea that creoles necessarily develop from prior pidgins, and he explains the considerable variation among creoles as the result of differing degrees of acculturation among Africans who came in contact with Europeans.
_	The exception is based on the idea that there is a lower expectation of privacy in motor vehicles due to the regulations under which they operate.
_	The argument that links poverty alleviation to environmental conservation outlines the idea that "gross inequalities that exist between rich and poor in the world have created a situation where many people have to sacrifice environmental thinking just to stay alive."
_	He promoted the idea that the parish should expand its role and its ability to earn income by the provision of both meeting rooms and rentable space.
_	The court considered that Thomas had been regularly informed by all those who had interrogated him that the degree to which he cooperated would determine what happened to him, and that given their position as authority figures, Thomas would have readily perceived that they had the ability to change his situation; indeed, none of the interviewers had done anything to dispel the idea that they would be able to help Thomas.
_	His poetry also carries the idea that nature is a kind thing, living in peaceful co-existence with man.
_	The most significant casualty was the state ideology of "Zion theology," the idea that the god of Israel had chosen Jerusalem for his dwelling-place and that the Davidic dynasty would reign there forever.
_	Jim agreed to support the team with the idea that athletes would visit local Franklin's supermarkets each Saturday morning to meet and greet members of the public.
_	Mediawatch-uk member Vivienne Patterson criticized the video, saying "It's just reinforcing the idea that your worth is defined by your hotness rather than anything else you have to offer, and that can be really damaging for the self-esteem of young girls."
_	This is difficult to reconcile with "The Dying Days", and may support the idea that the novels and audios take place in separate parallel universes.
_	The goal for liberal feminists in the late 1800s and early 1900s was to gain women's suffrage under the idea that they would then gain individual liberty.
_	There is also reference within the book to the idea that "all people, regardless of sex, receive individual vocational calls".
_	How do we reconcile our feeling of free will with the idea that we might be mechanical components of a mechanical universe?
_	Related to this may be Stekel's "elaboration of the idea that everyone, and in particular neurotics, has a peculiar form of sexual gratification which is alone adequate".
_	The SWD also did not provide provisions for special education and in fact, seemed to have the idea that children with special needs would "hinder the typical child's education."
_	In 1895 Masaryk and Kaizl had a disagreement due to Masaryk's criticism of liberalism and his support of the idea that common Czech national identity is rooted from the Czech Hussites; Kaizl instead advocated for the standard European liberal ideology and nationalism.
_	Much was made of the idea that women, no matter how few, had employed such violent means to an end.
_	This approach is based on the idea that the items in a semantic field have specific relations to other items in the same field, and that a metaphor works by re-ordering the relations of a field by mapping them on to the existing relations of another field.
_	On the basis of his experiments, he articulated the idea that reproductive isolation can be caused by differences in presence of microbial symbionts between populations.
_	In "Til There Was You", there's a tender scene from "Brief Encounter" that says more about fate and the serendipity of falling in love in two minutes than this new movie does in two hours . . . "'Til There Was You" hammers away at the idea that people don't find love until they're ready for it.
_	Imperial Manila is a pejorative epithet used by sectors of Philippine society and non-Manileños to express the idea that all the affairs of the Philippines, whether in politics, economy and business or culture, are decided by what goes on in the capital region, Metro Manila without considering the needs of the rest of the country, largely because of centralized government and urbanite snobbery.
_	In particular, the court's decision supports the idea that although a program's object code is derived from the program's source code, an individual possessing the object code does not possess any knowledge of any trade secrets embodied in the source code.
_	Closely related to empiricism is the idea that, to be useful, a scientific law or theory must be testable with available research methods.
_	Testability implies falsifiability, which is the idea that some set of observations could prove the theory to be incorrect .
_	The confrontations between art and science also bring about the idea that while science is firmly set on believing that which can only be proved, the basis for art is that which can be proved and an intuitive sense that can be felt.
_	It turns out that the inhabitants of the planet took on the appearance of the crew members' deceased relatives to inspire the idea that a quarantine regime is needed in this place.
_	In response, Khaki with his partner Troy Jackson formed the Human Positive foundation, an organization which goal is "Justice, Freedom and Dignity for All peoples " and rejects the idea that criticism of the government of Israel is equivalent to anti-Semitism.
_	Hine has spoken of his disillusionment with the idea that all magic "can be formulated in terms of 'techniques' and that the theoretical underpinnings or cultural-historical context" do not matter:
_	Continuous movement and molecular collisions visualised as being like bouncing balls blown by air as used in a lottery can then lead on to showing the possibilities of many Boltzmann distributions and continually changing "distribution of the instant", and on to the idea that when the system changes, dynamic molecules will have a greater number of accessible microstates.
_	Parents also consistently ranked religion at a higher priority than their children, reflecting the idea that parents want in-laws with similar values to them.
_	He believes that the only way to earn people's respect is through wealth, disregarding the idea that respect may come from kindness or talent.
_	In this book Gray espoused the idea that botany was useful not only to medicine, but also to farmers.
_	It is based on the idea that APCs are activated via pattern recognition receptors (PRRs) which recognize evolutionary distant conserved patterns.
_	However, if the object is marked in the [[dative case]] ("ni"), it expresses the idea that the causee was forced to perform the action.
_	Here, Grossman offers an alternative to despair: the idea that, despite such great evil, humanity and good will be the ultimate victors.
_	Simple, often unnoticed, human kindness forms the basis for Grossman's theory, which is to say that despite great evil, small acts of charity reflect the idea that good is both alive and unconquerable no matter what.
_	"Withering away of the state" is a Marxist concept coined by Friedrich Engels referring to the idea that, with realization of the ideals of socialism, the social institution of a state will eventually become obsolete and disappear, as the society will be able to govern itself without the state and its coercive enforcement of the law.
_	Such models are often thought to have been children's toys; nevertheless, the do convey the idea that objects could be pulled on wheels.
_	Under Ribbentrop's guidance, he coordinated the dissemination of Nazi propaganda in Japan, likening German military ideals to Japanese bushido and encouraging the idea that Japan and Germany would share the world.
_	In 1994 Patrick McGrath of "The New York Times" claimed that one of Coetzee's central themes throughout his body of work is the "linkage of language and power, the idea that those without voices cease to signify, figuratively and literally"; McGrath pointed to "Foe" as the "most explicit expression" of that theme.
_	From the 1980s to Kim Dae-jung's presidency in 1998, most South Korean historians of collaborationism agreed with the idea that "the nation's history was kidnapped" at independence "by a clique of pro-Japanese stooges", who were shielded by the United States Army Military Government in Korea and Syngman Rhee from the Anti-Traitors Investigation Committee.
_	The parallels between Hari Seldon and Isaac Asimov found in this book— the last one written by Asimov before his death— and the focus on Hari Seldon as he grows old and dies, strengthen the idea that Asimov considered Seldon his literary alter ego.
_	The dark comedy is used as an allegory for the idea that fear-mongering weakens the war effort and costs lives.
_	Some of the original theory behind this tort was based on the idea that a woman would be more likely to give up her virginity to a man if she had his promise to marry her.
_	Anarchist Alexander Berkman softened his prejudice against homosexuality through his relationship with Emma Goldman and his time spent in jail, where he learned that working class men could be gay, thus debunking the idea that homosexuality was a sign of upper middle class or wealthy exploitation or decadence.
_	I've always felt, I'm trying to get across on this new record, the idea that plastic, we see it as being against nature but it's come out of nature.
_	Claws were applied to gloves, and necklaces were made from teeth, to add to the idea that Cruella enjoyed wearing parts of dead animals.
_	The Greens/Green Party USA (Greens/GPUSA) was founded at the August 1991 Green Gathering in Elkins, West Virginia restructuring the Green Committees of Correspondence with the idea that the Green movement and Green Party would operate as part of a single organization.
_	Arendt argues that together with the systematized, arbitrary cruelty inside the camps, this served the purpose of total domination by eliminating the idea that the arrestees had any political or legal rights.
_	We cling to the idea that success is a simple function of individual merit and that the world in which we grow up and the rules we choose to write as a society don't matter at all."
_	It explores the idea that plants are capable of responding to and learning from stimuli in their surroundings in order to choose and make decisions that are most appropriate to ensure survival.
_	This was to convey the idea that the characters lived in a 'Garden of Courtly Love', which was slightly divorced from the everyday reality represented by Verona.
_	Another major aspect of the African-American Arts Movement was the infusion of the African aesthetic, a return to a collective cultural sensibility and ethnic pride that was much in evidence during the Harlem Renaissance and in the celebration of "Négritude" among the artistic and literary circles in the US, Caribbean, and the African continent nearly four decades earlier: the idea that "black is beautiful".
_	This is the idea that conservation actions must be linked to positive, quantifiable outcomes for the environment.
_	History should not be subjected to the idea that it repeats itself, an unreasonable process that forces historical evidence into convenient patterns.
_	During that year, Norton delivered a controversial speech in which she remarked that while state sovereignty had been misused to defend slavery prior to and during the Civil War, with the end of the war, the United States "lost the idea that the states were to stand against the federal government having too much power over our lives."
_	These included: the opposition to all metaphysics, especially ontology and synthetic "a priori" propositions; the rejection of metaphysics not as wrong but as meaningless (i.e., not empirically verifiable); a criterion of meaning based on Ludwig Wittgenstein's early work (which he himself later set out to refute); the idea that all knowledge should be codifiable in a single standard language of science; and above all the project of "rational reconstruction," in which ordinary-language concepts were gradually to be replaced by more precise equivalents in that standard language.
_	Christian apologists find the idea that the disciples stole the body unconvincing.
_	As a result, she wrote six books in Spanish and Catalan, which have been translated into several languages, all of them explaining daily life and the experiences of everyday people, with the idea that information should not remain only in the hands of television cameras, journalists, and anthropologists.
_	The introduction is a quiet monologue regarding the idea that Atlantis was a highly advanced antediluvian civilization, and that Atlantean colonists were the basis of the mythological gods of ancient times.
_	The quasistatic approximation can be understood through the idea that the sources in the problem change sufficiently slowly that the system can be taken to be in equilibrium at all times.
_	This does not accord with the 16th century descriptions of the St Hubert given above, nor with the FCI standard, but the idea that the St Hubert is much bigger (up to 0.915m, 36 in) than the Bloodhound persisted well into the 20th century, among some St Hubert enthusiasts.
_	This is due to the idea that tips will increase because of the ease of use of a single, higher-denomination bill as the lowest common note in use.
_	The movie's plot is based on the idea that an ancient text called "The Nine Gates of the Kingdom of Shadows", authored by Aristide Torchia along with Lucifer, is the key to raising Satan.
_	A 2017 meta-analysis found an association between head injuries and ALS; however, this association disappeared when the authors considered the possibility of reverse causation, which is the idea that head injuries are an early symptom of undiagnosed ALS, rather than the cause of ALS.
_	Affinity for SAH, however, is unaffected by changes to the P1 sequence, further supporting the idea that the interaction between SAM and the P1 helix is electrostatic in nature.
_	He also wrote several other less well known poems on slavery in the 1780s, many of which attacked the idea that slavery was economically viable.
_	However, a major study by the NWRA (Northern and Western Regional Assembly) of future recreational developments in the area of outdoor pursuits in Counties Galway, Mayo and Roscommon has rejected the idea that the Western Rail Corridor be turned into a walking or cycling route.
_	This goes against ideas about maize as a commoner food and the idea that elites has greater access to a wide variety of resources.
_	"Let's not call any philosophers quantifier variantists unless they are clearly committed to the idea that (most of) the things that exist are completely independent of language."
_	According to Calvin, the idea that man has free will and is able to make choices independently of what God has already determined is based on our limited understanding of God's perfection and the idea that God's purposes can be circumvented.
_	The June 2003 issue of "Nickelodeon Magazine" states that when Hillenburg pitched "SpongeBob" to Nickelodeon, he "had yet to come up with the idea that Mrs. Puff and SpongeBob would be on an endless quest to get SpongeBob a driver's license".
_	He rejected the idea that evil exists in itself, instead regarding it as a corruption of goodness, caused by humanity's abuse of free will.
_	In particular the idea that young women may be captured or struck with a stick to bring them "luck" or fertility suggests a pagan, or at least medieval origin.
_	Luther had uncompromisingly rejected the Roman Catholic doctrine of Transubstantiation, but had replaced it with the idea that Christ is nevertheless substantially present in the physical elements (bread and wine) of the Eucharist.
_	The term "reproducible research" refers to the idea that the ultimate product of academic research is the paper along with the laboratory notebooks and full computational environment used to produce the results in the paper such as the code, data, etc. that can be used to reproduce the results and create new work based on the research.
_	Cecil Gould was the first to point out that in 1573 Veronese also completed works including the enormous "The Feast in the House of Levi" and a large "Madonna del Rosario" (both now in the Accademia, Venice), suggesting "that this fact alone would support the idea that there was a large degree of studio participation."
_	In Buddhism, there is no creator and the Buddha rejected the idea that a permanent, personal, fixed, omniscient deity can exist, linking into the core concept of impermanence (anicca).
_	And he points out that the idea that some kind of title remained in the United Nations is quite at odds, both with the absence of any evidence of vesting, and with complete United Nations silence on this aspect of the matter from 1950 to 1967?...
_	The use of the word "present" alone provides us with the idea that God is now present, which means the speaker has been successful in reconnecting with God.
_	The fraud-on-the-market theory is the idea that stock prices are a function of all material information about the company and its business.
_	Respectable opinion can't bear the idea that she has become a symbol of free speech, which once upon a time was — and still is, when convenient — one of the highest values of the media and the left.
_	This disrepute was worsened by the appearance of the Black Death in 1348, supporting the idea that this dynasty was not supported by God.
_	All of these results contradict the idea that novel, brightly coloured individuals would be more likely to be eaten or attacked by predators.
_	The Virginia Resolutions of 1798 refer to "interposition" to express the idea that the states have a right to "interpose" to prevent harm caused by unconstitutional laws.
_	Nonetheless, expecting the Red Army's resistance to finally collapse and driven by National Socialist military thinking, including the idea that the "will" was key to success, Guderian continued to direct his forces to attack.
_	GATE is a Professional Engineering Institution; a membership association and learned society, and comprises an emerging network of engineers and non-engineers that share the idea that engineers are responsible for changing engineered systems in order to adapt to reducing fossil fuel and other unsustainable resources.
_	The "Gumshoe System" is designed around the idea that investigative scenarios are difficult to run with most role-playing systems.
_	In their history of Trinity College McDowell and Webb observe: "Gwynn's support for the `army' concept was based simply on the idea that military-style discipline would keep unemployed men fit and give them self-respect.
_	Most significantly, he is Boccaccio's source for the idea that all the gods were descended from Demogorgon, which Theodontius himself credited to Pronapides the Athenian.
_	The book is still in circulation today and references to it continue to appear online, resulting in Tsioulkas having unwittingly contributed to the idea that modern Macedonians are descended from Ancient Macedonians and are their true inheritors.
_	Most biologists would accept Daisyworld-style homeostasis as possible, but would certainly not accept the idea that this equates to the whole biosphere acting as one organism.
_	The sense of "antiquitates", the idea that a civilization could be recovered by a systematic exploration of its relics and material culture, in the sense used by Varro and reflected in Josephus' "Antiquities of the Jews" was lost during the Middle Ages, when ancient objects were collected with other appeals, the rarity or strangeness of their materials or simply because they were thought to be endowed with magical or miraculous powers.
_	It is also important to note that the idea that the poet would "feed" his fever would have been quite contrary in Elizabethan England, as the going knowledge at the time was to never feed a fever, based on the Four Humours medical belief.
_	But the idea that the weakness of gravity can easily be demonstrated by suspending a pin using a simple magnet (such as a refrigerator magnet) is fundamentally flawed.
_	Only one thing saved me – the idea that I'm a quite good singer."
_	This was rationalized into the idea that all government not self-imposed is foreign to human nature and human rights.
_	He often denounced the idea that anthropology and sociology are separate areas of study.
_	The guidance was based on the idea that national groups could help encourage local communities to adopt principles that simultaneously protected the environment and helped save developer's money.
_	The north slopes of Latmus are subject to heavy and damaging mudslides, which also would have contributed to the idea that it was a god.
_	He went on to say, "In the song I talk about the bad side of sex as it's been misused in our world, and in the last verse I go back to the idea that it's given by God...sex is a wonderful thing if it follows God's rules -- which is purity before marriage, fidelity after marriage -- where sex gets God's blessing."
_	The one constant throughout is the idea that reality is shaped by powerful and charismatic "dreamers".
_	Following the Glass attack event the idea that the two factions would face off in a multi-man "Luchas de Apuestas" match was suggested by CMLL itself and enforced by all eight making both hair and mask challenges at a CMLL press conference on June 24 Hours after the press conference CMLL held an official contract signing between Rey Escorpión and Último Guerrero for a "Luchas de Apuestas" match with both wrestlers putting their hair on the line, not including any of the six masked wrestlers involved in the storyline.
_	Carolyn Dinshaw argues that the poem may have been a response to accusations that Richard II had a male lover—an attempt to reestablish the idea that heterosexuality was the Christian norm.
_	Krugman dismissed the idea that current marginal rates are a drag on economic growth.
_	In 1838 and 1839, Schleiden and Schwann began promoting the ideas that (1) the basic unit of organisms is the cell and (2) that individual cells have all the characteristics of life, though they opposed the idea that (3) all cells come from the division of other cells.
_	They also state: Labour vouchers would tend to maintain the idea that our human worth is determined by how much or how many goods we can own (or produce).
_	In the late 20th century, the discovery of a subfossil ibis led to the idea that the old accounts actually referred to an ibis species instead.
_	He has become well known as an advocate of the idea that severe mental illness is due to biological factors and not social factors.
_	They presented the idea that true religion was a matter of surrendering to God "who dwells in the heart".
_	According to philosopher Michael Marder, the idea that plants should have rights derives from "plant subjectivity", which is distinct from human personhood.
_	He had organised the army in Italy according to his own ideas, including the idea that army training was necessary even in times of peace - a theory that few followed in this period.
_	This commonly seen model of aromatic rings, namely the idea that benzene was formed from a six-membered carbon ring with alternating single and double bonds (cyclohexatriene), was developed by August Kekulé (see History section below).
_	The "Milkshake Mistake" is the idea that it is a mistake to look at the meaning of or potential of something by looking at the history and original purpose of a product (such as drinking milkshakes for breakfast).
_	It is the idea that humans are motivated to believe whatever confirms their opinions.
_	In 2009, he published articles in "Utilitas" and "Political Studies" defending his "liberty thesis", the idea that nonhuman animals lack an intrinsic interest in freedom.
_	She believes that censorship of such material from adolescents is based on the idea that minors are innocent and exposure to inappropriate media would corrupt them, explaining how this belief has been used as a basis for censorship.
_	Charles conceived the idea that hydrogen would be a suitable lifting agent for balloons having studied the work of Robert Boyle's "Boyle's Law" which was published 100 years earlier in 1662, and of his contemporaries Henry Cavendish, Joseph Black and Tiberius Cavallo.
_	Köhler argued against the idea that direct experience was not measurable or usable.
_	Huángbò’s teaching on this reflected the Indian concept of the tathāgatagarbha, the idea that within all beings is the nature of the Buddha.
_	He is noted for his pointed critiques of the partisan "operative criticism" of previous architectural historians and critics like Bruno Zevi and Siegfried Giedion and for challenging the idea that the Renaissance was a "golden age" as it had been characterised in the work of earlier authorities like Heinrich Wölfflin and Rudolf Wittkower.
_	The biblical history has become increasingly problematic as the archaeological and textual evidence supports the idea that the early Israelites were in fact themselves Canaanites.
_	Judith Butler is one of the most well-known theorists who believe the idea that gender is something that is performed by individuals.
_	Her concept of "gender performativity" is the idea that people choose to perform gender in a context in which we are given very few socially acceptable choices, but can be explained as being similar to what actors do in front of the camera.
_	He supported the idea that the Senate composition should not be determined by population; the view that it should instead be composed of equal numbers of members for each state prevailed in the Connecticut Compromise.
_	The term voluntary conservation captures the idea that those who exercise governance do so consciously and without restriction, in ways that are fully compatible with conserving biodiversity values while they may or not see conservation as the primary objective of their management efforts.
_	Shapiro conveys the idea that telethon was similar to a "secular religion", promoting the concept that "Disability was barely tolerable—and only to be pitied".
_	Nicolas Walter noted the idea that nonviolence might work "runs under the surface of Western political thought without ever quite disappearing".
_	At the 1939 18th Congress, Stalin abandoned the idea that the state would wither away.
_	The Weeper came up with the idea that they roll dice to see who would be chief, the person with the highest roll would go first; the person with the second highest would go second; and the person with the third highest would go third.
_	Then we extend the idea of manipulative materials to the idea that learning is most effective when part of an activity the learner experiences as constructing a meaningful product.
_	That July, he contacted the British government with the idea that he should make an official visit to discuss Germany's intentions for Czechoslovakia.
_	He rejected the "emission theory" of Ptolemaic optics with its rays being emitted by the eye, and instead put forward the idea that light reflected in all directions in straight lines from all points of the objects being viewed and then entered the eye, although he was unable to correctly explain how the eye captured the rays.
_	In 1905, Paul Carnot proposed the idea that a hormone regulates the production of red blood cells.
_	It revolved around the idea that no-one was too sacred to get the piss taken out of."
_	Bruce Harold Lipton (born October 21, 1944 at Mount Kisco, New York), is an American developmental biologist best known for promoting the idea that gene expression can be influenced (via epigenetics) by environmental factors i.e. people have a greater impact on their health than genetic research has previously determined.
_	Sovereignty has been defined by historian Harry Hinsley as "the idea that there is a final and absolute political authority in the political community...and no final and absolute authority exists elsewhere."
_	Preoccupation with fears of having, or the idea that one has, a serious disease based on the person's misinterpretation of bodily symptoms.
_	The background for this is illustrated by Philip's initial response in to the idea that Jesus might be the Messiah: "Nazareth!
_	Feminist scholars such as Amy-Jill Levine support the idea that the addition of women to the male dominated genealogy demonstrates that women have an important role and serves to undermine the patriarchal message of the long list of male begat male.
_	He rejected the idea that local rulers who favoured the British should be given a role in governing, since he viewed them as undemocratic, and thus continued to call for full independence.
_	Much of the speech was devoted to the idea that "[m]ost Americans don't live their lives solely as Democrats, Republicans, liberals or conservatives."
_	Jay and Silent Bob get the idea that if they go to the town of Shermer, Illinois, where most of John Hughes' movies take place, they could get chicks and be the "blunt connection".
_	In addition, they reject the idea that would "make everything the work of an all-powerful divine grace which arbitrarily selected some to be saved and some to be damned, so that we human beings had no freedom of choice about our eternal fate".
_	The Criminal Law Revision Committee in their 1984 Report on Sexual Offences rejected the idea that the offense of rape should be extended to marital relations; writing the following:
_	User innovation is the idea that more users and consumers than suppliers are the innovators of new products.
_	From the idea of creating standards comes accountability, the idea that schools should report on their ability to meet the designated standards.
_	The novel explores the idea that Hitler was the product of incest.
_	This supports the idea that psychotic symptoms likely lie on a continuum."
_	He and the company promoted the idea that they had created a 'rain-making' technology, which employed "metal cylinders placed in cones and modified gadgets", which would then alter the ether or 'chi' of the atmosphere.
_	Latham noted that he was not against the content in the books, but rather the idea that books are the only source of knowledge.
_	Located in Worthington, Ohio, the hospital developed and acted upon the idea that every possible experience could be therapeutic.
_	There is experimental evidence supporting the idea that the meat paradox induces cognitive dissonance in Westerners.
_	The party rejects the idea that "socialism has existed before and has failed", holding to the view that those countries which claimed to have established socialism had in fact merely established "state capitalism".
_	Its approach is based on the idea that education should be directed by an evaluation of the individual's educational needs and that traditional continuing medical education conferences alone may not be effective in improving practice.
_	Solow attempted to sell NBC executives on the idea that a fresh face would bring believability to the part, but they were aware that she was Roddenberry's girlfriend.
_	The immunological differences, though, are the strongest evidence used to support the idea that "F. novicida" and "F. tularensis" are separate species.
_	In 1875, "Scribner’s" argued that there was insufficient evidence to conclude that Darwinism was true and attributed its wide acceptance to a contemporary bias towards novel ideas, even though the author did not on principle reject the idea that proof could be forthcoming.
_	This is a use of underspecification, the idea that there is a ‘default’ morpheme that is inserted in the general case, and more specific morphemes that are inserted in more specific cases, when their featural specifications are met.
_	For example, they see the competitive market as protecting disfranchised blacks and are less likely to accept the idea that there was exploitation by merchant monopolists."
_	Central is the idea that Purpose and Random need to be in balance.
_	Probably the most explicit dismissal of the idea that mental processes control behavior was the radical behaviorism of Skinner.
_	Gibbons said that while readers "were left with the idea that it was a grim and gritty kind of thing", he said in his view the series was "a wonderful celebration of superheroes as much as anything else".
_	In "Just War or Just Peace", Chesterman rejects the idea that the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia (FRY)'s repression of the Kosovars represented a "supreme humanitarian emergency".
_	Allison Stewart of "The Washington Post" gave "Planet Pit" a favorable review writing, "His new disc, “Planet Pit,” dispenses with the idea that pop albums should consist of a few celebrity-packed singles topped off with filler.
_	Wilbur promotes the idea that Servetus was a modalist.
_	Though the Bible has Joseph buried in Shechem (the present-day Palestinian city of Nablus), Jewish aggadic tradition conserved the idea that he wished to be interred at Hebron, and the Islamic version may reflect this.
_	The second part has to do with the idea that nature is perfect.
_	Some writers choose to introduce elements or characters from one work into another, to present the idea that both works are set in the same universe.
_	Legends from the Acts of John contributed much to Medieval iconography; it is the source of the idea that John became an apostle at a young age.
_	This theory is based on the idea that voters view the act of voting as a means of selecting a government.
_	This appeared to contradict the idea that they were some sort of electromagnetic radiation.
_	Many teachers, school administrators, and special educators have been inspired by Gardner's theory of multiple intelligences as it has allowed for the idea that there is more than one way to define a person's intellect.
_	She relates this to the idea that what’s inside a person is the most important.
_	He expressed the idea that only through the emotions of an individual could nature be depicted the right way.
_	In the paper, Smithson challenges the idea that the mineral calamine is an oxide of zinc.
_	The use of metallic materials, visits to foundries, the idea that the world is now irrevocably reduced to a giant Meccano set, led Mancini to create a series of large paintings testing himself with a material that was new to him: acrylic.
_	The fraud-on-the-market theory is the idea that stock prices are a function of all material information about the company and its business.
_	Tor Andrae rejects the idea that the inspired state is pathological attributing it to a scientifically superficial and hasty theory arguing that those who consider Muhammad epileptic should consider all types of semi-conscious and trance-like states, occasional loss of consciousness, and similar conditions as epileptic attacks.
_	In asynchronous tournaments, there are two methods used by game developers centered around the idea that players matches are recorded and then broadcast at a later time to other players in the same tournament.
_	They note what they claim are differences in materials and styles of some sheela na gigs from their surrounding structures, and noting that some are turned on their side, to support the idea that they were incorporated from previous structures into early Christian buildings.
_	A recurring theme in Boudon's work, characteristic of the French school, was the idea that the search for God requires detachment from all creatures.
_	Meanwhile, behaviorist researchers used simple dichotomous models (pleasure/pain, reward/punishment) and well-established principles such as the idea that a thirsty creature will take pleasure in drinking.
_	Brigham Young (the second President of the Church) accepted the idea that people of African ancestry were generally under the curse of Cain, and in 1852, he stated that people of black African descent were not eligible to hold the church's priesthood.
_	The Historical School were themselves reacting against materialist determinism, the idea that human action could, and would (once science advanced enough), be explained as physical and chemical reactions.
_	But it’s also about the idea that the grass is always greener on the other side.
_	By first attacking the idea that there is a necessary progression from one set of institutional arrangements to another, e.g. feudalism to capitalism, it then built an anti-necessitarian theory of social change, theorizing the transition from one set of institutional arrangements to another.
_	There has been some evidence for the idea that the cognitive map is represented in the hippocampus by two separate maps.
_	As reported in the Albuquerque Journal, "The name of 'Central Avenue' it is believed, will at once convey the idea that it is the city's main business street and the center of town."
_	Within Shinto also exists the idea that this the soul which brings good harvests and catches.
_	Punctuated equilibrium is commonly contrasted against phyletic gradualism, the idea that evolution generally occurs uniformly and by the steady and gradual transformation of whole lineages (called anagenesis).
_	The motivation for collaborative filtering comes from the idea that people often get the best recommendations from someone with tastes similar to themselves.
_	Some contemporaries of Petty have given rise to the idea that Petty was the author, like John Evelyn, John Aubrey, Edmund Halley and Bishop Gilbert Burnet.
_	Meanwhile, the great Tamil epic, "Silappatikaram" (c. 100 CE) was one of several literary masterpieces amply indicating "the currency of the cult of the Female Principle in South India" during this period – and, once again, "the idea that Lakshmi, Saraswati, Parvati, etc., represent different aspects of the same power."
_	The articles, however, typically comprise distinctly Ahmadi perspectives and the idea that the "Review" should publish more articles of a general nature with those specifically connected to the Ahmadiyya movement being printed in a supplement was abandoned early on at Ghulam Ahmad’s behest.
_	This rejection was further strengthened when during the Texas Revolution (1835-1836), some Texas residents thought that his family sympathized with the idea that Texas should remain Mexican (Texas was a province of Mexico previous to the Revolution).
_	A key principle of the human rights movement is its appeal to universality: the idea that all human beings should struggle in solidarity for a common set of basic conditions.
_	Before the ball had actually taken place, newspapers and magazines (encouraged in various ways by Bernays's office) had latched on to the idea that green was all the rage.
_	Senator John Kerry's 1988 Committee on Foreign Relations report on Contra drug links concluded that "senior U.S. policy makers were not immune to the idea that drug money was a perfect solution to the Contras' funding problems".
_	The NFL's UK operation has pointed to the success of the 1995 expansion team the Carolina Panthers having grown a fanbase in a previously untapped market to support the idea that a London team could do the same.
_	Unsure about what to think, he briefly entertains the idea that "Laura" was Jade's mother, or that Jade is actually his illegitimate daughter from that night who's come back for money, but Jade denies all of these conclusions.
_	Kendall comes up with the idea that if Carlos can find the Red-shirted girl so he can see her one last time, it would snap him out of his heartbreak.
_	I reject, in conscience, the idea that Australia should or ever can become a multi-racial society and survive.
_	Landmark emphasizes the idea that there is a difference between the facts of what happened in a situation, and the meaning, interpretation, or story about those facts.
_	Study Tech materials claim that "absence of mass" is the idea that abstractions must be illustrated physically before they can be fully understood: learning about trains is accelerated if the student can see a train or a representation of one.
_	The brush stroke across the letter G that slants upward towards the first of the eleven stars represents the idea that sport provides a pathway for bringing people together to create and share common goals and purpose.
_	Furthermore, he rejected the idea that the workers' movement should act as an appendage to the PNL.
_	Importantly, he questioned the idea that fossils grew in the ground, as well as common explanations of rock formation.
_	Several of the spin-off novels explore the idea that C19 gathers up alien technology for their own ends, as revealed in "The Scales of Injustice" and "Who Killed Kennedy".
_	The two criticized the idea that Scully would give her child up for adoption solely based on the word of Jeffrey Spender, noting "if she wasn't going to give it away for the sake of its own protection after a UFO cult abducted it [in 'Provenance'/'Providence'], then why should she because Jeffrey Spender of all people comes along and informs her that it's under threat?"
_	He heavily criticized the idea that Scully would offer William up for adoption.
_	She is best known for her work on "constructions": grammatical pairings of form and functions that are related to one another in a systematic network of learned knowledge; "statistical preemption": the idea that competition between grammatical constructions in context can account for the ill-formedness of certain expressions that would otherwise be licensed; the creation and development of the "novel construction-learning paradigm": which is akin to learning novel words with novel meanings; and the suggestion that both statistics (particularly in the form of skewed input) and the functions of constructions play an important role in learning.
_	Alberto the owner of the Ritz Cafe (who always refers to himself as a 'Genuine Italian') is obsessed with the idea that the Sicilian Mafia will come to take over his business (in one episode they really try).
_	In total there are 25 satellites of Über Den Tellerrand in the Netherlands, Germany, Austria and Switzerland, and the U.S. The U.S. satellite, in Columbus, Ohio, was created by a woman from Ohio who attended one of the Berlin cooking events and was so impressed with the idea that she began one in her city at home.
_	Arguments against the notion point towards the strong distinctions in religions and political systems that existed between European nations at the beginning of the period, that undermine the idea that Europe formed a united "civil society".
_	Among the scholastics, Aquinas also argued against the idea that infinity could be in any sense complete or a totality.
_	Common grievances of these movements include the idea that Punjabis dominate Pakistan politically and economically, thus marginalizing other groups, and that the establishment of Urdu as the country's sole official language is a form of cultural imperialism that ignores the heritage of Pakistan's diverse peoples.
_	This understanding is based on the idea that social barriers must be removed to enable people with disabilities to participate fully in society, becoming active members who can represent themselves and exercise their rights.
_	The Irish "Life" makes him a member of the Éoganachta of Munster and likewise, borrows a birth-tale from an Éoganacht origin legend, but this appears to be an innovation intended to link the saint with the new rulers based on the idea that the Dartraige were a people exiled from Munster.
_	"bear" or "bearish" in the language of market sentiment to reflect the idea that investors expect downward price movement.
_	In an article in the June 2009 issue of "Far Eastern Economic Review", he introduced the idea that Chinese savers have been stockpiling multiple residential units, and willingly leaving them vacant, as a "store of value," like gold.
_	In fact, it is in the idea that natural philosophy must begin with the senses that we find the revolutionary part of Bacon's philosophy, and its consequent philosophical method, eliminative induction, is one of Bacon's most lasting contributions to science and philosophy.
_	Another explanation often advanced is the idea that police officers will undergo some traumatic experience in their police work that they never recover from, leading to suicide, divorce, etc.
_	It was inspired by the idea that China's trade surplus could be used to relieve some of the Third World's problems with debt.
_	She explores the idea that "shyness is a form of deviance: a problem for society as much as for the individual", and concludes that, to some extent, "we are all impostors, faking our way through social life".
_	In 2001, the American ornithologists Matthew Williams and David Steadman supported the idea that the early accounts were a solid basis for the Guadeloupe amazon's existence.
_	Freud's description of religious belief as a form of illusion is based on the idea that it is derived from human wishes with no basis in reality.
_	First EPR relies on the idea that if the manufacturers have to pay for environmental harm, they will adapt their practices.
_	Unlike the Catholics and the more Magisterial Lutheran and Reformed (Zwinglian and Calvinist) Protestant movements, some of the Radical Reformation abandoned the idea that the "Church visible" was distinct from the "Church invisible."
_	Modern Croatian architecture appeared with Viktor Kovačić, who was the first to speak against historicism and represented the idea that architecture must be individual and modern, but also practical and comfortable.
_	Rocked with the idea that they no longer have to stay on Cava, many of the group consider leaving and joining the drift fleet.
_	George Akerlof and Janet Yellen put forward the idea that due to bounded rationality firms will not want to change their price unless the benefit is more than a small amount.
_	Theorem as a disruption to the idea that a woman’s interests can be adequately represented by their husband.
_	This recognition of what Braunstein & Folbre (2001) term the “non-benevolent patriarch” debunks the idea that women can be adequately represented by a single head of household and contend that families represent a myriad of interests that are not always manifested in one member’s actions.
_	For instance, the idea that a pot or vase could be "read" like a gramophone record or phonograph cylinder for messages from the past, sounds encoded into the turning clay as the pot was thrown.
_	Even though the temperature rises and falls fairly steadily with each passing day through the year, participants assume there is more of a drop in temperature, for example, between August 25 and September 2 than there is between September 2 and September 10, based entirely on the idea that August is warmer than September.
_	Since poor whites were found to be in the same situation as natives in the African environment, the idea that intrinsic white superiority could overcome any environment did not seem to hold.
_	Discussion has surfaced around the idea that, historically, public space has been inherently contradictory in the way that it has always been exclusive in who has been able to participate.
_	Instead, Pauling championed the idea that protein structure was stabilized mainly by hydrogen bonds, an idea advanced initially by William Astbury (1933).
_	Say's Law emphasizes the idea that there is no tendency towards a depression because as supply increases, people will naturally demand more.
_	The Latin maxim ignoramus et ignorabimus, meaning "we do not know and will not know", represents the idea that scientific knowledge is limited.
_	Similarly, Hutton suggested that the cause of the Murrayite theory's popularity was because it "appealed to so many of the emotional impulses of the age", including "the notion of the English countryside as a timeless place full of ancient secrets", the literary popularity of Pan, the widespread belief that the majority of British had remained pagan long after the process of Christianisation, and the idea that folk customs represented pagan survivals.
_	Even after his moving in with his relatives he still struggles with the idea that he is a burden since he doesn’t have a job.
_	The police therefore soon began to favour the idea that the killing had been carried out by a crazed individual acting on an opportunist basis.
_	Kolb has also excavated at nearing Salemi, recovering finds that document the presence of residual 6th century BC activity and 4th–3rd century BC settlement, lending credence to the idea that Salemi is the ancient city of Halyciae of the Elymians.
_	Mack hits on the idea that they should throw a thank-you party, and the entire community quickly becomes involved.
_	Moreover, Taubman-Ben-Ari and Noy (2010) examine the idea that a person's level of self-awareness and self-consciousness should be considered in relation to their responses to their anxiety and death cognitions.
_	A case study is found in India, where farmers are buying Monsanto BT cotton seeds—sold on the idea that these seeds produced 'natural insecticides'.
_	Both the Aristotelian and Neoplatonic schools of philosophy provided support for the idea that stony objects might grow within the earth to resemble living things.
_	A best-selling biography of Fields published three years after his death, "W.C. Fields, His Follies and Fortunes" by Robert Lewis Taylor, was instrumental in popularizing the idea that Fields' real-life character matched his screen persona.
_	The issue revolves around the idea that those who control the media control what information people do and don't have access to.
_	In the equilibrium of the hermetic vision, the idea that creates (in other words, the intelligent spirit) cannot do without the substance (matter) through which the idea itself takes form.
_	These feminists place emphasis on the idea that only those men who are capable of loving and financially providing for each wife equally are permitted to have more than one.
_	Game Freak founder Satoshi Tajiri cited the game's influence behind the Game Boy "Pokémon" series, stating it gave him the idea that the system could handle more than action games.
_	It emerged as a reaction to the idea that it was socially acceptable for men to appear without a shirt in public, whereas a woman appearing topless in public would be construed as indecent.
_	Whereas the term "Normans" in English usually refers to the ruling dynasty of Normandy from the tenth century onwards, and their scions elsewhere in Western Europe, in the context of the Rus', 'Normanism' refers to the idea that the Rus' had their origins in Scandinavia (i.e. among 'Northmen').
_	During the game's planning, he came up with the idea that SOPHIA would eventually be able to go anywhere in the game, including navigating on the ceilings and walls.
_	This reinforced the idea that a broader definition of what defines an ecosystem needed to be created, suggesting that it be based on the biotic requirements of the largest mammal present.
_	It follows the idea that true learning results from children exploring the world for themselves through play.
_	His essay in "Linguistic Sciences", "Abstract Painting and Integrationist Linguistics" (2011), proposed the idea that visual form and language are inherently interdependent and have been artificially and wrongly separated by art practice and discourse.
_	Socrates strongly influenced the idea that knowledge is innate and can be found from within, it is also known as anamnesis.
_	The belief by Americans from a few years earlier that live prisoners still existed had mostly passed; in the words of "Time" magazine, "most people seemed resigned to the idea that the fortunes of war are bound to leave a few mysteries."
_	He strengthens the idea that after the civil war, many of the "good" orators have either left or fled Rome.
_	Still, there were other reactions: in August 1949, the "Los Angeles Times" reported that a syndicated British film reviewer had called the film an "insult to British audiences" on the basis that it gave the audience the idea that American precision bombing had won the war.
_	The authenticity of the clothes and the fact that the painting is a portrait of a named living person rules out the idea that the picture is a work of oriental fantasy and places it more in the realm of conventional portraiture, however, questions remain about what Renoir and the Storas were trying to achieve in the work.
_	The term metagenome referenced the idea that a collection of genes sequenced from the environment could be analyzed in a way analogous to the study of a single genome.
_	The journals tend to provide emphasis on treating sexual behavior as something different from lifestyle, conveying the idea that men who have sex with other men can remain the male gender.
_	Palgrave, Foxwell, and Marshall had discussed the idea that an economic journal should be attached to the Royal Statistical Society.
_	Another theory communicates the idea that men and boys commit more crimes because of societal pressures to be masculine and aggressive.
_	Physicist Max Born, in commenting upon Werner Heisenberg's arriving at the idea that the elementary particles of quantum mechanics are to be seen as different manifestations, different quantum states, of one and the same “primordial substance,”' proposed that this primordial substance be called "apeiron".
_	Urging Homer and Marge to enforce stronger discipline on Bart with the idea that he could grow up to become a Supreme Court Justice if he turns his life around, the two return home to find that Bart stole and broke Grampa's false teeth.
_	Adopted in 1942, the design of the Jungle Boot was based on the idea that no boot could possibly keep out water and still provide sufficient ventilation to the feet in a jungle or swamp environment.
_	In time, the term "Vietnam syndrome" also came into use as a shorthand for the idea that Americans were worried they would never win a war again and that the nation was in utter decline.
_	Cervantes's own "Don Quixote" explores and parodies the idea that literature not grounded in empirical reality is dangerous stuff.
_	After the mid-1050s, Edward seems to have withdrawn from affairs as he became increasingly dependent on the Godwins, and may have become reconciled to the idea that one of them would succeed him.
_	to demonstrate the author's pessimism regarding Africa, the African National Congress (ANC), "the new" South Africa, and supporters of the idea that Afrikaans can only survive by developing multilingualism in South Africa, then Roodt's vision succeeds.
_	They get the idea that they can escape their problems by running off together and travelling across the United States.
_	At the school's spring concert in 1992, the band played the Rebirth Brass Band's "Freedom" and the favorable crowd response gave Herbert the idea that he could fashion the musicians to play contemporary brass band music rather than traditional New Orleans jazz.
_	Hughes rejected the idea that Joan of Arc suffered from epilepsy in an article in the academic journal "Epilepsy & Behavior".
_	This deals with the idea that beneficiaries should be included when implementing programs on their behalf.
_	Regarding the differences (real or supposed) between American and British practice in the latter half of the 19th century, Floud said that Herbert was "the [British] firm often held up as an example of the use of American techniques" [which sometimes emphasised focus on a narrow range of machines by any one builder] but that even Herbert "rejected the idea that the firm should specialize in a few types of machinery" [to the exclusion of a diverse mix of products].
_	At Southwest Airlines a software program uses swarm theory, or swarm intelligence — the idea that a colony of ants works better than one alone.
_	It has also propagated the idea that pragmatism and economic considerations triumph over accountability, transparency and checks and balances.
_	He introduced the idea that the Earth might be billions of years old, which even a century and a half after his death would have been denied.
_	Derrida develops an ethicist view respecting to hospitality, exploring the idea that two types of hospitalities exist, conditional and unconditional.
_	The documentary is praised for its stunning visuals and impressive views of the cosmos but despite the aesthetics, it evokes the idea that we, according to Smith, “concern ourselves with fleeting power and evil deeds, treating both as though they are more than mere smudges on a much larger blueprint.
_	Critics of Popper, chiefly Thomas Kuhn, Paul Feyerabend and Imre Lakatos, rejected the idea that there exists a "single" method that applies to all science and could account for its progress.
_	Baran argues that as members become "impatience with the lack of success HT has had so far in overthrowing governments", they leave the party to create/join "splinter groups" less wedded to the idea that attacks on "enemies of Islam" must wait for a caliph.
_	This unique program pairs a Reserve unit with an active-duty unit to share a single set of aircraft and rests on the idea that there are more operational requirements than there are manpower to fulfill them.
_	Other forms of determinism are more relevant to compatibilism, such as biological determinism, the idea that all behaviors, beliefs, and desires are fixed by our genetic endowment and our biochemical makeup, the latter of which is affected by both genes and environment, cultural determinism and psychological determinism.
_	In recent plebiscites Puerto Ricans have not expressed themselves in favor of a political status with the intention of becoming a sovereign state, but the idea that Puerto Rico is a separate social, political and cultural entity from the United States has been repeatedly expressed.
_	Its director denied that the idea that the initial spark creating the universe was caused by a universal engineer or God was religious.
_	Initial attacks of the 20th and 26th Divisions gave no significant results, and the idea that the 20th Division could take Knin alone was unrealistic.
_	I, in support of the idea that 'reading' pictures was considered to be a variation of reading itself.
_	In his pamphlet "Der Weg zum Siege des Germanenthums über das Judenthum" (The Way to Victory of Germanism over Judaism, 1879) he introduced the idea that Germans and Jews were locked in a longstanding conflict, the origins of which he attributed to race—and that the Jews were winning.
_	Mantlo's "Crossroads of Eternity" stories, which ran through issues #300–313 (Oct. 1984 – Nov.1985), explored the idea that Banner had suffered child abuse.
_	Following the September 11 attacks, she campaigned against the idea that there is a fundamental antagonism between U.S. and Europe on the one side, and Islam or Asian culture on the other.
_	Bounded rationality is the idea that when individuals make decisions, their rationality is limited by the tractability of the decision problem, their cognitive limitations and the time available.
_	Although evidence in favour of glacial flow was known by the early 19th century, other theories of glacial motion were advanced, such as the idea that melt water, refreezing inside glaciers, caused the glacier to dilate and extend its length.
_	Garcia and Otheguy (2016) implies the Language and Achievement Gap derive from racist ideals that reinforce the idea that some cultures are seen as “disadvantaged”.
_	This study's results reinforces the idea that the stereotype of the hyper-sexual fertile Latina is another social construct aimed at creating the Latino threat narrative in the United States.
_	As Minister of Finance, he "was subjected to the idea that the rating agencies were the golden judges of financial health."
_	He settled with no one... [but] the idea that he was an early martyr to the drives of an unconventional sexuality is an anachronistic fiction.
_	Dan Pugsley stated about the album title: "It’s more the idea that in life we have things that stand barriers, it might be a relationship or a habit and it's about facing those things, rather than it being purely political".
_	Indeed, he concurred with the main ideas of rationalism, most importantly the idea that rational concepts can be meaningful and the idea that rational concepts necessarily go beyond the data given by empirical observation.
_	He was intrigued by the idea that a man as famous as Robey could produce such a "beautifully finished" instrument, unbeknown to the public.
_	After Hawash was formally charged, McGeady, acting as spokesman for Hawash's family, said "People who know Mike believe the idea that Mike would have fought for the Taliban in Afghanistan is completely absurd and that he ultimately will be cleared" and “We hope that once a jury hears what happened, they’ll realize that a mistake was made.
_	Considered a highly moralistic document, it reflected the idea that the very essence of the people can be changed by its laws.
_	At its core, neurorobotics is based on the idea that the brain is embodied and the body is embedded in the environment.
_	Kristeva departs from Lacan in the idea that even after entering the symbolic, the subject continues to oscillate between the semiotic and the symbolic.
_	Further works during 1795 continued to discuss the positives and negatives of Godwin, with "Conciones ad Populum" attacking philosophy that is not dedicated to mankind, in reference to Godwin, and "Lectures on Revealed Religion, its Corruption, and Politica Views" in which he argued in support of Godwin's promotion of the removal of private property, the idea that government is problematic, and that revolution shouldn't be violent, but Coleridge continued to Christianize Godwin's philosophy.
_	However, no contemporary evidence supports the idea that labyrinths had such a purpose for early Christians.
_	Some leaders, such as the leftist Tan Malaka, spread the idea that this was a revolutionary struggle to be led and won by the Indonesian "pemuda".
_	The UN Human Rights Council's call for sanctions against Israel is crucial because it clearly expresses the idea that the settlement enterprise leads to "ethnic cleansing" in the West Bank."
_	The name comes from the idea that the analogy of natural systems should be used as an aid in understanding how to design sustainable industrial systems.
_	Measurements of altitudes and slopes of gullies support the idea that snowpacks or glaciers are associated with gullies.
_	The subliminal result of all of these "comparisons" tend to lend credence the idea that one's self-concept, self-image, self-esteem, worth or social desirability is linked to our social inclusion or exclusion in a favored superior class having the means to insulate themselves from the rest of society.
_	They argue that this doctrine is an invention, distortion of the idea about God, and presentation of the idea that there are three gods.
_	Emancipatory research in terrorism studies can bring to light overlooked perspectives such as the war in Iraq being a form of occupation bringing more violence than peace, the idea that State sponsored research is often biased and unreliable and that any and all valuable research should be conducted free of political bias to truly increase understanding.
_	The accreditation process is premised on the idea that the ACCJC and the colleges together shape the values and best practices of the educational community into the policies, requirements, and standards by which colleges are evaluated.
_	In "The Highest Poverty - Monastic Rules and Form-of-Life", Agamben looks at the emerging genre of written rules starting in the 9th century, and its development into both law and something beyond law in the Franciscan form-of-life, in which the Franciscans replaced the idea that we possess our life (or objects generally) with the concept of 'usus', that is 'use'.
_	Modelling of the tsunami supports the idea that the earthquake consisted of three sub-events, related to three structural 'blocks' within the overriding plate.
_	In 1913, Iwanami opened a used book store and publishing house, Iwanami Shoten, in Jinbōchō, Tokyo, with the idea that he could use this as a start to begin publishing and disseminating works which he felt to be of intellectual value, and quit his teaching job to devote his full energy into the venture.
_	Gordon scoffed at the idea that Rocky could lift him, and said that cranes are useless without an engine.
_	The sword represented authority in ancient times, and conveys the idea that justice can be swift and final.
_	The book's title arises in response to Areceneaux's Catholic upbringing and its implications for him as a gay man, particularly the idea that even if being gay was not a choice, he should not act on it; finding that theological debates on the subject did not tend to prove fruitful, Arceneaux decided, "Easier to just clarify, 'I plan to have sex, so I can’t date Jesus.'"
_	Lord Fraser, as part of his judgment, stated that the idea of strict liability that was brought into play by "Rylands" was not a part of Scots law, and the idea that it ever had been valid was "a heresy that ought to be extirpated".
_	The resource is built on the idea that poets have a unique relationship with their own work and are often able to communicate the nuance, musicality and subtlety of it, with a deeper understanding than actors.
_	Active listening in music refers to the idea that listeners can be given some degree of control on the music they listen to, by means of technological applications mainly based on artificial intelligence and information theory techniques, by opposition to traditional listening, in which the musical media is played passively by some neutral device
_	The notion of social structure "as relationship between different entities or groups" or as "enduring and relatively stable patterns of relationship" emphasises the idea that society is grouped into structurally related groups or sets of roles, with different functions, meanings or purposes.
_	One example of social structure is the idea of "social stratification", which refers to the idea that most societies are separated into different strata (levels), guided (if only partially) by the underlying structures in the social system.
_	Tuthill died on the island, encouraging the idea that the ship was cursed—he was her third captain to die prematurely.
_	Journalist John Hockenberry asserts that, even aside from the Satanic cult claims, many officials doubted the single-shooter theory, writing, "what most don't know about the Son of Sam case is that from the beginning, not everyone bought the idea that Berkowitz acted alone."
_	Nevertheless, the executioner, James Berry, promoted the idea that Bury was the Ripper.
_	There has been little empirical support for the idea that employees in the workplace strive to meet their needs only in the hierarchical order prescribed by Maslow.
_	Mississippi Senator Robert J. Walker, in opposition, stated that the idea that Tyler was still vice president and could preside over the Senate was absurd.
_	Despite this, the Supreme Court has explicitly rejected the idea that the states can nullify federal law.
_	Many archaeologists have subscribed to the idea that these tomb-shrines served as territorial markers between different tribal groups, although others have argued that such markers would be of little use to a nomadic herding society.
_	The central point about Lycrophron as attacked in the "Politics" of Aristotle, is that Lycrophron rejected the idea that the state exists to make people "just and good", instead holding the view that justice and law is about preventing people violating the bodies and goods of each other.
_	Following their lead, the Scottish philosopher David Hume used Ogilby's work to illustrate the idea that common sense frequently appeals to a "standard of taste" in aesthetic matters: 'Whoever would assert an equality of genius and elegance between Ogilby and Milton, or Bunyan and Addison, would be thought to defend no less an extravagance, than if he had maintained a mole-hill to be as high as Teneriffe, or a pond as extensive as the ocean.'
_	This evidence supports the idea that fast mapping requires inductive reasoning so the larger the lexicon (number of known words) the easier it is for the child to reason out the accurate meaning for the novel word.
_	Debate followed, in which some delegates urged compromise, with the idea that a united delegation would help unite the party in New York in the coming general election.
_	Jay Ward rejected the idea that the films take place in the same universe, saying: "It's almost like the 9/11 conspiracy theories...
_	The book presents a model of human linguistic communication based on the idea that language is an evolutionary adaptation, where speakers address themselves to the context of minds they believe to be similar to their own.
_	Van Meene’s “The Years Shall Run Like Rabbits” is a play on the speed at which rabbits reproduce and the idea that unhappy or uncomfortable moments are fleeting.
_	Korean feminists believe the low status of ajumma reflects widespread sexism and classism in Korean culture, particularly the idea that a woman's worth can be assessed mainly on the basis of her age, looks and docility.
_	Witton elaborated in 2012 and 2013 on the idea that "Istiodactylus" was a scavenger.
_	North accepted their proposal in the idea that the clubs would amalgamate.
_	This evidence supports the idea that inhibition of the Wnt signaling pathway by DKK1 is crucial to proper cranial development.
_	Shi'as reject the idea that Abu Bakr and Umar were instrumental in the collection or preservation of the Qur'an.
_	Intellectual hierarchy, also known as a scale of concepts, refers to the idea that some map features are more important than others.
_	O'Barr, however, has downplayed the influence of Robert Smith on the lead character Eric Draven's physical appearance, saying that "the idea that the look has been inspired by him has really been overblown" and that the visual aspect of the character owed more to Peter Murphy and Iggy Pop. Smith said that the song "Burn", the Cure's contribution to the 1994 film adaptation's soundtrack, was deliberately written and performed in the style of "The Hanging Garden".
_	In 1933, "Dayton Daily News" newspaper photographer Myron Scott of Dayton, Ohio had covered a race of boy-built cars in his home community and was so taken with the idea that he acquired rights to the event; the national-scale Soap Box Derby grew out of this idea.
_	He was the first scientist to reject the idea that cancer was “autonomous of its host,” and to argue that “solid tumors such as breast cancer are likely to be systemic at the time of diagnosis and represent potential metastases during the life of the host.
_	Proponents also question the idea that extended copyright is "corporate welfare."
_	Digital integration is the idea that data or information on any given electronic device can be read or manipulated by another device using a standard format.
_	When writing the series, Kusaka always tries to add elements of amazements with the idea that the readers would feel they are actually playing a video game.
_	According to Kirkland what these three texts have in common is the idea that "one can live one’s life wisely only if one learns how to live in accord with life’s unseen forces and subtle processes, not on the basis of society’s more prosaic concerns".
_	Solar power plants work off of the idea that symbiotic relationships are important in nature, collecting sun while providing shade for plants to grow.
_	The Marxist theory of cultural hegemony, associated particularly with Antonio Gramsci, is the idea that the ruling class can manipulate the value system and mores of a society, so that their view becomes the world view ("Weltanschauung"): in Terry Eagleton's words, "Gramsci normally uses the word hegemony to mean the ways in which a governing power wins consent to its rule from those it subjugates".
_	Citing their common experience, many transfeminists directly challenge the idea that femininity is an entirely social construction.
_	Though the idea that the Fair Youth and the W.H. are the same person has often been doubted, and it is considered possible that the Fair Youth may be based on one person in the first 17 sonnets and based on another person in other sonnets.
_	Corbin’s work takes the opposite stance of Holmes, refuting the idea that contract law was external, rather focusing on the “operative facts” of the cases.
_	Within the European Union, two main standpoints have emerged in the debate: on the one hand, the European Parliament has favoured the idea that, considering the crucial role that media play in the functioning of democratic systems, policies in this field should prevent excessive concentration in order to guarantee pluralism and diversity.
_	William James gave Erikson the idea that while "once born" people conform, "en masse", painlessly to the consensus reality of the age, "twice born" people get "their" direction by enduring an identity crisis of such tortuous magnitude that their souls are transformed and permanently fixed into a direction as such as a reformer role for that time for that society.
_	Right at the end of his life, in 1868, Crawfurd was using a "missing link" argument against Sir John Lubbock, in what Ellingson describes as a misrepresentation of a Darwinist viewpoint based on the idea that a precursor of humans must still be extant.
_	Holt is credited as the pioneer of the idea that proteins synthesize and degenerate at a local level in an axon's cone of growth.
_	the idea that Belyayev's experiment might succeed in a human lifetime must have seemed bold indeed."
_	However, the idea that the majority of the proteins in cells are tightly bound in a network called the microtrabecular lattice is now seen as unlikely.
_	Functional diversity encapsulates the cognitive resource diversity theory, which is the idea that diversity of cognitive resources promotes creativity and innovation, problem solving capacity, and organizational flexibility.
_	This differs from social diversity, which in accordance with the similarity attraction (homophily) paradigm, is the idea that individuals who are more similar together are able to work together more effectively.
_	As a result, Ptolemaics abandoned the idea that the epicycle of Venus was completely inside the Sun, and later 17th century competition between astronomical cosmologies focused on variations of Tycho Brahe's Tychonic system (in which the Earth was still at the center of the universe, and around it revolved the Sun, but all other planets revolved around the Sun in one massive set of epicycles), or variations on the Copernican system.
_	The life of the fiance of Barbara is endangered by Blizzard, who has the idea that the man's legs should be grafted on Blizzard's stumps, a second operation clears Blizzard's brain and he sees with a clear vision his fearful, terrible past, which falls away as if a dream.
_	On his series of make-up tests, Knox also introduced the idea that various start points should be implemented on tests involving tasks which could be reportedly mastered at various ages; specifically, if an individual was assumed to be at a mental age of 9, they should begin the series of tests on the item that was ostensibly able to be successfully completed by a nine year old.
_	Among innovations introduced by The Federal Courts was the idea of a federal "protective jurisdiction," or the idea that Congress could extend federal jurisdiction to cases implicating a federal interest, "even in the absence of both diversity jurisdiction and a claim based on federal law."
_	This refers to the idea that forgetting occurs because the recall of certain items interferes with the recall of other items.
_	The book was a spirited attack on the excesses of the colorful and lavish objects at the Exposition; and on the idea that practical objects such as furniture should have any decoration at all; his conclusion was that "Modern decoration has no decoration".
_	Several legal and technology experts have questioned the idea that there is a phenomenon of Internet killings.
_	In 1791, as the French Revolution progressed, the National Assembly researched a new method to be used on all condemned people regardless of class, consistent with the idea that the purpose of capital punishment was simply to end life rather than to inflict pain.
_	Conflict theory is “the idea that conflict between competing interests is the basic, animating force of social change and society in general."
_	Abolhassan Bani-Sadr, a former president of Iran, discusses the idea that Iran took revenge for the shootdown by the USS "Vincennes" of Iran Air Flight 655 in July 1988.
_	This reflected the idea that the altar was the key element, and the church was built to house it, as opposed to the church being built and simply supplied with an altar as part of its furniture.
_	Eric Drexler later took the Feynman concept of a billion tiny factories and added the idea that they could make more copies of themselves, via computer control instead of control by a human operator, in his 1986 book "Engines of Creation: The Coming Era of Nanotechnology".
_	Gloger argued that according to research done by the Grimm Brothers and Rosenbaum, plica polonica and the idea that it spread from Poland was an error, as it was also found among the Germanic population of Bavaria and Rhine River area.
_	It undermines the tenets of liberal democracy by rejection notions of pluralism and the idea that anything should constrain the "general will" of "the people".
_	Rail Users Ireland (previously Platform 11) is a rail transport pressure group in Ireland whose agenda is centred on the idea that there is an economic case for expanding rail transport in Ireland through better utilisation of existing infrastructure with only justified expansion of existing routes.
_	The Eastern Churches maintained the idea that every local city-church with its bishop, presbyters, deacons and people celebrating the Eucharist constituted the whole Church.
_	Early on, the ecclesiology of the Roman Church was universal in nature, with the idea that the Church was a worldwide organism with a divinely (not functionally) appointed center: the Church/Bishop of Rome.
_	She designed the resorts to have minimal rooms, with the idea that most guests spend their time outside.
_	Passing refers to the idea that women have to act in a particular way in male dominated spaces to get by and be accepted by the general public.
_	The anti-Slavic propaganda focused on the idea that Slavic people were barbaric and could not integrate properly into a civilized society.
_	Rohde traces "the origins of modern militarized policing" to the Cold War-era anti-communist paranoia, and the idea that domestic civil rights activists were similar to foreign enemies, as manifested in activities such as the CIA's Operation CHAOS.
_	They added: "We are brain-dead if we accept the idea that we have to guess which Arab is our next killer.
_	Bailey has expressed concerns about liberalism, saying "The more liberal we have been, the more our communities have suffered", and "The key wickedness that the Government has perpetrated is the idea that government can pay for everything.
_	Other biologists dispute this conception and emphasize the community metabolism theme, the idea that early living communities would comprise many different entities to extant cells, and would have shared their genetic material more extensively than current microbes.
_	Ashmawi argued that the idea that Sharia is the core of Muslim jurisprudence and that its various commentaries and interpretations only came later in Islamic history.
_	He proposed the idea that the home of John Steven McGroarty in Tujunga be perpetuated as a state park.
_	In 1999, during George W. Bush's campaign for President, Wilkinson helped sell the idea that Al Gore claimed to have "invented the Internet".
_	This further reinforces the idea that cultural factors, political stability and wealth are significant factors.
_	Orci created "Matador" with the idea that the main character would be a "soccer player by day who is a spy by night", and called him a "Latin James Bond".
_	Some people, including the senior vice president Joe Nipper from the American Public Power Association, oppose the idea that people would receive money for power that they did not even spend.
_	This was a form of relativism, based on the idea that moral codes are not set in stone, but may be subject to circumstances.
_	The meanings of the systems can be explained either by the viewpoints of the company's management or the idea that an environmentally friendly management guidelines will give a positive image of the company and its goods.
_	Though Wolf himself was obsessed with the idea that to compose only short forms was to be second-rate, his organization of lyrics of particular poets (Goethe; Mörike; Eichendorff; Heyse & Geibel in the Spanish and Italian Songbooks) into semicyclical anthologies, finding connections between texts not explicitly intended by the poets he set and his conceptions of individual songs as dramatic works in miniature, mark him as a talented dramatist despite having written only one not particularly successful opera, "Der Corregidor".
_	This is the idea that all languages conform to the same structural principles, which define the space of possible languages.
_	He pushed for the idea that the patients should be treated with kindness and not the cruelty inflicted on them as if they were animals or criminals.
_	Katie Russell, working for Rape Crisis, hoped that the story would help detract from the idea that rape is taboo.
_	It was Mrs Leslie who approached Oscar Wilde with the idea that he give a series of lectures in the United States.
_	We simply need them to be open to the idea that evidence might disprove what they think they know.
_	The final phase of the campaign challenged the idea that children should be labelled with their parents' religion.
_	Current data seem to support the idea that cuckoo strategy users depend on a specific species of "Myrmica" ant while predatory "Phengaris" are more versatile overall but still perform better with a specific species.
_	The traditional reading of "rib" has been questioned recently by feminist theologians who suggest it should instead be rendered as "side", supporting the idea that woman is man's equal and not his subordinate.
_	In 1903 he published the article "The Anarchy of Stephen's Reign" in the same journal, which presented the idea that the use of the term 'waste' in the Pipe Rolls indicated a much wider devastation resulting from the Anarchy than had been thought, fuelling the belief that a great anarchy occurred during Stephen's reign, although the 'waste' theory was later discredited.
_	Local authorities are leaning on the idea that the attack was not a suicide attack contrary to ISIS' claim.
_	They wrote in January 1953, "Obviously ignoring the idea that there are Seven Wonders of the World, Twentieth Century-Fox has discovered two more and enhanced them with Technicolor in "Niagara"...
_	This was justified by the idea that if a female was to work in a male prison that prisoners would become more violent.
_	You can’t escape the idea that he almost feels guilty for what they’d turned into, and that imbues
_	The extension of the term has been motivated by the need to model live objects as compositions of other objects; in this sense, the concept has been inspired by Smalltalk, which pioneered the uniform perspective that "everything is an object", and Jini, which pioneered the idea that "services are objects".
_	She dies with the idea that Abundio is a good man and does not know about him murdering Damiana.
_	In addition, one of the novel's main characters, the Welshman Owen Evans, introduces the idea that the Grail has a Welsh (Celtic), pagan, pre-Christian origin.
_	"After Midnight" was inspired by the movie "Gremlins", and the idea that seeing gremlins after midnight means "trouble".
_	However, Socrates, in Plato's dialogue "Protagoras", appears to reject the idea that Spartans' economy with words was simply a consequence of poor literary education: "... they conceal their wisdom, and pretend to be blockheads, so that they may seem to be superior only because of their prowess in battle ...
_	The name "gun money" stems from the idea that they were minted from melted down guns.
_	His belief was based on the idea that because the rays were deflected in the presence of a magnet, these particles have to be considered carriers of an electric charge.
_	His work lent weight to the idea that Homer's "Iliad" reflects historical events.
_	However, after a talk with his father, who fought in WWI, he accepts the idea that in order to soothe his mother's fears and give her as much time as possible to overcome them he should wait to be "called up" or drafted.
_	Furthering the idea that it is a synaptically relevant isoform is that it is known to bind NR2B and PSD95 in vivo.
_	"Melody Maker" was the only UK music paper to give the album a negative review, being fiercely critical of the idea that traditional Irish music should be mixed with rock music, before admitting "so far removed is this album from my constituency that I feel scarcely qualified to review it at all".
_	Rooks also seemed to understand the idea that a heavier stone will roll quicker and be more likely to knock the platform over.
_	Some media outlets have criticized them as gimmicky and believe they are putting on an act, but Gunn rejects the idea that they are faking their stories.
_	Though modulation from the minor to relative major is common in the Classical and Romantic periods, Donald Tovey criticizes the idea that the keys have much in common, stating that, "the so-called 'relative major' is one of five equally direct relations to a minor tonic and the 'relative minor' is one of five to a major tonic.
_	It promoted the idea that those who love their country should spare no pains to protect it, and should fight for the rights of its citizens.
_	Alexander is the author of a book entitled "Dark Dominion", in which he explored the idea that another world occupied the same spacetime as our own.
_	In physics, the electromagnetic dual concept is based on the idea that, in the static case, electromagnetism has two separate facets: electric fields and magnetic fields.
_	Taylor had the idea that the Union could pay its expenses with newly created money in the form of paper currency ("greenbacks").
_	Beginning from the 16th century, some European scholars proposed the idea that the Muscovites had stemmed from Meshech.
_	It rejects the idea that people can sue doctors for the loss of a chance to get better, when doctors fail to do as good a job as they could have done.
_	Rainis was the first to formulate the idea that Latvia could be, not a part of a more democratic Russian Empire – but a sovereign state.
_	For these critics he needed the idea that state and religion should be divided, but kept in harmony, as well as the utopic postulation of a just state which should be the political target of a religious community.
_	This furthers the idea that Black people and mixed race people must behave in a certain way to be seen as respectable and acceptable by white people.
_	Early in his career, he advocated the idea that architects should have a practical involvement with the decoration of their buildings, and painted murals at Boyne Hill church himself.
_	Reflexology, the idea that an undetectable life force connects various parts of the body to the feet and sometimes the hands and ears, was introduced in the USA in 1913 as 'zone therapy'.
_	Writing for "The Guardian", Pankaj Mishra rejects the idea that the group is a resurgence of medieval Islam, saying instead:
_	With her international experience, Ford was a supporter of the idea that Canadian artists should be free to find inspiration wherever they wished.
_	"Group Process" refers to the idea that "gangs are groups."
_	In March 2015 (after the Zionist Union had signed a vote-sharing agreement with Meretz, and Kulanu with Israel Beytenu), officials from the Zionist Union, Meretz, and Yesh Atid explored the idea that the Zionist Union and Meretz revoke their agreement so that the Zionist Union could share surplus votes with Yesh Atid, and Meretz with the Joint List, to potentially strengthen the dovish bloc in the Knesset.
_	In other words, Phillips' work speaks to the idea that no one narrative can possibly account for all aspects of human experience.
_	And once again we see that UKIP are reliant on Tory money as well as Tory policy and Tory politicians, putting paid to the idea that they stand up for working people."
_	This is because of a perception and some research that supports the idea that in some events, such as 200 meter and 400 meter track events, double below the knee amputee prostheses give the runner a competitive advantage over single below the knee amputees.
_	His ground-breaking study "Tales Out of School" (1949) pioneered the idea that children's literature should be a serious subject for study and debate.
_	In a more recent article for "In These Times," Professor Douglas posted a piece titled "We Can’t All Just Get Along" where she stated that Republicans have “crafted a political identity that rests on a complete repudiation of the idea that the opposing party and its followers have any legitimacy at all.”
_	This is the idea that the fisherman does not have a property right to the resource until point of capture, encouraging competitive behaviour and overcapitalisation in the industry.
_	Although Betsy reluctantly chose to remain with Craig, Steve could not accept the idea that she didn't love him anymore.
_	This supports the idea that there was a solid reason behind the placing of the artifacts and that the chamber was not merely a dumping ground.
_	Regardless, the basis of the sermon was to promote the idea that humans are basically good.
_	Towards the end of this period of terrorist violence, the Dutch government had already dropped the idea that the Moluccans were temporary residents, but had not been able to create a channel of communication through which to discuss and implement policy measures that opened a way to the future.
_	How you respond to this man's moving story may depend on whether you find Mr. Smith's and his son's performances so overwhelmingly winning that you buy the idea that poverty is a function of bad luck and bad choices, and success the result of heroic toil and dreams."
_	What Wiseman brought new to the table was the idea that these apparent colophons indicated that Genesis had originally been a collection of narrative clay tablets written in cuneiform, like the ancient tablets he had seen, which Moses had edited into a single document on parchment or papyrus.
_	Hence, the idea that there could be more than one God, or that God could be composed of distinct persons (however united these "persons" might be alleged to be in substance – as is held in the mainstream Trinitarian theology of Christianity – or in purpose alone, as alleged by the Mormons in opposition to the Christian doctrine), is all heresy of the worst possible kind for a Muslim.
_	He and many of his contemporaries were probably disturbed by the sense of utter finality, the idea that the earth was in a stage of winding down and would see no further development or change.
_	This is because in "Dreamtime" an individual's entire ancestry exists as one, culminating in the idea that all worldly knowledge is accumulated through one's ancestors.
_	Herbert A. Simon coined the phrase "bounded rationality" to express the idea that human decision-making is limited by available information, available time and the mind's information-processing ability.
_	This timeframe would fit well with the time of the Synoptic Gospels and lend support to the idea that Thomas may have been written around the time of "Q".
_	The Collector was the first Elder to appear, and featured in "Avengers" #28 (May 1966), but the idea that he was a member of a group known as the Elders was not introduced until "Avengers" #174 (August 1978).
_	In addition, one of his key advisors, Liu Ji, generally supported the idea that while the Chinese and the non-Chinese are different, they are actually equal.
_	Liu was therefore arguing against the idea that Hua was and is superior to Yi.
_	The first is a letter written to a certain Philipp, who had committed an undetermined sexual deviation and sustained harassment accordingly; consoling him Theobald develops the idea that the faults of this kind are not the most serious, and that pride is a far more dangerous sin; he very clearly suggests that those who make profession of chastity often fall into pedophilia.
_	Some people (for instance, Léandre Bergeron, author of the "Dictionnaire de la langue québécoise") have referred to Quebec French as "la langue québécoise" (the Québécois language); most speakers, however, would reject or even take offence to the idea that they do not speak French.
_	Published in New York City, it is inspired by the idea that the discussion of important books is an indispensable literary activity.
_	Uyaquq was fascinated by the idea that the English-speaking Moravians could quote a passage of scripture several times using exactly the same words each time.
_	Accordingly, Screeton noted that during his life, Michell was considered to be "anathema, lunatic fringe, and cranky" by his critics, although he rejected the idea that Michell was a "crank", claiming that such an accusation was "fundamentally mistaken".
_	The ad plays on the idea that the hop farmers in France are treated like the celebrity footballers of the UK.
_	In her dissertation "The Effects of Secondary School Climate on Students' Academic Success," Margaret Johansson explores the idea that “connectedness to the school community of teachers and peers … allows the student to use the social capital of the school to maximize education gains.”
_	It also addresses the “moderating effect of the parent-adolescent relationship on the link between school climate and academic outcomes,” which relates to the idea that academic capital isn’t just measured by the duration of schooling, but also the quality.
_	Johansson addresses the idea that “family social capital and school social capital [are] determinants of secondary school success.”
_	However, because money was being raised for the memorial by groups in all 50 states in the U.S., as well as groups in Washington, D.C., a vision of columns for each of those locations ultimately helped him come up with the concept of a tree trunk, linked to the idea that Kennedy's life had been cut down like a tree that is felled in its prime.
_	However, it is important to note that liability in this form did not yet include the idea that the debtor "owed" monetary compensation to the creditor, it was merely a means of avoiding punishment.
_	Swammerdam therefore dispelled the seventeenth-century notion of metamorphosis —the idea that different life stages of an insect (e.g. caterpillar and butterfly) represent different individuals or a sudden change from one type of animal to another.
_	Over time, Dmowski became more receptive to Russian overtures, particularly neoslavism, warming up to the idea that Poland and Russia may have a common future, particularly due to Germany being their common enemy.
_	In contrast "Some Things Come From Nothing" features pessimistic lyrics inspired by the idea that "nothing seems to have any substance any more".
_	The Snowdens made little distinction between music they wrote and music they played, so the idea that they might have collaborated or even given a song to Dan Emmett is therefore not surprising.
_	In the same announcement for the official sequel were plans for a spin-off for the Wii entitled "" to feature a new Overlord although plot continuity with the main series has yet to be explained but is to establish "the idea that there have been a series of Overlords throughout time".
_	Group self-interest reflects the idea that people try to do what is best for their group.
_	Christine Carpenter argues against the idea that it had any political motivation, and that Edward's creation of a strong Yorkist nobility meant that he did not need the relatively "lightweight connections" of the Woodvilles, whereas Wilkinson described the marriage as both a "love match, and also a cold and calculated political move".
_	Austrian economists such as Nobel laureate F. A. Hayek advocate the idea that malinvestment occurs due to the combination of fractional reserve banking and artificially low interest rates misleading relative price signals which eventually necessitate a corrective contraction—a boom followed by a bust.
_	In local politics, he defends the idea of reconciliation of Stalinist, Trotskyist and Maoist tendencies based on the idea that the differences have only historical significance.
_	The organization's ideology is deeply rooted in chaos theory, the idea that minor tweaks at the start of a process in a dynamic system can have a major impact on the end result.
_	Many Greeks, seeking closer ties to the pre-eminent world power, the United Kingdom, rallied around the idea that Prince Alfred, the second son of Queen Victoria and Prince Albert, could become the next King.
_	"One of the reasons that I wrote this book was the idea that people kept saying: 'What was it like over there?'
_	Individual differences in the quality of attachment emerge in the first years of life, and central to attachment theory is the idea that parenting, more specifically parental sensitive responsiveness to the infant's distress signals, determines whether children develop a secure or an insecure attachment relationship with their primary caregiver.
_	Emphasis is placed on the idea that personal experience and intuitive understanding should be used to determine the truth or validity of a particular belief or practice.
_	Although the theorems on DSC were proposed on 1970s, it was after about 30 years that attempts were started for practical techniques, based on the idea that DSC is closely related to channel coding proposed in 1974 by Aaron D. Wyner.
_	In response to the idea that the film has attained cult status, he remarks, "if "Inseminoid" has become some form of cult movie, then I am very pleased and, indeed, very flattered."
_	This explicit formulation, according to Staal, gets across the idea that Pāṇini engaged in the practice of abbreviation not for the sake of brevity for its own sake, but rather conceived of descriptive abbreviation as an instrument of mediating between "sāmānya" 'the general' and "viśeṣa" 'the particular'.
_	As they developed their philosophy, they believed that Surrealism would advocate the idea that ordinary and depictive expressions are vital and important, but that the sense of their arrangement must be open to the full range of imagination according to the Hegelian Dialectic.
_	The platform centered on the idea that birth control was not safe for women.
_	In Belo Horizonte, protesters identified themselves mostly as centrist or right-wing in their political beliefs; supporting the idea that the federal government's distributive policies and favoring her resignation or impeachment.
_	These studies are motivated by the idea that people are invested in maintaining beliefs in order and structure to prevent beliefs in chaos and randomness
_	While LGBT people are associated with irreligiousness, the Human Rights Campaign promotes the idea that an individual can be gay and religious.
_	It is based on the idea that rather than there being a threshold of visitor numbers, in fact any tourist activity is having an impact and therefore management should be based on constant monitoring of the site as well as the objectives established for it.
_	The author reinforces the idea that a woman's capability is not any less than a man's and that they can do just about anything that a man is capable of.
_	Robert H. Frank challenged the idea that prosocial behavior was necessarily deleterious in business in his book "What Price the Moral High Ground?"
_	There is much support for the idea that prosocial and proself individuals behave differently when confronted with a social dilemma in the laboratory as well as the field.
_	The Grinnellian niche concept embodies the idea that the niche of a species is determined by the habitat in which it lives and its accompanying behavioral adaptations.
_	Also the idea that Forman, a worldly-wise and canny operator, would spend his time drawing sententious morals from the stage plays he saw struck some modern critics as psychologically false, and in the 20th century suspicion emerged that the "Book of Plays" was one of John Payne Collier's forgeries, although Collier, who announced his discovery of the document in 1836, claimed to have used a transcription made for him by an unnamed "gentleman" (identified in 1841 by James Halliwell as W[illiam] H. Black, who catalogued the Ashmolean Collection).
_	His most important theological work of this period was the "Commentarii in Epistolam Pauli ad Romanos" (Wittenberg, 1532), noteworthy for introducing the idea that "to be justified" means "to be accounted just", whereas the Apology had placed side by side the meanings of "to be made just" and "to be accounted just".
_	An excerpt form the book "Traveling Medicine Show" states, "Circuses were based on the idea that rural townsfolk were underexposed to the world, and the circus was the medium through which they could experience exotic entertainment and ideas, a concept the medicine show would later exploit to equal success."
_	Research supports the idea that the linguistic limitations in animals are due to limited general brainpower (as opposed to lack of a specific module), and that words are created by breaking down sentences into pieces, making grammar more basic than semantics.
_	The Shimura variety theory is related, by the idea that such varieties should parametrize not just good (arithmetically interesting) families of Hodge structures, but actual motives.
_	Wilson also pioneered the idea that public administration was increasingly replete with political calculations and concerns:
_	The studio successfully gambled on the idea that a substantially larger investment into quality animation could be made back through both network television and over-the-air in syndication, as well as cable.
_	Two persistent misunderstandings about RDF developed at this time: firstly, due to the MCF influence and the RDF "Resource Description" initialism, the idea that RDF was specifically for use in representing metadata; secondly that RDF was an XML format rather than a data model, and only the RDF/XML serialisation being XML-based.
_	Only a few far-left historians defend the idea that the synarchy existed.
_	In other words, the idea that man is that master of the world and his own destiny.
_	Reynolds aggressively promotes the idea that bloggers, using now widely available tools such as digital audio and video, will eventually force established news media to adapt a more agile approach to providing information, though he does not believe "that blogs will replace Big Media".
_	In an interview with Iran's "Press TV", Reverend Stephen Sizer expressed support for the document, stating that "it's news that the Israelis don't want because they want to maintain the idea that they have the Church in their pocket."
_	They also endorsed universalist and Unitarianist ideas, leading to Unitarian Universalism, the idea that there must be truth in other religions as well, since a loving God would redeem all living beings, not just Christians.
_	Rollout in Australia: National broadband companies TPG Telecom and iiNet, as well as the Australian Competition and Consumer Commission, have published extensive submissions to the Federal Government supporting the right for commercial telcos to deploy their own Fibre to the Basement (FTTB) infrastructure throughout Australia in competition with the coalition’s National Broadband Network (NBN) project, rejecting the idea that such planned investments should be blocked or otherwise regulated to support National Broadband Network Co’s finances.
_	Sand often referred to herself as the President's "little dwarf", an allusion to the idea that in a royal court, only the dwarf would have the courage to tell the truth.
_	Sakata's model was superseded by the quark model, proposed by Gell-Mann and George Zweig in 1964, which keeps the U(3) symmetry, but made the constituents fractionally charged and rejected the idea that they could be identified with observed particles.
_	In computer science "context awareness" refers to the idea that computers can both sense, and react based on their environment.
_	Fabre ridiculed the idea that this mechanism could explain the unbelievable precision of the hunting wasp's injection of precise quantities of venom into the hidden nerve centres of her victims, for example.
_	This was due to the idea that many English supported the Confederacy during the Civil War because of cotton exports.
_	The authors furthermore note that besides the idea that Pamela had been mistaken for Helen Foster Snow, French fails to mention yet more alternate theories of the crime.
_	These concepts are based on the idea that objective structures determine individuals' chances, through the mechanism of the habitus, where individuals internalise these structures.
_	This first part of the study found that law students were more likely than practicing attorneys to think that it is important to have the "outward manifestations of an attorney," supporting the idea that individuals "striving toward a particular identity" and are "more inexperienced in that identity realm" are more prone to claim that they "can be recognized as belonging to that identity."
_	In 2001 First Genetic Trust (FGT) put forward the idea that they act as a 'broker' of genetic information.
_	Gaitskell did not rule out further nationalisation, but saw it as a means to an end, pouring scorn on the idea that Labour should be committed to nationalising “the whole of light industry, the whole of agriculture, all the shops, every little pub and garage”.
_	In 2012, SwarmBuilder was rebranded as Experticity, based on the idea that when buying a product, everyone wants to get advice from an expert.
_	Stereotypical identities that have spurred from the idea that Hispanic and Latina women are "hot-tempered", "tempestuous", "promiscuous," and "sexy" include the "fiery Latina" and the "hot señorita".
_	The use of dome instead of house or palace could represent the most artificial of constructs and reinforce the idea that the builder was separated from nature.
_	The movie was described by its director Kamal Swaroop as a story of Lord Brahma, and it sprouted from the idea that in Hinduism, although Lord Brahma was considered the father of the entire universe, strangely no one ever worshiped him.
_	The name "Octophone" came from the idea that the instrument could take on the "tone combinations" of eight instruments, the tenor guitar, tenor banjo, ukulele, taro patch, tiple, mandolin, mandola and mandocello.
_	Stella favors empowerment and solidarity by and amongst sex workers, since the organization’s worldview is that all sex workers internationally are committed to the idea that each of them has a place in society, and human rights worth defending.
_	Now, I'm spending my time gradually coming to terms with the idea that my death is not imminent, that I am going to live on".
_	The mathematician James A. Lindsay made the idea that the map is not reality a primary theme of his 2013 book "Dot, Dot, Dot: Infinity Plus God Equals Folly".
_	His sensitivity to the existing urban fabric supports the idea that additions should openly relate to the existing structure and context rather than mimic architectural style.
_	Clark continually promoted the idea that the PCs would eventually retake Ontario and form a federal government again.
_	Keane stresses that the idea that people could govern themselves was not a simple one.
_	Richard has said that the core of his method is the idea that if we face all directions of ourselves, we will find the wonder and beauty that is in us - essentially our clown.
_	The similarities between "Archaeopteryx", known dinosaurs and extant birds were examined and emphasized, with Thomas Huxley championing the idea that "Archaeopteryx" as well as modern birds had more in common with theropod dinosaurs than any other group of animals.
_	Wollen uses social media, primarily Instagram, where she has over 25,000 followers, as a platform for her work on Sad Girl Theory, a theory which includes the notion of sadness as a form of power, and the idea that female sadness and self-loathing might include elements of empowerment.
_	Writing in "The Guardian", Andy Beckett described it as a "beautifully observed set of case studies" which illustrate the author's contention that work in Britain has changed since the 2008 debt crisis and the idea that good work brings a good life no longer holds.
_	On April 25, 1991 at a press conference in Lancaster, Pennsylvania, Mills first announced his hydrino state hypothesis which rejects the idea that "cold fusion" was occurring in studies surrounding the Fleischmann–Pons experiment.
_	If the claimed invention is directed to an abstract idea, the court proceeds to the second step of analysis, which is to determine whether the patent adds "something extra" to the idea that embodies an "inventive concept."
_	The next PKI leader after Madiun affair, Alimin, disagreed the idea and offered the idea that PKI as little party but has militant cadres throughout Indonesia.
_	He put forward the idea that we see objects because light streams out of our eyes and touches them.
_	The Court rejected the idea that Article 22(4) qualified the right of abode in Article 24(2)(3), since "people from other parts of China" mentioned in Article 22(4) do not include permanent residents of Hong Kong, and therefore Article 22(4) does not concern those who otherwise have a valid claim to be a permanent resident.
_	The police find Victor's empty boat and question Gaby, who tries to plant the idea that Victor was despondent over her leaving him and possibly suicidal—a tough sell since the complete lack of fingerprints on the boat points to foul play.
_	Adaptive bias is the idea that the human brain has evolved to reason adaptively, rather than truthfully or even rationally, and that cognitive bias may have evolved as a mechanism to reduce the overall cost of cognitive errors as opposed to merely reducing the number of cognitive errors, when faced with making a decision under conditions of uncertainty.
_	Another participant said, "I'd like to normalize the idea that women can and do work in the brewhouse along with other departments in a brewery."
_	As the nature of multi-media artworks calls for the development of new standards, techniques, and metadata within preservation strategies, the idea that certain artworks incorporating an array of media elements could be variable opens up the possibility for experimental standards of preservation and reinterpretation.
_	All of these problems can be traced back to the idea that, for every property that can be logically defined, there exists a set of all objects that have that property.
_	At over 600 names it is not definitive, but the list supports the idea that many Alabamians were enamored enough of the coach to name their children in his honor.
_	The one constant for all forms of education reform includes the idea that small changes in education will have large social returns in citizen health, wealth and well-being.
_	Although at the moment we cannot present the concrete neurophysiological mechanisms of creation of the quantum-like representation of information in the brain, we can present general informational considerations supporting the idea that information processing in the brain matches with quantum information and probability.
_	The use of the same design to honor two emperors within the space of a few decades and a few kilometers has prompted the idea that the "Panhellenes" were responsible for the arches in both locations.
_	In the 1990s, the Swedish automobile manufacturer SAAB launched a new convertible model and, in the ensuing advertising campaign, wanted to establish the idea that the car allowed passengers to experience wide-open spaces.
_	That the text expressly rebuts the idea that a reply may be given on the same day after a party has undertaken some other business, suggests that such things were valid at some point in Roman law, although it could be an interpolation.
_	Jessica had the idea that Miguel wanted her help to forget about Kay and tried to seduce him.
_	This phrase is designed to reflect the idea that any work that is not evil can be meritorious for the spiritual life if it is performed with this intention, even things normally considered of little importance.
_	After a chance encounter on the job with the naked corpse of a young woman who shares his surname, Roman seems to panic at the idea that this might be his mother, dead.
_	In keeping with the idea that grievous crimes must be answered with bloodshed and that blood atonement should be voluntary, participants made an oath that rather than ever revealing the secret gestures of the ceremony, they would rather have "my throat ... be cut from ear to ear, and my tongue torn out by its roots"; "our breasts ... be torn open, our hearts and vitals torn out and given to the birds of the air and the beasts of the field"; "your body ... be cut asunder and all your bowels gush out" showing an entire refusal to accept the promises made in the washing and anointing ordinances.
_	He rejects the idea that a person could voluntarily consent to enslavement, saying "a man, not having the power of his own life, "cannot", by compact or by his own consent, "enslave himself" to any one, nor put himself under the absolute, arbitrary power of another" (emphasis in original).
_	He received a Christian burial and the idea that he was a pagan priest would probably make him turn in his grave."
_	In the meantime, the idea that one might "improve oneself" by adopting the culture and manner of one's "betters", instinctively assented to before World War II, was now greeted with resentment.
_	This established him as a radical thinker, giving weight to his ideas, principal amongst which was the idea that the world was actually made of three elements: the tria prima comprising salt, sulphur and mercury.
_	Bo Yibo advanced the idea that revolutionary elders should 'nominate' their children to become high officials, and Bo Xilai was selected as his family's 'representative' over his older brother Bo Xicheng, ostensibly because of Xilai's superior academic credentials, which included attendance at the elite Peking University and a master's degree.
_	The discovery of the molecular structure of DNA apparently contradicted the idea that life could be explained, ultimately, in terms of the fundamental laws of physics.
_	The presence of a figure from the real world directly confronts the idea that the messages displayed in social problem films must be confirmed by real life counterparts.
_	During this time, his philosophy centered around the idea that imagination was the fundamental reality of the universe.
_	I should also like to put an end to the idea that the Devil is the spirit of evil.
_	He identifies the central problem with all the different notions of holism as the idea that the determining factor in semantic evaluation is the notion of an "epistemic bond".
_	Throughout the story, the idea that justice lies with the Holy Sword is used to drive Yggdra and her army forward through their plight, as well as to provide explanation to them for the acts they commit.
_	The group is a strong advocate of consciousness raising and what they refer to as "The Pro-Woman Line" – the idea that women's submission to male supremacy was a conscious adaptation to their lack of power under patriarchy, rather than internalized "brainwashing" on the part of women, as was held by some other radical feminist groups.
_	By May 1, police had all but abandoned the idea that she had been stolen by "gypsies," and were returning their efforts to searching wells and dragging canals.
_	Hebb and Norton intended for the MPAT to be used alone with the idea that it would aid in diagnostic tests; they also created the test with the intention that the test could be used for other experiments trying to measuring intelligence.
_	After Adelle and Helen disposed of the body, Winters had the idea that she should "let the lesbian thing come out for a moment" by kissing Reynolds on the lips.
_	Rudd also dismissed the idea that a free movement zone between British and Australian citizens would be established upon leaving the European Union; a measure supported by former Australian Prime Minister, Tony Abbott, stating "there are no plans to increase immigration from Australia...so I wouldn't envisage any change".
_	Visual literacy is based on the idea that pictures can be "read" and that meaning can be through a process of reading.
_	This is due to the idea that the character and level of female crime is not consistent with the traditional sociological explanations of crime.
_	He uses the term to describe mistakes spiritual seekers commit which turn the pursuit of spirituality into an ego building and confusion creating endeavor, based on the idea that ego development is counter to spiritual progress.
_	"Otak" means "brains" in Indonesian and Malay, and the name of the dish is derived from the idea that the dish somewhat resembles brains, being whitish grey, soft and almost squishy.
_	Unfortunately this was probably not the best move for Skulduggery, since every time Darquesse takes control over Valkyrie's body she becomes more powerful, thus leading to the idea that if Darquesse once again emerges, she will probably be too powerful for Skulduggery to stop, giving Darquesse the opportunity to destroy the world.
_	The show has continually hit on the idea that what we present to the public are merely facades, what we want them to see rather than who we actually are.
_	This is the basis for the idea that demonstration (or the construction of arguments) is dependent ultimately upon ideas or proofs that are known so well and are so fundamental to human understanding of logic that no other proofs come before it.
_	Not one editorial supported the idea that there should be an inquiry into Australia's media."
_	This case was responsible for establishing the idea that the knowingly and recklessly false standard for defamatory statements should apply to private individuals as well as public officials.
_	While both resource mobilization theory and political process theory include, or at least accept, the idea that certain shared understandings of, for example, perceived unjust societal conditions must exist for mobilization to occur at all, this is not explicitly problematized within those approaches.
_	The hypothesis was based on the idea that autistic behaviors stem from the emotional frigidity, lack of warmth, and cold, distant, rejecting demeanor of a child's mother.
_	A passage in his works referring to the "Annus Vagus" (Wandering Year) of the Egyptian calendar of 120 years before his own time, has been used to imply a date of c. 70 BC for the time of writing, which would be consistent with the idea that he may have been a pupil of Posidonius, but a date as late as 50 AD has also been suggested.
_	However, she never shed her reputation for creating fast heroines with easy morals, which was true of her early novels, and so suffered from the idea that her work was merely slight and sensational.
_	Nevertheless, Diamond did originate the idea that Dominion Theology is the "central unifying ideology for the Christian Right".
_	The staff of "Parks and Recreation" conceived the idea that Ron Swanson had his birthdate redacted from all government documents early in the development of the series, and it eventually developed into the subplot featured in "Eagleton" where Leslie finds out about his birthday and plans a surprise for him.
_	G4 then based a recurring gag in an August 2010 episode of "Attack of the Show" on the murder of Chris Gore, bringing up three potential murderers each furthering the idea that his movies are horrible and that everyone wanted to kill him.
_	Esterina has a Romani origin and says that she has been brought up by her community with the idea that people like them can do nothing in their lives.
_	As Mansfield writes regarding the need for personal laws in India, "The spectacle of large political entities in different parts of the world collapsing and giving place to smaller entities based on ethnicity, religion or language or combinations of these factors, rather than strengthening the idea that a powerfully centralised, culturally homogenous nation is essential for order and prosperity, may have confirmed for some the view that the pressing task for India is not to increase central power and cultural homogeneity, but to find an alternative to the 'nation-state' model, an alternative that will sustain unity through some form of 'pluralism'."
_	We [Symbolists] were inspired by the idea that modern life may enter the universal synthesis of art and that, once he rises above the archaism and traditionalism of consecrated literary models, a poet must test himself on the road toward those subjects that characterize the life and the civilization of his own age."
_	Momiji dismisses the idea that she could be such a person, despite the fact she lives with her mother and grandmother in a shrine in Izumo.
_	Although the objectives of Martin's monetary policy were low inflation and economic stability, he rejected the idea that the Fed could pursue its policies through the targeting of a single indicator and instead made policy decisions by examining a wide array of economic information.
_	Numerology is an element of Ismailis belief; the idea that numbers have religious meanings.
_	Robert L. Park has criticized the award for being given to William A. Dembski, proponent of the concept of intelligent design, saying it is given out for "overlapping the magisteria" (a comment based on Stephen Jay Gould's concept of non-overlapping magisteria, NOMA, the idea that science and religion inherently do not overlap).
_	John Bartlow Martin urged the candidate to speak out against violence and rioting, emphasize his "law enforcement experience" as former U.S. Attorney General, and promote the idea that the federal government and the private sector should work together to solve domestic issues.
_	The ads are based on the idea that DSL, which Xfinity claims is slower than their service, is only fast enough for people who like things very slow.
_	Grabner and her husband Brad Killam ran the artist project space called The Suburban in Oak Park, Illinois, which they developed with friend David Robbins in response to the idea that the suburbs were an overlooked site for avant-garde activities.
_	Keys's attempts to reprogram the dog become a "bold literalization of the race war," and as the film progresses Keys becomes obsessed with the idea that he can cure the dog.
_	Some designers and design historians have challenged, even rejected, the idea that design supports the goals and objectives of the economic systems they find themselves in.
_	Corman had drummmed into me the idea that if "Death Race" had been "harder" and "more real" it would have been more popular.
_	An August 2005 poll commissioned by the "Western Standard" pegged support for the idea that "Western Canadians should begin to explore the idea of forming their own country." at 42% in Alberta and 35.6% across the four Western provinces
_	Kozintsev described their film as based on the idea that “everything must be active.”
_	Izzy found the idea that normalcy was shunned —in fact it was considered a medical condition— appalling, whereas his wife wanted their daughter to go through with it.
_	However, the wedge metaphor also captures the idea that unpleasant end result is a wider application of a principle associated with the initial decision which is often a feature of decisional slippery slopes due to their incremental nature but may be absent from causal slippery slopes.
_	Components of this philosophy included the idea that structure and function are interrelated and the importance of each piece of the body in the harmonious function of its whole.
_	This supports the idea that it is involved in signaling larvae during feeding.
_	"Embeddedness" refers to the idea that physical interaction between the body and the world strongly constrain the possible behaviours of the organism, which in turn influences (indeed, partly constitutes) the cognitive processes that emerge from the interaction between organism and world.
_	Initially, she finds Vash to be a nuisance and dismisses the idea that he is the legendary Humanoid Typhoon.
_	Members of the "totok" community are more inclined to be entrepreneurs and adhere to the practice of "guanxi", which is based on the idea that one's existence is influenced by the connection to others, implying the importance of business connections.
_	Male expendability is the idea that society can better cope with the loss of a typical man than with the loss of a typical woman.
_	In the aftermath of this result, the SPD floated the idea that the four other parties should all unite to form a government excluding the CSU, as it had "lost its mandate to lead": however, the FDP were not interested.
_	Instead, he incorporated a fleet of inexpensive gunboats used only for defense with the idea that they would not provoke foreign hostilities.
_	Calcium ion involvement in the countertransport of chloride ions also supports the idea that Best1 is involved in forming calcium stores within the cell.
_	Care should be taken with the idea that "Background music can influence learning, working memory and recall, performance while working on tests, and attention in cognitive monitoring tasks."
_	An 1878 publication, "Old and New London: Volume 4", mentions the idea that the area was named after a village called "Lomesbury" which formerly stood where Bloomsbury Square is now, though this etymology is now discredited.
_	Crucial to his defense is the descriptive discourse and the idea that poetry creates a separate reality.
_	The inverse funnel theory is the idea that a product makes it easy for early users to adopt it, while allowing customizations, add ons, or advanced strategies, that keeps advanced users interested in the product.
_	This creates a category of women separated from the general population which encourages an "otherness" and reduces the idea that anyone is vulnerable to being raped.
_	This idea promotes the idea that the women who are raped were not raped for no reason, they deserved it.
_	These systems are designed around the idea that each uses the other two to build upon itself and further human knowledge as a whole.
_	In that same issue, Lewis included an added note in which he rejected the idea that the monument had once been covered by an earthen tumulus because he could see "no evidence that anything of that kind ever existed", and instead he interpreted the site as a stone circle, comparing it to the examples at Avebury, Arborlow, and Stanton Drew, suggesting that the central chamber was a shrine.
_	The authors put forward the idea that our nervous systems are not separate or self-contained; beginning in earliest childhood, the areas of our brain identified as the limbic system (hippocampus, amygdala, anterior thalamic nuclei, and limbic cortex) is affected by those closest to us (limbic resonance) and synchronizes with them (limbic regulation) in a way that has profound implications for personality and lifelong emotional health.
_	The rejection of the Soviet interpretation of the law of value led to the acceptance of the idea that China was still in the "primary stage of socialism".
_	It was on a visit back to Eureka Springs, Arkansas, where he had taught a workshop back in 1988, that he was suddenly struck by the idea that he no longer needed to live in Cleveland and could, in fact, do something which he had wanted to do for much of his life: live in the country.
_	Some of this was based on the idea that there would be conflict between the bureaucratic north and the commercial south.
_	By 1947, when Abba Lerner wrote his article "Money as a Creature of the State", economists had largely abandoned the idea that the value of money was closely linked to gold.
_	This difference can be summed up in the idea that in Canadian football the objective is to bring the player to ground or to disrupt a pass to end the play, whereas in rugby the main objective is to stop the player from breaking the try line.
_	Meannwhile, Will Jackson finds the phone call that put Kaz Proctor away and it is revealed that it was actually Joan who made the call, claiming to be an inmate at Wentworth so as to plot the idea that Bea Smith turned Kaz into the police.
_	Its aims are twofold: first, to take seriously the idea that media texts (e.g. news programs, newspaper articles) involve 'the construction of stories by other means'; and second to take seriously the idea that in an age marked by digital connectivity, media texts are inherently interactive phenomena.
_	Hours has promoted the idea that pursuing a high-earning career and donating a significant portion of the income to cost-effective charities can be an effective philanthropic strategy for some people.
_	The true origins of Humpty Dumpty are unknown but the idea that it refers to the Royalist cannon during the Siege of Gloucester is often cited as fact.
_	In 2013, Auger worked on his latest film project "Jesus in the Lodge - The Forgotten Truth of the Wilderness" where he explored the idea that the Son of God was the first Sundancer, for he was one of the first men to give his flesh to a tree.
_	He supported the idea that perception of sound derives from signals from nerve cells of the basilar membrane and that the elastic appendages of these cells are sympathetically vibrated by pure sinusoidal tones of appropriate frequencies.
_	It can be said that, in the attended strategy by Albanian State against Birra Tirana, won the idea that the denationalization of the establishments in Albania would be more efficient, putting them in efficiency and not destroying them.
_	In early 19th century Britain, Jeremy Bentham and John Stuart Mill promoted the idea that actions are right as they maximize happiness, and happiness alone.
_	The two felt that the idea that Mulder and Scully were friends throughout their various lives was "one of the best things about the story".
_	In the liner notes of the album "", Buck writes that "the reason the lyrics are so atypically straightforward is because it was aimed at teenagers", and "I've never watched "Buffy the Vampire Slayer", but the idea that high school is a portal to hell seems pretty realistic to me."
_	He criticized Sullivan for challenging the idea that it is better for people to become heterosexual than homosexual.
_	This is the idea that a claim must be made within 18 months of the information about a specific cultural valuable is published in an appropriate federal agency publication.
_	Powell spells his name in lowercase based on the idea that we should be "part of the universe, not over it, as capitals signify."
_	After reading Charles Darwin's "Descent of Man" (1871), Pfeiffer wrote to Darwin to question his description of sexual selection; she took issue with the idea that birds had sufficient aesthetic sophistication to select their partners based on beauty.
_	It is a metaphor for the idea that humanity has been sacrificed as society has become more mechanised.
_	Hume's fork is the idea that all items of knowledge are either based on logic and definitions, or else on observation.
_	Scholars lean towards the idea that the style of a ‘Petrus spagnuolus’ working for Federico Montefeltro during this period directly correlates to the style of Pedro Berruguete in his later paintings and have attributed some of these paintings to him as well as the Justus of Ghent.
_	Descartes' theory of dualism, a separate mind and body, allowed Astell to promote the idea that women as well as men had the ability to reason, and subsequently they should not be treated so poorly:
_	While they believe that the Son fulfills a submissive and thus lesser role in relation to the Father, they do not accept the idea that the Son is an inherently inferior being to the Father or that he was created by the Father.
_	It featured the idea that homosexuality is an innate, natural predisposition; and that gays formed a "third sex.”
_	Central to this is the idea that wealth is only acceptable to the ruling class if it comes from the labour of others.
_	Jewish writers of the Middle Ages took offense at the idea that Jews might be enslaved; Joseph Caro and Maimonides both argue that calling a Jew "slave" was so offensive that it should be punished by excommunication.
_	The rationale for using this strategy is based on the idea that categorizing words will help students organize new words and concepts in relation to already known words/concepts.
_	Enlightenment feminist humor mocks the idea that men are superior to women and promotes a more egalitarian gender system.
_	As Brid-Aine Parnell points out in her piece for The A Register, "The government is fond of bandying about the idea that the UK space sector already generates £9bn a year, but in fact this is a completely made-up figure concocted by counting Sky TV and a few other "downstream space" companies as though they were satellite makers or something.
_	Modern scholarship generally rejects the idea that this work is written by the same author as the other four documents.
_	Opponents of the idea that Kitchener was drafted assert that the Canadian government would not have had the power to conscript an American citizen (assuming he was not naturalized).
_	This theory, however, does not address the idea that curiosity can often be displayed even in the absence of new or unfamiliar situations.
_	Tesla Motors has rejected the dealership sales model based on the idea that dealerships do not properly explain the advantages of their cars, and they cannot rely on third party dealerships to handle their sales.
_	In West Frisian, the dialects are known as "Stedsk" ("city-ish"), which does not indicate the idea that Stadsfries is a form of Frisian.
_	Undoubtedly, cognitive studies provided a lot of evidence supporting the idea that individuals can listen, verbalize, or manipulate, and rescue information in multiple task condition.
_	Suess was not correct in his analysis, which was predicated upon the notion of "contractionism"—the idea that the Earth is cooling down and, therefore, contracting.
_	Alan Greenspan, the chairman at that time, was one of the leaders of the idea that improved productivity would allow the Fed to keep interest rates low without causing inflation.
_	The attorney in his opening and closing statements suggested the idea that Cook likely had been a lookout for a group of young men who broke in to steal beer, then grabbed the coins while they were at it.
_	"There was an emphasis on the fatherland and the idea that Ottomans should share devotion to their country.
_	This is similar to the idea that 1) doing the dance may gain the attention of the gods who may get mad at them and 2) to do the dance is akin to a virginal self-sacrifice.
_	Brian Regal in "Pseudoscience: A Critical Encyclopedia" (2009) has written "A case can be made for the idea that many EVPs are artifacts of the recording process itself with which the operators are unfamiliar.
_	The British Parliament, disturbed by the idea that a great business concern, interested primarily in profit, was controlling the destinies of millions of people, passed acts in 1773 and 1784 that gave itself the power to control company policies and to appoint the highest company official in India, the Governor-General.
_	W2 is content with the idea that the light must know that she is doing her best.
_	Kanada also put forward the idea that atoms could be combined in various ways to produce chemical changes in presence of other factors such as heat.
_	During the depot renovation, part of the building was set aside with the idea that it could one day serve as a passenger waiting room.
_	The formation of the Mulgrave Central Mill Company Ltd in November 1893 under the provisions of the Sugar Works Guarantee Act of 1893 gave rise to the idea that a fourteen miles long tramway with a gauge of 2 ft should be constructed by the board from Cairns to the Mulgrave River.
_	Kentucky athletic director C. M. Newton expressed the idea that the ongoing use of an alcohol container as a trophy would be inappropriate under the circumstances.
_	Rosen goes on to compare "Kosher Jesus" to Sigmund Freud's book "Moses and Monotheism", a work which espouses the idea that Moses was an Egyptian, a theory that is generally regarded as lacking in historical basis by mainstream historians.
_	The crew were going to give up, but gave Weaver one last shot, and in this take, she got the ball in perfectly; the idea that she did it in one take is a myth.
_	This is contrary to the "a priori grammar postulate", the idea that grammar rules exist in the mind before the production of utterances.
_	Furthermore, the legs of the stool were called stumps, which adds further credence to the idea that stools were used as early wickets.
_	Dynamic efficiency refers to the idea that business which constantly competes must research, create and innovate to keep its share of consumers.
_	Innis' "The Fur Trade in Canada", as well as his work on the Canadian Pacific Railway, put forward the idea that geography, commerce, and resource-exploitation were the driving forces of Canadian history.
_	The difference in punishment is explained by the idea that "glaring iniquities" must be exposed in plain sight, while "effeminacy and pollution" should best be buried and concealed.
_	Although this implies a close dependence of the king upon the gods, the rarity of the figure of the human king in the ' agrees with the idea that kings at this time were basically on a level with tribal chiefs and were not viewed as divine.
_	The term animism encompasses a collection of beliefs and cultural mores anchored more or less in the idea that the world is inhabited by spirits and supernatural entities, both good and bad, and that respect must be accorded to them through worship.
_	Beginning in 1955, with the city's blessing, she began to solicit several major league teams, including the Dodgers, with the idea that they move to Los Angeles.
_	They dispute the idea that globalization was driven by multinational corporations that have become more powerful than nation states.
_	Then, in 1987, personal friends Parker and Leach began working together on the idea that would become "Barney & Friends".
_	In the domain of psychoanalysis, around the question of same-sex differences, the primary feminine difference is the difference opened between woman (girl) and woman (m/Other), maternal subjectivity, maternal/pregnance Eros of com-passion, the effects of compassion and awe and the passion for borderlinking and borderspacing and the idea that three kinds of fantasy (that she names Mother-fantasies) should be recognized, when they appear in a state of regression aroused by therapy itself, as primal:
_	Kirsch’s response expectancy theory is based on the idea that what people experience depends partly on what they expect to experience.
_	The same month, the squadron moved to Chakulia Airfield, India, which was already the home of the 7th Bombardment Group, with the idea that the squadron could work with the 7th Group to provide prestrike and poststrike reconnaissance.
_	Therefore, the idea that a final outcome almost occurred plays a role in the reason we emphasize that outcome.
_	François Jacob (17 June 1920 – 19 April 2013) was a French biologist who, together with Jacques Monod, originated the idea that control of enzyme levels in all cells occurs through regulation of transcription.
_	Despite a wide consensus over the idea that the vital importance of contemporary media justifies to regulate media concentration through sector-specific concentration rules going beyond the general competition policy, the need for sector specific regulation has been challenged in recent years due to the peculiar evolution of the media industry in the digital environment and media convergence.
_	Its inspiration comes from the idea that the superhero concept had its roots in European pulp literature, whose codes and tropes have been modernized by the modern American comic books.
_	Andy hears from another prisoner, Tommy Williams, whose former cellmate had bragged about killing a rich golfer and a lawyer's wife (Andy latches onto the idea that the word "lawyer" could easily have been mixed up with "banker", the professions being similarly viewed by the uneducated public), and framing the lawyer for the crime.
_	In practice, the doctrine is built around the idea that individual ship commanders or officers will be allowed to undertake autonomous operations.
_	Thus, Ibn 'Arabī could defend the idea that 'love of women belongs to the perfection of the gnostics, for it is inherited from the Prophet and is a divine love' (R 480).
_	It was founded on the idea that employees would have a say in the company's progression.
_	Other actors portray white men—instructors and pilots—who questioned the idea that black men could fly in America's military.
_	Because isn't part of the idea that it's low cost and multiple distribution..."
_	Permaculture also draws on the idea that in nature, ecosystems by and large have no trouble sustaining themselves, and that these systems can be replicated by human gardeners.
_	Alan Dershowitz, a prominent American defense attorney, surprised some observers by giving limited support to the idea that torture could be justified.
_	His work provides provide empirical support for the idea that different temporal phases of memory consolidation can be best identified not by their different temporal domains, but by their molecular signatures.
_	The first one encompasses the idea that elected politicians who have been condemned for fiscal fraud or corruption would be forbidden from any type of public office or mandate.
_	Seeing the nihilist as a natural result of the idea that God is dead, and insisting it was something to overcome, his questioning of the nihilist's life-negating values returned meaning to the Earth.
_	Representative Darrell Issa, Republican of California, the chairman of the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee, said that decision not to prosecute ignored "volumes of evidence in the public record and efforts to obstruct legitimate inquires", and that "giving Lois Lerner a free pass only reinforces the idea that government officials are above the law and that there is no consequence for wrongdoing."
_	Though initially opposed to the idea that President Chen Shui-bian assume the party chairmanship concurrently with his position as head of state, Yen later dropped a counter-proposal to hold the 2002 chairmanship election as originally scheduled.
_	One tradition says that this comes from the idea that as Jesus Christ took his last breath, the bar to which his feet were nailed broke, thus slanting to the side.
_	The rebranding was an effort to separate it from roadside oddity sites and to reinforce the idea that it is an ancient archaeological site.
_	What makes it the fullest, most mature album any riot grrrl performer has produced isn't Tucker abandoning her anger (the idea that anger is incompatible with maturity is a facile one), but rather Tucker starting (reluctantly) to register the contingencies and compromises that her ideologically based rage is inadequate to confront".
_	Dawkins then asks his audience to put off the idea that the natural world exists for our benefit.
_	Polybius wrote that Hannibal calculated that he could draw out Flaminius into battle and that "no sooner had he left the neighbourhood of Faesulae, and, advancing a short way beyond the Roman camp, made a raid upon the neighbouring country, then Flaminius became excited, and enraged at the idea that he was despised by the enemy: and as the devastation of the country went on, and he saw from the smoke that rose in every direction that the work of destruction was proceeding, he could not patiently endure the sight."
_	However, the series does not draw attention to "the idea that maybe other people have powers too".
_	News reported that "in '9–9–9 the Movie – Slaying the Tax Monster,' the Cain campaign continues to hammer home the idea that a simple plan is the best one.
_	Wnt signaling in vivo, supporting the idea that HSPG plays an important role in Wnt signaling regulation.
_	Overall, this study supports the idea that suppressed anger is related to hypertension.
_	With the invention of the telescope, the idea that Venus was a physical world and possible destination began to take form.
_	Preciado coins the term "Pharmacopornographic era" in the book, a term based on the idea that the pharmaceutical industry, pornography industry, and late Capitalism are integrated in their responsibility to the cycles of reproductive and social control through the regulation of bodies: it is framed into the micro-biological scale of design, and its place within a global political, social and economic context and strategies.
_	Easterling says that the city is an intentional community which epitomizes the idea that the personal and communal practice of TM brings a sense of well-being.
_	The Hillsborough Independent Panel later noted that, despite being dismissed by the Taylor Report, the idea that alcohol contributed to the disaster proved remarkably durable.
_	This was used then as a counter-example to the idea that the human speech engine was based upon statistical models, such as a Markov chain, or simple statistics of words following others.
_	He put forth (in concert with Tomaso Poggio) the idea that one must understand information processing systems at three distinct, complementary levels of analysis.
_	"Disembodiment" is the idea that once the user is online, the need for the body is no longer required, and the user can participate separately from it.
_	He professes the idea that every creature is connected and equally independent for survival.
_	Many held handmade signs reading “Fall Clean Up: This Is a Vanguard Community Project”, and “All trash is before the broom,” pushing against the idea that they, as people, were in any way disposable or unworthy of human dignity.
_	I'm interested in the idea that we have a more inclusive, clearer set of objectives.
_	The law allows pardons for people convicted of crimes under the Nazis, based on the idea that the laws of Nazi Germany "went against the basic ideas of justice".
_	Born in Rome, Corsetti is a staunch defender of the idea that the people of the world should be able to communicate in a neutral and easy international language.
_	Most of his writing is focused on environmentally sustainable development and the idea that past notions of development are naturally unsustainable practices on our finite planet.
_	Also Dōgen rejects the idea that practice is a means to the goal of enlightenment.
_	There were many contradictory comments and accounts to the idea that Birmingham or Brummagem was associated with poor-quality manufacture around the 19th century, Robert Southey once wrote in 1807:
_	He was among those to discredit the idea that nearly all Manchu documents were translations from Chinese and that they would add little to the record.
_	Further, Barth in his later years rejected the idea that baptism was actually used by God to accomplish anything, or could even properly be called a sacrament.
_	Another area of contention is the idea that toy dogs are only companion animals, slow moving, with little need for exercise and with low endurance.
_	Flynn also said people will dismiss "trampy, vampy, bitchy types – but there's still a big pushback against the idea that women can be just pragmatically evil, bad, and selfish".
_	In the earlier twentieth century, Nazi Germany promoted the idea that Russia owed its statehood to a Germanic, racially superior, elite.
_	This adds to Johnson's definition the idea that a university must consist of colleges.
_	The original building system kept very closely to the idea that Joel Glickman had: basic rods and connectors which could be easily attached together to make various constructions.
_	A proposed mechanism for the will to live is the idea that positive mental thinking tends to lower one’s risk for disease and health complications.
_	However, more recent evidence point to a pathway from S-cones to the superior colliculus, opposing previous research and supporting the idea that some chromatic processing mechanisms are intact in blindsight.
_	After observing what a poor attempt the raft is, he gets the idea that they should build a better one together.
_	Unfortunately, that type of response gives people the idea that the Catholic Church is unreflective."
_	They bring up the idea that first-language attrition can be related to "retrieval-induced-forgetting."
_	Applying this vision to the search for extraterrestrial intelligence leads to the idea that advanced intelligent life reconfigures itself into a black hole.
_	The basic principle of the Teller–Ulam configuration is the idea that different parts of a thermonuclear weapon can be chained together in "stages", with the detonation of each stage providing the energy to ignite the next stage.
_	There are also opinions, following Samson Raphael Hirsch and Azriel Hildesheimer, that exclude singing in mixed groups from this prohibition, such as synagogue prayer or dinner-table "zemirot", based on the idea that the female voice is not distinctly heard as separate from the group in these cases ("Trei Kali Lo Mishtamai", two voices cannot be heard simultaneously – Megila 21b).
_	The Pope derided the idea that all opinions should be aired publicly, as he felt certain speech could harm general morality.
_	I only know the way that has worked for us that's what I know how to do," emphasizing the idea that Batman exists in a world where he is the only superhero and a similar approach to the "Man of Steel" would assure the integrity needed for the film.
_	Cone's thought, along with Paul Tillich, stresses the idea that theology is not universal, but tied to specific historical contexts; he thus critiques the Western tradition of abstract theologizing by examining "its" social context.
_	She has also participated in conferences sponsored by the Jerusalem-based Sabeel Ecumenical Liberation Theology Center, which preaches “replacement theology,” namely the idea that the role of the Jews as God's “chosen people” ended with the arrival of Christianity.
_	Éothain was not as trusting as his commander, scoffing at the idea that hobbits even existed, and arguing against the gift of horses to the three companions, especially Gimli.
_	As a historian of religion, after studying Asian religions, Heiler developed a Modernist view and favored the idea that the "one holy church" includes also non-Christian faiths.
_	The former emerged in the late 1950s, emphasised the idea that archaeology should be a branch of anthropology, sought the discovery of universal laws about society, and believed that archaeology could ascertain objective information about the past.
_	The latter emerged as a reaction to processualism in the late 1970s, and rejected the idea that archaeology had access to objective information about the past, instead emphasising the subjectivity of all interpretations.
_	She fought against the idea that women who did not married should be seen as failures by society.
_	The YRN was founded on the idea that decision-making should be based upon the principle of subsidiarity.
_	He also produced five 4-hour specials, collectively known as "The Circular Path," which expounded the idea that all music was bounded by a series of concepts and forms which would eventually repeat themselves.
_	The navy, realising likely losses and fundamentally opposing the idea that tactical losses of ships was acceptable, declined to mount another attack.
_	This novel has a docudrama plot based upon the idea that there is a deliberately alarmist conspiracy behind global warming activism.
_	then an equation to express the idea that households' consumption intentions depend upon some measure of economic activity, possibly with a lag:
_	The novel ends during a three-way dialogue between Marcus, Will and Fiona where Will, to see if Marcus has truly changed, proposes the idea that he play a Joni Mitchell song on Fiona's piano, which she is enthusiastic about.
_	Dawkins explains that Faraday was either referring to the vast potential of a baby, or to the idea that there must be something more to life than growing up, working, getting old, and dying.
_	Against this theocratic conception, Dante expressed his need for another strong Holy Roman Emperor and proposed the idea that man essentially pursues two ends: the happiness of earthly life and that of eternal life.
_	The weight of the pin was originally based on the idea that a single pin should be around 24 percent the weight of the heaviest bowling ball within regulation, .
_	Westermark attacks the idea that moral principles express objective value, writing "I am not aware of any moral principle which can be said to be self-evident," and asserting that (no) "moral statements are anything more than the opinions of those who express them."
_	It proposed the idea that our universe had originated from a quantum fluctuation of the vacuum.
_	His vision was inclusive and collective, based on the idea that all of Argentina needed to be involved in the project of national development.
_	Baca said, "I really liked the idea that the work could not be owned by anyone.
_	Bryan claimed that property rights describe relations among people and not just relations between people and things Singer holds that the idea that owners have no legal obligations to others wrongly supposes that property rights hardly ever conflict with other legally protected interests.
_	Various population genetics studies along with historians such as Gabriel Camps and Charles-André Julien lend support to the idea that the bulk of the gene pool of modern maghrebis, irrespective of linguistic group, is derived from the Berber populations of the pre-Islamic period.
_	She stresses the idea that "Everyone is talented, original, and has something important to say."
_	Before being convinced of the nature of the zombie plague, he is sickened at the idea that he was ordering soldiers to fire on what he believed to be civilians who were merely sick.
_	Some have advanced the idea that Portland's weirdness is an excuse for the younger generation to be underachievers.
_	Even though he was not credited for the final film, it was Baker who had the idea that the character Addie was only to be heard, and not seen.
_	This interpretation alludes to the idea that a person may posit violent opposition to "the Other" as a means of establishing their own identity as part of the majority and thus gaining social validation.
_	This model adapts traditional game theory logic to the idea that players reciprocate actions in order to cooperate.
_	He proclaims that this "very obvious truth" has been obscured by the "cult of individualism" – the idea that the individual was entirely separate from society – that emerged in western thought with the rise of classical liberalism.
_	Both Buddhism and Taoism share the idea that hungry ghosts can emerge from neglect or desertion of ancestors.
_	This sociological perspective draws on the work of sociologists like Émile Durkheim, and gets its name from the idea that the best way to study society is to identify the roles that different aspects of society play.
_	Since the Intellivision was already based on General Instrument's CP1610 microprocessor and support chips, and talking electronic products (such as Texas Instruments' Speak & Spell) had already captured the public's fascination, it didn't take long for someone at Mattel Electronics to get the idea that a speech-synthesis module might be an interesting add-on for the console.
_	Many elements of the Imperial Japanese Army were extremely opposed to the idea that Hirohito was going to end the war, as they believed that this was dishonourable.
_	Jim Wilkinson, who at the time was working as congressman Dick Armey's spokesman, also helped sell the idea that Gore claimed to have "invented the internet."
_	He pioneered the idea that we can achieve more if we relax, enjoy life more, and concentrate on the few things that matter uniquely to each individual.
_	There is the idea that, after the collapse of the Mirador state, its refugees migrated north towards Calakmul, where they founded a new Kan polity.
_	She confirms that the photograph is forged, and finds the idea that her brother killed Bruno laughable.
_	Using these mice, Tuveson has made several important discoveries in the biology of pancreatic cancer, including the work that contributed to the idea that the stromal cells of pancreatic tumors act as a barrier for therapies.
_	The conundrum of this thought experiment lies in the idea that the wave function interacted with the inner shell, causing a partial collapse of the wave function, without actually triggering any of the detectors on the inner shell.
_	However, Ascham wrote these words years after the actual meeting, and to promote the idea that children learned well under a kind tutor.
_	Caravaggio scholar John Gash suggests that the problem for the Carmelites may have been theological rather than aesthetic, in that Caravaggio's version fails to assert the doctrine of the Assumption of Mary, the idea that the Mother of God did not die in any ordinary sense but was assumed into Heaven.
_	Recent years have seen increased movement toward the idea that empathy occurs from motor neuron imitation.
_	A firm believer of the idea that the Earth remained fixed in space, Morin is best known for being an opponent of Galileo and the latter's ideas.
_	Hindley seems equally shocked at the idea that she would ever be allowed parole.
_	This is the idea that people tend to disassociate themselves from lower-status individuals because they do not want their reputations affected by associating with the people who are considered failures.
_	I can't bear the idea that somebody else would get to wear my Paris Hilton wig, but you never know."
_	Doris discusses the way in which social psychological experiments—such as the Stanford prison experiments involving the idea of situationism—call into question a key component in virtue ethics: the idea that individuals have a single, environment-independent moral character.
_	It is influenced by psychologists such as Carl Rogers and Albert Bandura, and has been compared to William Glasser's choice theory which is based on the idea that past relationships are influential on behavior and addictive behaviors are symptomatic of unconscious psychological needs, and Marsha M. Linehan's dialectical behavior therapy which focuses on learning the triggers to certain types of destructive behavior.
_	Nieuwenhuys' "New Babylon", and his 1953 work "For an Architecture of Situation", were based on the idea that architecture itself would allow and instigate a transformation of daily reality".
_	Mingliang tries to get Lang Lang to admit she is Fang, but eventually settles into the idea that she is a different woman.
_	John Vasil Krutilla (February 13, 1922 – June 27, 2003) was an American environmental economist, known for inventing the concept of existence value, the idea that undisturbed wilderness has economic value.
_	The main agents of the idea that became the La Paz Stock Exchange were Ernesto Wende, Oscar Unemployed, Gastón Guillén, Gastón Mujía, José Crespo, Luis Ergueta, and Chirveches.
_	In 2009, the organizations came under public scrutiny when a letter written by Unfamiliar Records founder Greg Ipp was republished on the internet - in turn promoting the idea that bigger image-based bands shouldn’t be getting such a huge amount of those finite funds as it leaves relatively little, if any, funding for the smaller up-and-coming bands.
_	Originally, the film included overt references to Walt Disney's involvement with "Plus Ultra", the fictional organization founded by Gustave Eiffel, Jules Verne, Nikola Tesla, and Thomas Edison — including the idea that Disneyland's Tomorrowland was intended to be a cover-up for the real one developed by the group — however, the scenes and dialogue were omitted from the final cut of the film.
_	Chapter VIII addresses the idea that species had special characteristics that prevented hybrids from being fertile in order to preserve separately created species.
_	This discovery led Cuvier to denounce the idea that fossils came from those that are currently living.
_	This led to the idea that planetary nebulae were caused by a star's outer layers being thrown into space at the end of its life.
_	Back on Earth, Kelvin struggles to return to normal life, haunted by the idea that he "remembered her wrong" – that is, Rheya as being invariably suicidal.
_	Dobzhansky's work was instrumental in spreading the idea that it is through mutations in genes that natural selection takes place.
_	A number of studies on S.pombe genome support the idea that the genetic diversity of fission yeast strains is slightly less than budding yeast.
_	Antithetic to the prevailing academic school of thought, Forrer advocated the idea that Theopomp´s "Meropis" was not a fictional place, but an actually existing geographic entity.
_	Thomson has said that his painting was the idea that Stella Vine used for her painting of Princess Diana, "Hi Paul Can You Come Over", that launched her to fame when it was bought by Charles Saatchi in 2004.
_	According to David Beard, the director of training at Lance, Inc., the name of the Captain's Wafers came from the idea that "on a ship, the captains always had the best of everything when it came to meals.
_	Hochschild presents the idea that actions that result from our emotions is rational, not irrational.
_	By asking locals the directions to castles using non-standard names for the castles, Pablé elicited various forms by which the locals referred to them, highlighting the idea that references to the places were “highly context sensitive” and that the “meaning” is created on the spot, and that “speakers always make sense of language in light of their own experience”.
_	She called the idea that she had used the system to look up information on Hezbollah or her relatives "absolutely false and absurd".
_	The notion that these aliens could lack consciousness and possess intelligence is linked to the idea that some humans could also have diminished consciousness and remain outwardly functional.
_	Although none of the bidders had provided for the route, the Postmaster General advocated a southerly route, known as the "Oxbow Route", with the idea that it could remain in operation during the Winter.
_	"Privatizing profits and socializing losses" refers to the idea that corporations want to reserve financial gains for themselves and pass along losses to the rest of society, potentially through lobbying the government for assistance.
_	He explicitly rejects the idea that Islamic terrorists attack Western nations because they support Israel or because of any other reason, such as poverty or retaliation.
_	He introduced the idea that geographical variations in soil type could be explained in relation not only to geological factors (parent material), but also to climatic and topographic factors, and the time available for pedogenesis (soil formation) to operate.
_	Many people have the idea that what is happening in other countries cannot happen here."
_	In 2007, he stated that "I still believe one day that the idea that the main means of production are owned by private individuals... will be considered as anti-democratic as the idea serfs could be tied to the land.
_	Louis Pasteur a French chemist, supported the idea that fermentation was a biological process.
_	Justus von Liebig, a German chemist, supported the idea that fermentation was a mechanical process.
_	Research also gives evidence to support the idea that cystatin B may be a type of "protecting" molecule in the brain.
_	The DOB spread to Chicago, New York, and Los Angeles, and "The Ladder" was mailed to hundreds—eventually thousands—of DOB members discussing the nature of homosexuality, sometimes challenging the idea that it was a sickness, with readers offering their own reasons why they were lesbians, and suggesting ways to cope with the condition or society's response to it.
_	First, it provided the idea that Christian unity could be achieved by finding a set of essentials that all reasonable people could agree on.
_	In the U.S., researchers arrived at the idea that the best way to train the next generation would be to create graduate programs in OHP.
_	Lifestyle brands operate off the idea that each individual has an identity based on their choices, experiences, and background (e.g. ethnicity, social class, subculture, nationality, etc.).
_	Ultimately emerging was the idea that the new city should be a real multi-faceted city, not a bedroom suburb.
_	And, he "resisted the idea that 'body language' could be deciphered in some absolute fashion".
_	"Process synchronization" refers to the idea that multiple processes are to join up or handshake at a certain point, in order to reach an agreement or commit to a certain sequence of action.
_	The Moodies were also among the pioneers of the idea that a successful rock band could promote itself through their own label, following the Beatles' creation of Apple Records.
_	Other parties have also promulgated the idea that the Mesoamericans believed the conquistadors, and in particular Cortés, to be awaited gods: most notably the historians of the Franciscan order such as Fray Gerónimo de Mendieta.
_	It is also possible to specify non-monotonic consequence relations to capture the idea that, e.g., 'Tweety can fly' is a logical consequence of
_	Media deconvergence has also been used to refute the idea that technological convergence is favoured by deregulation, because technological convergence introduces new challenges, such as the protection of privacy or the respect of copyrights, which require new policies and regulations.
_	This reinforces the idea that the games played at the time did not necessarily involve a ball being kicked.
_	He continues to explore themes from his other novels, such as the idea that fiction is often a superior reality.
_	The model is based on the idea that the self-concept is flexible and different in different situations or contexts.
_	The video shows surrealistic images that evoke the idea that Ware is patiently waiting for her turn in experiencing the supreme love she sings about in her song.
_	Adams's daughter, British author Gemini Adams, wrote a multiple award-winning book entitled, "Your Legacy of Love: Realize the Gift in Goodbye", which gives a personal account of her mother's battle with cancer and the insights gained from her bereavement, including the idea that survivors need more than the financial assets that are typically left in a final will and testament.
_	William and Elizabeth Marston's granddaughter, Christie Marston, criticized the film, saying the idea that Elizabeth and Olive Bryne were lovers was purely fictional.
_	An essay discussing the idea that music expresses the spirit of sensuality.
_	Susumu Nakanishi, in his 1963 book "Man'yōshū no Hikakubungakuteki Kenkyū" (万葉集の比較文学的研究), also expressed support for the idea that the title referred to the great number of poems included in the work.
_	Other theories have been proposed, including the idea that the peak shift is an example of relational control; that is, the discrimination was perceived as a choice between the "greener" of two stimuli, and when a still greener stimulus was offered the pigeons responded even more rapidly to that than to the originally reinforced stimulus.
_	Thomas Reid, the eighteenth-century founder of the Scottish School of Common Sense, formulated the idea that sensation was composed of a set of data transfers but also declared that there is still a direct connection between perception and the world.
_	Anthony G. Williams, however, argues that the Soviet M43 round was so different that it was possible to dismiss the idea that it was a copy of any German round in existence at the time.
_	Guy Bourdin was among the first to imagine fashion photographies that contained fascinating narratives, dramatic effects with intense color saturation, hyper-realism and cropped compositions while he established the idea that the product is secondary to the image.
_	"I never got the idea that he was particularly interested", states Lambert to Ripley.
_	What was new was the idea that "drugs" could cause this in well-nourished people with no intestinal abnormalities.
_	With two crooked friends, Charles and Lucas, he discusses the idea that they could use the ineffectual Robert to run off some counterfeit banknotes.
_	He also stressed the idea that social and biological factors that affect someone throughout their entire life should be heavily considered when diagnosing and treating a patient.
_	This was ironic because Flynn "had long ridiculed the idea that communism was a threat to America.", dismissing American Communists as a tiny handful of fractious, isolated radicals who were too busy attacking each other to attack capitalism.
_	The publication's predominant theme continued to be "Europe against Bolshevism," with several editorials devoted to the idea that the Waffen-SS laid the foundation for the unification of Europe, expansion of NATO and "freedom of Fatherlands," as stated in one of the issues.
_	Orwell questions the idea that buying or reading a book is an expensive hobby.
_	The story has been cited as an example of the idea that magic can be dangerous to the wielder if incorrectly performed (when the prostitute casts a spell to rejuvenate herself so that the teenager can see what she looked like when she was his age, she is "consumed by green fire"), and as evidence that Reamy was, if not gay himself, then "remarkably familiar with the gay idiom of the time".
_	In international relations theory, anarchy is the idea that the world lacks any supreme authority or sovereign.
_	Something that hasn't changed in Cyprus is the idea that women should be seen not heard or listen rather than speak.
_	Arguing that sexuality was never truly repressed, Foucault asks why modern westerners believe the hypothesis, noting that in portraying past sexuality as repressed, it provides a basis for the idea that in rejecting past moral systems, future sexuality can be free and uninhibited, a "...garden of earthly delights".
_	He replaced it with the notion of "Pareto-optimality", the idea that a system is enjoying maximum economic satisfaction when no one can be made better off without making someone else worse off.
_	So I don't celebrate the idea that there's a Jewish homeland in the Middle East.
_	He posits that totalitarian democracy, or what he terms "equality-oriented democracy," is founded on the idea that it is possible, and necessary, that the complete rights and freedoms of people ought not be held hostage to traditions and social arrangements.
_	Some observers, such as Dr. Jacob Katz, feel that the idea that these are "de facto" binding on the whole community is a novelty within the history of Judaism.
_	Campbell and the San Franciscans had different thoughts on the origin (etiology) of AIDS from Callen and the New Yorkers — Campbell described as "crazy" the idea that AIDS was caused by promiscuity, a perspective espoused by Callen and Berkowitz (and their physician Joseph Sonnabend) at the time — and the Denver Principles represent a "careful synthesis" of these two positions:
_	The panel noted that, despite being dismissed by the Taylor Report, the idea that alcohol contributed to the disaster proved remarkably durable.
_	This defined China as a multi-ethnic state, thereby rejecting the idea that "China" only meant Han areas.
_	With only five hours remaining in the second session, Kerli "had kinda given up on the idea that any producer would actually get [her] and become [her] musical soulmate" before meeting her "favorite producers and friends for life", Svante Halldin and Jakob Hazell (the team known as "SeventyEight", who also collaborated on "Lucky Ones" by Kerli).
_	Before Christmas in 1962, as Charlie Daniels was driving from El Paso, Texas to the East Coast, he began forming the idea that would become the song.
_	While she reports on findings that are now not credible – such as the idea that the population of Africa is a recently evolved type – she is remarkable for suggesting that Africans are not primitive but more evolved than other human types.
_	These feminists believe that prostitution is very harmful to society as it reinforces the idea that women are sex objects which exist for men's enjoyment, which can be "bought" and which can be "used" solely for men's sexual gratification.
_	Nonetheless, the early-days ideal appears to have given rise to the idea that Swedenborg was a vegetarian.
_	The scheme is based on the idea that people should settle before houses and infrastructure are constructed and that, once settled, they can develop their housing and the infrastructure incrementally, as and when they have the resources.
_	The most recent surveys of the ship indicate that the ship was modified late in her career and have lent support to the idea that the "Mary Rose" was altered too much to be properly seaworthy.
_	Many Trotskyists rejected the idea that Stalin's regime was Bonapartist.
_	Against the idea that the Church's teaching body has a mainly exhortatory role, the pope reiterates the Catholic doctrine that the magisterium of the Catholic Church has authority to definitively pronounce on moral questions.
_	Fundamental to the practice is the idea that everything is energy, and moves in waves, patterns and rhythms.
_	Even with these disclaimers, other writers concerned with alcohol and drug studies have questioned whether "Just Say Yes" is promoting the idea that long-term cannabis use poses no danger.
_	There is a lack of development or major shifts in his worldview between the 1926 volume and his assumption of power in 1933, supporting the idea that Hitler was not a foreign policy opportunist but that his ideas were specific and formed before he had the power to implement his designs.
_	"Intention" (1957) is also the classic source for the idea that there is a difference in "direction of fit" between cognitive states like beliefs and conative states like desire.
_	Some Chinese scholars doubted the idea that God was already part of the Confucian tradition.
_	This is another advantage of using formula_16, because it incorporates the idea that complete antireciprocal is more statistical significant in the networks with larger density, while it has to be regarded as a less pronounced effect in sparser networks.
_	However, the idea that "Microraptor" was an arboreal glider relies on it to have regularly climbed or even lived in trees, when study of its anatomy have shown that its limb proportions fall in line with modern ground birds rather than climbers, and its skeleton shows none of the expected adaptations in animals specialized for climbing trees.
_	An additional benefit to cannibalization is the idea that a well-fed female is less likely to mate again.
_	In "Europe's Inner Demons" (1975), English historian Norman Cohn asserted that there was "nothing whatsoever" in the source material to justify the idea that the "benandanti" were the "survival of an age-old fertility cult".
_	In part, it was a way of countering antisemitism with the idea that the foundation of morals and law in the United States was a shared one between Jews and Christians.
_	It resists the isolation and insularity of literature written in a minority language; it resists the idea that culture in diaspora is fossilized, stagnant, or in decline; and it resists the notion that Armenians have only their century-old plight to offer the world outside their national cocoon."
_	Iravatham Mahadevan, decipherer of Tamil-Brahmi and a noted expert on the Indus script, has supported the idea that both those semiotic traditions may have some continuity with the Indus script, but regarding the idea of continuity with Brahmi, he has categorically stated that he does not believe that theory "at all."
_	Al-Biruni tells us that Al-Sijzi invented an astrolabe, called "al-zūraqī", whose design was based on the idea that the Earth rotates:
_	In 1863, influenced by Pasteur's research on fermentation, fellow Frenchman Casimir Davaine mostly explained the cause of anthrax, but Davaine's explanation was opposed by those who opposed the idea that infection with a microorganism could explain it.
_	Field theory also includes the idea that every person holds a different experience for a situation.
_	This leads to the idea that no two experiences are the same for a person either, as the dynamic field is constantly changing.
_	Another piece of field theory is the idea that no part of a person's field can be viewed as being pointless.
_	Rather than the idea that the individual was a "fundamental political unit", as the Americans' advocated, Vergara thought that the family was the ideal political unit and worked toward social solidarity through protecting family rights.
_	Still, he was intrigued by the idea that, properly configured, it might be possible to use a flame or something similar to detect radio signals.
_	More recently, the East Anglian Waterways Association promoted the idea that the Drain could again be made navigable as part of a larger scheme to improve leisure facilities.
_	Inhibited reversal learning can be associated with the idea that subjects experiencing symptoms of anxiety frustrate easily and are unable to successfully adapt to a changing environment.
_	Monte Hellman wrote in his memoirs that "the producer became obsessed with the idea that the movie should be no longer than 90 minutes.
_	Isaac Newton (25 December 1642–31 March 1727) is credited with introducing the idea that the motion of objects in the heavens, such as planets, the Sun, and the Moon, and the motion of objects on the ground, like cannon balls and falling apples, could be described by the same set of physical laws.
_	The government systematically disseminated, through propaganda and state education, the idea that the Horthy era constituted the "lowest point in Hungarian history."
_	The extensive media attention given to Etan's disappearance has been credited with creating greater attention to missing children, resulting in changes such as less willingness to allow children to walk to school, photos of missing children being printed on milk cartons, and promotion of the concept of "stranger danger", the idea that all adults not known to the child must be regarded as potential sources of danger.
_	The book was published as "The Great American Ass" by Anonymous, with the idea that curiosity about the identity of the author would stimulate sales.
_	Whilst Herodotus seems to have found the idea that the Pelasgians were not 'Greek' far-fetched, it is clear that the Arcadians were considered as the original inhabitants of the region.
_	Leon needs the sale to succeed so no one will know he overstepped his authority in spending $20,000 of school money on the chocolates, and The Vigils cannot have anyone getting the idea that someone can defy them and get away with it–which is exactly what some students think is happening.
_	Because grief responses can take many forms, including laughter, celebration, and bawdiness, in addition to sadness, Bonanno coined the phrase "coping ugly" to describe the idea that some forms of coping may seem counter intuitive.
_	Regarding claims based on the idea that a senior state official committing International crimes can never be said to be acting officially, as Wouters notes:
_	The final lines of the poem reflect the idea that for a truly African American culture to persist, it would have to be founded from within its own community:
_	The Swiss pastor Johann Kaspar Lavater (1741–1801) introduced the idea that physiognomy related to the specific character traits of individuals, rather than general types, in his "Physiognomische Fragmente", published between 1775 and 1778.
_	This time gap in the story could be linked to the idea that in Neverland you never grow old.
_	Alternate methods include maximum parsimony (MP) that construct a sequence based on a model of sequence evolution – usually the idea that the minimum number of nucleotidal sequence changes represents the most efficient route for evolution to take and by Occam's razor is the most likely.
_	What we settled on is the idea that you have different roles -- it isn’t two against the world, it’s one against the world with a helper."
_	Also, the idea that they are "saving money by buying products that require some assembly" may make them feel like "smart shoppers."
_	Swiss alchemist, astrologer, and physician Paracelsus (1493–1541), on the other hand, rejected the idea that abnormal behaviors were caused by witches, demons, and spirits and suggested that people's mind and behaviors were influenced by the movements of the moon and stars.
_	He examined the theories of Chamberlin–Moulton planetesimal hypothesis and questioned the idea that planetesimals grew by very gradual accretion of dust.
_	Aside from its technical uses, it occurs frequently in literature, particularly in scholarly addenda: e.g., "Faustus had signed his life away, and was, , incapable of repentance" (from Christopher Marlowe, "The Tragical History of Dr. Faustus") or "These prejudices are rooted in the idea that every tramp is a blackguard" (from George Orwell, "Down and Out in Paris and London").
_	Ignosticism or igtheism is the idea that the question of the existence of God is meaningless because the term has no coherent and unambiguous definition.
_	Twentieth-century philosopher Alvin Plantinga supported the idea that this world is the best possible world, arguing that the good in the world (including God's infinite goodness) outweighs the evil and proposing that the ultimate good of God's sacrifice when Jesus was crucified necessitated the existence of evil.
_	The failure to restore the normally functional adenoviruses, exhibited by a CAAT box, is consistent with the idea that the CAAT box plays a vital role in the adenovirus MLP and is preferred over other transcriptional elements.
_	The ONA promotes the idea that human history can be divided into a series of Aeons, each of which contain a corresponding human civilization.
_	However, according to the American Cancer Society, "available scientific evidence does not support the idea that wheatgrass or the wheatgrass diet can cure or prevent disease".
_	Instead, all "Total" does is to reinforce the idea that Joy Division/New Order was a hugely exciting source of music between 1978 and 1990 and New Order has been a pitiful shadow of their once-visionary selves ever since."
_	Severely traumatized by both incidents, Roy became deeply cynical and embraced the idea that he was a murderer, convincing himself over time that he did it all on purpose.
_	This book is a testament to the idea that each holocaust survivor story is unique in the sequence of events, coincidences, blind luck and reasoned choices which allowed an individual to survive to liberation despite incredible odds.
_	Liberals were strongly nonconformist and the idea that Church of England and Roman Catholic schools should be funded from the rates, a form of local taxation, was anathema to them.
_	The axiom schema is motivated by the idea that whether a class is a set depends only on the cardinality of the class, not on the rank of its elements.
_	Reliant asked Ogle Design to design the Rebel, with the idea that it should look completely different to the Reliant Regal, but should save production costs by retaining some of the Regal's parts, such as its doors and windscreen.
_	This trend was heavily supported by psychiatrists with the idea that homosexuals were mentally ill, which was stated in the American Psychiatric Associations "Diagnostic and Statistic Manual of Mental Disorders".
_	the idea that a wife by marriage consents in advance to her husband having sexual intercourse with her whatever her state of health or however proper her objections (if that is what Hale meant), is no longer acceptable.
_	She then decided to wade out into the sea, and Northeast commented "She has the idea that if she gets into the water, he'll come to her again.
_	This then gives expression to the idea that humans are never at home in the world and that they are constantly striving to remake the world.
_	The guttansweng is the idea that people become separated from their human nature and thus become alienated within a capitalist environment...
_	This supports the idea that song sparrows with large song repertoires have better lifetime fitness and that song repertoires are honest indicators of the males “quality.”
_	What unites these sketches is the idea that collectively we live on the brink of destruction while individually our lives are increasingly robbed of dignity.
_	According to the two writers, one of the main themes of the episode is "the idea that we all have to fight our own little green men and carry on."
_	In these works also she became an early advocate of the idea that anyone could practice Wicca without requiring initiation by a pre-existing Wiccan, while also contributing to and encouraging research into the religion's early history.
_	Thus, the author thinks that the idea that the Red Army must strike first (clearly formulated in Zhukov's plan from May 15, 1941) was in a concealed form already present in all the previous drafts.
_	Khadem does not like the idea that he will go to a whites' school.
_	It was during the Bible Institute that A.T. Jones delivered his evidence supporting the idea that the Alemanni were one of the ten horns of prophecy that succeeded the crumbling Roman Empire.
_	This can be paralleled to the idea that when something is framed in the context of something you are familiar with, the task becomes easier.
_	This supports the idea that in Western culture, females prefer men who have the capability to cultivate facial hair, such as a moustache, but choose not to.
_	Analogous to the idea that connecting many tiny straight lines can approximate a larger circle, FEM encompasses all the methods for connecting many simple element equations over many small subdomains, named finite elements, to approximate a more complex equation over a larger domain.
_	It ended the idea that Europe was a single Christian empire; governed spiritually by the Pope and temporally by the Holy Roman Emperor.
_	Julie, shaken at the idea that a second strangulation victim is now dead while she remains alive, expresses her concern in that even with self-defense training, there is no true guarantee that one will remain truly protected from the supposed serial killer should he strike again.
_	Contemporary historians who subscribe to the idea that the image of the Inquisition in historiography has been systematically deformed by the Black Legend include Edward Peters, Philip Wayne Powell, William S.Maltby, Richard Kagan, Margaret R. Greer, Helen Rawlings, Ronnie Hsia, Lu Ann Homza, Stanley G. Payne, Andrea Donofrio, Irene Silverblatt, Christopher Schmidt-Nowara, Charles Gibson (historian), and Joseph Pérez.
_	During the 19th and early 20th centuries the idea that there are differences in the brain structures and brain sizes of different races, and that these differences explained the different intelligences, was much advocated and studied.
_	The word "entheogen", on the other hand, which is often used to describe the religious and ritual use of psychedelic drugs in anthropological studies, is associated with the idea that it could be relevant to religion.
_	Following from this argument is the idea that strengths can be over or underused and that “strengths development” is largely a matter of learning to use strengths appropriately to unique situations.
_	When creating the character interplay of Jake and co-pilot Diana, a sarcastic and cheesy camaraderie was used, born out of the idea that the characters were raised in computer simulations since a young age, away from any real danger or consequence and lived nearly their entire lives in space.
_	Ward continued to promote the idea during late 1942 and early 1943, and the idea that it was an actual defence strategy gained support after General Douglas MacArthur referred to it during a press conference in March 1943, where he also coined the term 'Brisbane Line'.
_	The "Bynum Thesis" has been subject to pressure, often controversially, on a number of points, essentialism, the idea of a difference between male and female spirituality, the idea that the type of practices described "empowered" women, the use of gender as the sole category of difference, and the very idea of "movements" themselves.
_	This challenges the idea that the early development of technology by early humans was a process of accumulation of improvements.
_	At the end of 1844 the anonymous book "Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation" brought wide public interest in transmutation of species and the idea that humans were descended from apes, and after a slow initial response, strong condemnation from the scientific establishment.
_	In response, nations including the United States pushed through the idea that, in order to be eligible for decolonization, the presence of "blue water" between the colony and the colonizing country—or, at minimum, a geographically discrete set of boundaries—was needed.
_	The saying "a fed bear is a dead bear" has come into use to popularize the idea that allowing bears to scavenge human garbage, such as trash cans and campers' backpacks, pet food, or other food sources that draw the bear into contact with humans, can result in a bear's death.
_	The review then went on to scorn the idea that by signing to EMI Records as a teenager, Bush had allowed herself to be moulded in their corporate image, suggesting that on the contrary, it had enabled her to use the system for her own devices: "Our Kate's a genius, the rarest solo artist this country's ever produced.
_	However, in accepting his inevitable death, de Boeldieu takes comfort in the idea that "For a commoner, dying in a war is a tragedy.
_	John Chrysostom alludes to and then dismisses the idea that Peter could be held responsible for the couple's death.
_	His treatment, which he applied mainly to cases of alcoholism, drug addiction, phobia, and sexual dysfunction, was basically instilling in his patients the idea that they could expect to improve as a result of their efforts.
_	One ethical question that arises is the idea that although there are some extremely painful memories that some people (for example PTSD patients) would like to be rid of, not all unpleasant memories are bad.
_	Windschuttle's recent research disputes the idea that the colonial settlers of Australia committed genocide against the Indigenous Australians.
_	The other is the idea that there is a secret war between two factions which is being fought on the Earth, with most people completely unaware of it.
_	He based his interpretation of the character on the idea that Weldon would use his odd behaviour as a defense mechanism when conversations did not go his way.
_	In response to criticisms of the Institute stating that the amendment was a federal education policy requiring inclusion of alternatives to evolution be taught, which it was not, in 2003 intelligent design's three most prominent legislators, John Boehner, Judd Gregg and Santorum provided a letter to the Discovery Institute giving it the go ahead to invoke the amendment as evidence of "Congress's rejection of the idea that students only need to learn about the dominant scientific view of controversial topics".
_	By not trying to do well in school, such students engage in a rejection of the achievement ideology—that is, the idea that working hard and studying long hours will pay off for students in the form of higher wages or upward social mobility.
_	Vithoulkas' claims echo the idea that treating a disease with external medication used to treat the symptoms would only drive it deeper into the body and conflict with scientific studies, which indicate that penicillin treatment produces a complete cure of syphilis in more than 90% of cases.
_	The author also puts forward the idea that death is not the end, and that whatever someone was or wished to be in life, he or she continues to be in death, within the restraints that death imposes.
_	The title is in a different hand and a different medium, which fits the idea that Turner made the gift to Harding in 1832, and that the title was added later, by another.
_	These are the prerequisites that have always inspired and characterized the Mafonso's long walk of research - from the cycle "Alla maniera degli altri"(1972) until "Dimore" from the last years - although in his contemporaneity is the result of a strict classic vision of the Renaissanceof the artwork, is also the result of a conception based on the irreplaceable basis of the drawing that becomes the way of give a first tangible form of the idea that is born in the artist's mind like a divine spark.
_	In 2005, a library clerk was forced to resign for promoting the idea that baptism is essential for salvation, considered a violation of the Statement of Faith.
_	He coined the term "manufacture of consent," which is based on the idea that the public's consent must be coaxed by experts to support a democratic society.
_	Anna Paterson, who had moved the original resolution, expressed dismay at the idea that a pro-conscription meeting might be disrupted by those opposing it, being quoted in "The Telegraph" as saying that "if such an idea were permitted to prevail, the sacred right of a free people to meet and lawfully organise in order to achieve some definite purpose would be destroyed".
_	In translations of the Bible into modern European languages, such as the Luther Bible or the King James Bible, the word "eunuchus" as found in the Latin Vulgate is usually rendered as officer, official or chamberlain, consistent with the idea that the original meaning of eunuch was bed-keeper (Orion's first option).
_	The contingent-future form expresses the idea that the action of a verb may perhaps occur in the future.
_	Hal Bridges said that the term represented the idea that "business leaders in the United States from about 1865 to 1900 were, on the whole, a set of avaricious rascals who habitually cheated and robbed investors and consumers, corrupted government, fought ruthlessly among themselves, and in general carried on predatory activities comparable to those of the robber barons of medieval Europe."
_	Wessel took issue with the idea that Myers' assignment could seriously be a matter of public interest.
_	Documentary evidence suggests that there was some antipathy between the two men, but the idea that Salieri was the instigator of Mozart's demise is not taken seriously by scholars of the men's lives and careers.
_	The name results from the idea that there is no incentive to store or hoard Freigeld as it will automatically lose its value after some time.
_	Another approach uses the idea that the differential entropy,
_	Lucy Suchman's work on situated action at Xerox Labs was instrumental in popularizing the idea that an actor's understanding of how to perform work results from reflecting on interactions with the social and material (e.g. technology-mediated) situation in which she or he acts.
_	In 1832–1834, Browne published a lengthy paper in the "Phrenological Journal" concerning the relationship of language to mental disorder and in 1834 he was appointed superintendent of Montrose Lunatic Asylum, where he advocated the idea that mental illness had a physical basis in the brain.
_	We started the path of self-management with "Gato negro-Dragón rojo", but the idea that we had was already from many years ago.
_	Outside of the television programme, the Fourth Doctor and Romana II also appear in Australian-filmed television advertisements for PR1ME Computer, Inc. in 1980, which played in a tongue-in-cheek way with the idea that the two characters shared a romantic relationship, climaxing with the Doctor proposing marriage (which occurred in real life between Tom Baker and Lalla Ward after her departure from the series that same year).
_	For example, a single artifact generally identified as a Dorset Eskimo burin was also recovered there, and may support the idea that both the burin and the penny could plausibly have come to Maine through native trade-channels from Norse sources in Labrador or Newfoundland.
_	These include a redesigned save/export menu that aims to reinforce the idea that information is lost when exporting.
_	This ad populum reversal commits the same logical flaw as the original fallacy given that the idea "X is true" is inherently separate from the idea that "Y people believe X": "Y people believe in X as true, purely because Y people believe in it, and not because of any further considerations.
_	The song poked fun at people who were carried away with the prestige of Mt Fuji receiving "World Heritage Site" status, promoting the idea that the true value of something is unchangeable whether recognized by an authority or not.
_	The idea to go to Mexico arose in the minds of several comrades who were alarmed by the idea that, remaining in the United States, they would be forcibly restrained from leaving for Europe, where the revolution that had burst out in Russia that February promised to spread all over the continent.
